CHAPTER 15
Reconstruction, 1865-1877
Federal Reconstruction Policy The Impact of Reconstruction
Terror, Apathy, and the Creation of the Segregated South
12
1831-1854
CHAPTER OBJECTIVE
Demonstrate an understanding of how immigration, new debates over slavery, and an activist generation of women shaped the lives of Americans.
THE CHANGING FACE OF THE AMERICAN PEOPLE IN THE
1840s AND 1850s___________________ Analyze how immigration from China, Ireland, and Germany,
as well as the incorporation of Mexican citizens in the ; Southwest, changed the United States.
SLAVERY IN THE UNITED STATES,
1840s AND 1850s_________________________________
Explain how the lives of slaves, slaveholders, and
abolitionists evolved in the decades before the Civil War.
NEW STRENGTH FOR AMERICAN WOMEN
Describe how the women's rights movement developed in
the United States in the 1830s and 1840s.
Living in a Nation ing Lands,

In the 1830s, 1840s, and 1850s, the United States became increasingly divided as immigran and native-born Americans flocked to industrial cities of the North, while in the South, cotton-generated wealth created a life of ease for a few based on misery for the many.
In 1848, as word of the discovery of gold in California traveled across Pacific, a young man in Canton, the capital of Guangdong provinc China, wrote, “Good many Americans speak of California....They gold very quickly, so I hear... .1 think I shall go to California next sumn Halfway around the world in a thatched roof cottage in Ireland, a mol was facing the crisis caused by the rotting potato crop and a typhus i demic that had claimed one of her daughters. She told her two remain daughters, “There’s a curse on ould [old] green Ireland and we’ll get ou it.” She saved enough money to send one girl, Tilly, to America and, as sister remembered, “She came to Philadelphia and got a place for gent housework at Mrs. Bent’s.” Tilly saved her money, sent for her sister, i eventually, they were able to bring the rest of their family from Ireland. B sisters worked as housekeepers for decades before retiring comfortably al a lifetime of scrimping and saving. The wave of immigration that brou; people of diverse ethnic backgrounds changed the face of the United Sta dramatically in the 1840s and 1850s.
During the same years, many who had lived in the United States for erations were also going through their own significant changes. Residents the newly expanded country in the Southwest became U.S. citizens as a res of the Treaty of Guadalupe Hidalgo without moving at all. Slaves and at litionists were challenging the institution of slavery with a vehemence r.
1844-1877
330
Part V Expansion, Separation, and a New Union
seen before. Slaves rebelled and ran away. Abolitionists—white and black—became more determined to end slavery, not just stop its expansion. In response, slaveholders became more defiant and defensive than ever before. When Abraham Lincoln looked at a nation that was half slave and half free” and wondered if it could survive, he was not alone. Women, who had struggled for rights since the Revolutionary Era, found new voice in the 1830s and 1840s. The Seneca Falls Women’s Rights Convention of 1848 helped to launch a new political movement for women’s rights, including the right to vote. While the right to vote was a key demand of the growing women’s right movement, other women also demanded a broader equality in all aspects of society, insisting that “whatever it is morally right for a man to do, it is morally right for a woman to do.” This chapter takes a look at the changing nature of the country’s racial and ethnic makeup and the thinking of its people, especially about slavery and women’s rights, that took place during the 1840s and 1850s.
THE CHANGING FACE OF THE AMERICAN PEOPLE IN THE
1840s AND 1850s 12.1
Analyze how immigration from China, Ireland, and Germany, as well as the incorporation of Mexican citizens in the Southwest, changed the United States.
Immigration and the nation’s expanding borders increased the population of the United States in the 1830s, 1840s, and 1850s. A nation of a little fewer than 13 million people in 1830 included 17 million people in 1840, and the United States had 23 million inhabitants in 1850. Births to native-born Americans accounted for the largest part of this increase, but many people also crossed oceans to come to the United States, especially from Ireland, Germany, and China. By 1860, the United States had about 1.5 million Irish-born inhabitants, about 1 million German-born inhabitants, and perhaps 35,000 Chinese-born inhabitants—a number that would grow dramatically in the next few years as more immigrants from China arrived, especially to build the railroads. Desperately poor people in Europe and China fled famines in their home countries. The California Gold Rush and growing U.S. industrialization beckoned with new economic opportunities. Both the push of hunger and oppression and the pull of a better future brought many to the United States.
The extraordinary increase in the area of the United States also incorporated many people who did not move at all. In 1840, the United States included 1.8 million square miles. Less than 10 years later, the country included almost 3 million square miles. Some of the land acquired through the war with Mexico was sparsely populated. However, many people—Mexican Americans in Texas, New Mexico, and California; Mormons in Utah; and the many tribes of Plains and Pueblo Indians—found themselves residing within the United States. As a result, the nature of the U.S. population shifted significantly in the late 1840s.
The United States of 1840 could accurately be described as including three major ethnic groups—Europeans mostly of English stock, Africans of different backgrounds, and American Indians of diverse tribes. Most of the Europeans and many of the Africans were Protestants. By 1850, the nation was much more ethnically diverse with many Asians (mostly Chinese), Irish, Germans, and Mexican-Americans (of mixed European and Indian ancestry). With the growth of these immigrant groups, the United States was also a more Catholic country, and with the coming of so many white immigrants, the percentage of African-Americans in the population shrank even though their actual number grew. While the governing elite was still of European Protestant background, the people who made up the country were more diverse than ever before and increasingly making their presence felt. Political and military changes traced in the previous chapter changed the borders of the United States in the 1830s and 1840s. This chapter traces the parallel changes in the lives of many people who were, by 1850, residents of the United States, whether or not they had been so 20 years before.

1831 William Lloyd Garrison launches	H
The Liberator
t
Nat Turner leads slave revolt in Virginia ?
1833 American Anti-Slavery Society founded
in Boston	r
> I
1836 American Anti-Slavery Society launches i campaign to send antislavery agents to J every state of the union
1838 Sarah Grimke's Letters on the Equality of the Sexes and the Condition of Women
1843 Henry Highland Garnet's "Address to the Slaves of the United States of America"
1845-1850 The Great Famine in Ireland
1847	Rebellion against American authorities in Taos, New Mexico
1848	Discovery of gold in California lures immigrants from around the world, including China
Women's Rights Convention at Seneca Falls, New York
1849	Harriett Tubman escapes from slavery
1851	Sojourner Truth's "Ain't I a Woman?" speech
1854 William Lloyd Garrison burns a copy of the Constitution as "source and parent of the other atrocities" of slavery in the United States
Chapter 12 Living in a Nation of Changing Lands, Changing Faces, Changing Expectations 331
Chinese Immigration Across the Pacific
Many young people in China were fascinated by the stories from across the Pacific. Lee Chew described his neighbor s return to China from the “country of the American wizards,” explaining that the man had earned enough in a short stay in the United States to build a magnificent house and invite his fellow villagers, who lived mostly on rice, to a grand feast with roast pig, chicken, and duck. Soon after, Lee was on his way to California, which became known as Gam Saan (Gold Mountain) on both sides of the Pacific.
Before 1840, only a few hundred Chinese lived in the United States, but in the 1840s and 1850s, Chinese immigrants came to California and to the then-independent Kingdom of Hawaii because of a push from China and also a pull from the United States and Hawaii. Those years were hard in China, especially in Guangdong province where most immigrants originated. Under Chinese law, it was illegal for anyone to leave China, but in desperate times, thousands did. California was one of many destinations. The Opium Wars that began in 1839 spawned great violence as British and Chinese forces battled and as violent feuds erupted between Chinese communities. One Chinese migrant remembered the results of a revolt: “We were left with nothing, and in disillusion we went to Hong Kong to sell ourselves as contract laborers.” The government of the Qing Dynasty, in Beijing, was rapidly losing control of events. It was not strong enough to suppress the civil wars or to prevent the British imposition of the opium trade on China.
In addition, the population of China had also grown from some 200 million in 1762 to 421 million in 1846. With this huge population, land became scarce, rents soared, and many peasants could not maintain their meager land holdings. For all its ancient expertise in rice cultivation, China simply did not have enough land to grow rice for 421 million people. Beginning in 1810, there were terrible famines in China, with some of the worst coming in the 1840s. In those four decades, 45 million people may have starved to death. Poor people begged for admission to soup kitchens or simply died on the doorsteps of the rich. As one immigrant from Guangdong remembered, “Sometimes we went hungry for days... .We had only salt and water to eat with the rice.” Under such conditions, a fresh start in a new place—temporary or permanent—was appealing.
Americans in Hawaii and California saw Chinese laborers as a key to solving a shortage of workers to toil on sugar plantations on Maui or to clear and cultivate land in California. The poorest Chinese peasant workers had long been known as k’u-liy literally “hard strength,” and the western term for Chinese laborers quickly came to be “coolie.” Immediately after the conclusion of the U.S. War with Mexico, a long-time presidential advisor, Aaron H. Palmer, reported to Congress that “No people in all of the East are so well adapted for clearing wild lands and raising every species of agricultural product...as the Chinese.” At first, Chinese immigrants were warmly welcomed in California. An 1852 article in the Daily Alta California noted, “Scarcely a ship arrives that does not bring an increase to this worthy integer of our population.” As a result, the Chinese population in the west grew rapidly. The initial Chinese response to the Gold Rush was relatively small: 325 immigrants from China arrived in California in 1849 and 450 more in 1850. Then the numbers grew rapidly: 2,716 in 1851 and 20,026 in 1852. By 1870, Chinese immigrants represented nine percent of the population of California (but 25 percent of the work force since most Chinese immigrants were men of working age) and larger percentages in Oregon and Washington. The Chinese also made up 29 percent of the much smaller population of Idaho and 10 percent in Montana.
Nearly 95 percent of Chinese immigrants to California before 1870 were male. They tended to see their voyage across the Pacific—a harsh 8-week trip—as a temporary separation from their families in China. United States law dating from 1790 prohibited nonwhite immigrants from achieving citizenship, and most Chinese expected to return
12 Part V Expansion, Separation, and a New Union, 1844-1877
home after a few years. In the early years, most male Chinese immigrants joined other newcomers in the search for gold. Chinese gold miners could be seen all along the rivers of California in their blue cotton blouses and wide-brimmed hats, shoveling sand into pans or rockers. These men left wives, fiancees, children, and parents behind to find ways to support them. Chinese culture dictated that a woman should stay with her family, especially her husband’s parents, while the man found the means of support. Cultural practices such as these and the cost of travel made immigration difficult for women, though Hawaii was much more welcoming of families than was the United States. Of the few Chinese women who avoided the cultural prohibitions and came to California before 1870, many were forced to work as prostitutes, either lured into the work by false promises or forced into the work by the absence of other ways to survive. In 1870,2,157 of the 3,536 Chinese women in California reported their profession as “prostitute.” Only later did other options open for Chinese women.
As more Chinese entered the gold fields, they encountered growing resistance from white miners. The cry “California for Americans” began in the gold fields and was picked up by many, including the political leaders of the state. In 1852, the California legislature adopted a foreign miners license tax of $3 per month, which was aimed specifically at the Chinese. It provided between a quarter and a half of state revenue before 1870. The tax, and the growing anti-Chinese sentiment that it represented, slowed but did not stop Chinese immigration. As the gold fields became less productive, many Chinese went to work building the railroads. Immediately after the Civil War, 12,000 Chinese laborers laid the tracks of the Central Pacific Railroad. Chinese workers also moved into agriculture, mining, fishing, and later into urban businesses. Men from China often found work at the least desirable jobs or jobs that other men considered to be “women’s work,” including starting the ubiquitous Chinese laundries that were solely a Chinese-American development. Although many individual Chinese immigrants returned home after a few years, other Chinese immigrants stayed in the United States, creating permanent communities in the American West.
between miners of European origin and Chinese miners, were severe, and most Chinese miners were driven fr°m the gold fields before long.
Chapter 12 Living in a Nation of Changing Lands, Changing Faces, Changing Expectations 333

12.1
Native-born Americans, especially those in the Know Nothing Party, reacted with fear and anger to the surge in immigration to the United States during the 1830s and 1840s. Some of the stereotypes included images of whiskey-drinking Irish and beer-drinking Germans in a country that was turning its back on its own hard drinking ways.
told to say “I know nothing.” In the 1850s, the Know-Nothings elected eight governors, more than 100 members of Congress, mayors in several major cities, and many state legislators. The Know-Nothing Party’s platform was anti-Catholic and anti-immigrant, including plans to limit Catholic political power, in part, by banning immigrants from holding office and requiring them to wait 21 years to become citizens.
Moderate reformers like Horace Mann were horrified by the burning of the Ursuline convent in Boston and the political platform of the Know-Nothings but still sought to ensure that the public school system was used to make all future citizens, especially immigrants, into good “Americans” as they understood the term. Massachusetts Governor Edward Everett told the state’s school board to “save society not with the cannon and the rifle, but with the spelling book, the grammar, and the Bible.” Nevertheless, despite hostility and their own poverty, Irish and German immigrants eventually gained political and economic power in the nation’s major cities.
The Mexican Experience in the Southwest
In 1847, as immigrants to America were trying to fit in to the new culture, Father Antonio Jose Martinez was trying to keep peace in his own community of Taos, New Mexico, where Mexican and Pueblo Indian residents had rebelled against the new American authorities, killing the American appointed governor, Charles Bent. Father Martinez tried to convince rebels that killing Americans was wrong and futile while trying to convince the Americans to give due process to insurgents. He was not fully successful in either effort, but by the end of 1847, the rebellion had ended after a group of rebels were defeated by U.S. soldiers. Like the rebels he was seeking to defend, Father Martinez had suddenly become an American citizen, no longer a citizen of the Republic of Mexico, not because he moved, but because the American border had moved hundreds of miles south and his home was now in a different country.
Under the Treaty of Guadalupe Hidalgo, territory that was home to Pueblo, Navajo, Comanche, Apache, Ute, and Cheyenne tribes as well as Spanish settlements, some dating back 300 years, was now part of the United States. While in the short
Part V Expansion, Separation, and a New Union, 1844-1877
run, the treaty had little impact on Native Americans, it almost immediately had a huge impact on people who were now Mexican Americans. The 1848 treaty gave every Mexican citizen within the new boundary of the United States the right to American citizenship or the right to keep Mexican citizenship. Mexico urged its citizens who lived to the north of the new border to move to Mexico, and some 4,000 people from New Mexico and smaller groups from Texas, California, and Arizona did move south, back in to Mexico. But most former Mexican citizens chose to stay in their homes and make new lives as citizens of the United States. Their choice turned out to be a difficult experience for them, however.
Many within the Mexican community in California were initially optimistic about their new country. Indeed, quite a few of the Mexican leaders in California, men such as Mariano Vallejo and Juan Bandini, had been hoping for an American takeover of their territory even before the War with Mexico because they saw the United States as a vibrant democracy that could replace the distant and inept Mexican administration. When the constitutional convention met in Monterey in August 1849 to prepare California for statehood, eight of the 48 voting delegates were Californios (as former Mexican citizens were called). On most matters, they did not vote as a separate bloc, assuming that their interests and those of newer American residents were the same. The huge population surge of the gold rush, however, meant that the Californios quickly became a small minority in California. By the time that statehood came in 1850, they numbered only about 13,000 out of a non-Indian population of over 100,000.
Ultimately, the sheer numbers of those newly arrived from the United States destroyed the economic base for the culture that Mexican citizens like Vallejo represented. Looking back, Vallejo described the impact of statehood and the gold rush on California when “legal thieves, clothed in the robes of the law, took from us our lands and our houses, and without the least scruple, enthroned themselves in our homes like so many powerful kings.” Vallejo’s dreams of being an equal citizen of the United States never materialized.
The vehicle by which the “legal thieves” stole the land of the Californians was established even before statehood was granted: the United States Land Commission was set up specifically to challenge the Mexican land grants on which Vallejo’s and his compatriot’s fortunes rested. Although the Treaty of Guadalupe Hidalgo had promised that all residents of these lands “shall be maintained and protected in the free enjoyment of their liberty and property,” the Land Commission treated every grant as invalid until documented and proven. The result was that many of the old families lost their land. Being of Mexican descent in California meant second-class citizenship for a long time to come.
In Texas, the Mexican, or Tejano, population was also small. Like their counterparts in California, the Tejanos did not fare well after Texas joined the United States. Juan Seguin, one of the heroes on the Texas and American side of the decisive battle of San Jacinto and mayor of San Antonio, eventually joined the exodus to Mexico. In San Antonio, the city with the largest Tejano population, the number of Tejanos elected to office, which had been high under the Republic of Texas, declined sharply once statehood was achieved. New migrants from the United States took over the political and economic control of the state.
The Mexican or Hispano elite in New Mexico fared better because American newcomers remained a minority in New Mexico throughout the 19th century. The Hispano elite were a majority in the first American territorial assembly held in 1851, and they published its proceedings in both Spanish and English. Merchants from the United States had played a significant role in New Mexico since the 1820s when the Santa Fe Trail connected St. Louis with Santa Fe.
Despite the revolts in northern New Mexico after U.S. annexation, many in the territory made their peace with the new government, and some made fortunes in the new economy. Gertrudis Barcelo achieved both fame and fortune for the elegant
Chapter 12 Living in a Nation of Changing Lands, Changing Faces, Changing Expectations 337
123
12.2
1231 i
Committees of Vigilance
Also known as vigilantes, groups of people who took on extralegal means to assert law and order.
saloon and gambling house she controlled in Santa Fe. Barcelo s saloon was a fixture for Santa Fe Trail traders from the 1820s to the 1850s and a business of sufficient success to allow her to make significant bequests to charity and leave three houses and other wealth to her heirs when she died in 1852. Barcelo was not alone in attending to her own interests whether the flag of Spain, Mexico, or the United States flew on the plaza near her establishment.
For many poor people in the Southwest, however, the transfer of authority from Mexico to the United States meant increased poverty and far less opportunity for justice in a court system that was operated in a strange language by people who were often filled with racial and ethnic prejudices. Not surprisingly, the term vigilante (meaning people who take justice into their own hands rather than rely on lawful authorities) came from the Committees of Vigilance in the California mining camps. Vigilante groups made up of private citizens took the administration of justice into their own hands when they thought that the official government authorities were absent or, too often, when they did not like their decisions. Members of these groups delivered public whippings and lynched people they did not like, whether or not a crime had been committed. California mobs lynched at least 163 Mexicans between 1848 and 1860. In southern California, a white gang known as the El Monte boys used the hysteria around a short-lived Mexican rebellion to settle old scores and attack Mexican families regardless of whether they had been involved in the rebellion. Similar outrages happened across the West. Still, in Texas, New Mexico, and Arizona, the Latino presence remained strong.
The Mexican American community fought back as it could. One Californio, Joaquin Murrieta, became a California legend—feared in the white community, honored in the Mexican community—because of his vengeance on those who had stolen his gold claim, raped his wife Rosa, and hung his brother. Murrieta stole horses and gold and killed those who had raped and murdered his loved ones before he, in turn, was discovered and killed by the California Rangers in 1853. Kangaroo courts (unauthorized and obviously biased courts) and lynchings were all too common within and across all ethnic lines as traditional community relationships were destroyed by distance and greed.
Quick Review How did native-born Americans react to immigrants in the 1840s and 1850s? How did immigrants react to their new American surroundings?
12.2
SLAVERY IN THE UNITED STATES,
1840s AND 1850s__________________________________ Explain how the lives of slaves, slaveholders, and abolitionists evolved in the decades before the Civil War.
The institution of slavery had existed in the United States from the nation’s beginning, but slavery, which had never been a static institution, changed significantly yet again after 1820 (see Chapter 9). For enslaved people and those who claimed to own them, life in a slave society was a different experience at different points in history. Slavery was always harsh and dehumanizing, but it was harsh in different ways at different times.
After the end of the War of 1812, Southern planters experienced new economic benefits from slavery, benefits that grew with each decade as the world’s cotton market exploded and slave labor, as well as developments in technology and transportation, made it possible and profitable for American slave-grown cotton to satisfy the market. Since most cotton was produced by slave labor, the new demand for cotton greatly increased the value of individual slaves. Thus, just as slavery was dying out in the North—for both economic and ethical reasons—the new cotton economy of the South made slavery far more profitable than ever before. The result
38 Part V Expansion, Separation, and a New Union, 1844-1877
was a kind of industrialized agriculture that by the 1840s produced 60 percent of the world s cotton and made the South, and particularly some elite Southerners, extremely wealthy. With the increase in profits and wealth, many slaveholders developed what they claimed was a new ethical rationale for slavery and challenged their critics head on (see Map 12-2).
Slaves and Slave Masters
As cotton prices kept increasing in the 1830s, and especially in the 1840s and 1850s, close to a million slaves were moved from the coast, where many had cultivated tobacco, indigo, and other crops, to new cotton states, where they had to learn the different and difficult work of tending cotton. Yet even as slavery was becoming more profitable, Northern public opinion was turning against it. More people were joining what had been a small group of abolitionists in viewing human bondage as a terrible wrong and a stain on the honor of a nation dedicated to human freedom. With slavery disappearing in the North, Northern abolitionists got an increasingly responsive hearing from their neighbors. Other Northerners who had fewer moral qualms about slavery saw slaves as competitors for scarce jobs, and they too joined the opposition to slavery. In 1840, antislavery forces created the Liberty Party and nominated James G. Birney for president, and in 1848, the short-lived antislavery Free Soil Party nominated former President Martin Van Buren as its candidate. Neither party campaigned for outright abolition, only for an end to extending slavery to new areas of the country. Nor did either party win any electoral votes, though
12.1
12.2
12.3
Slavery. In the 30 years before the Civil War, slavery became strongest in the cotton ’ll states of the Deen South For an individual slave, the further north one was, the better one's chances ere to connect to the Underground Railroad, but slaves from every part of the South made their way north > freedom.
Chapter 12 Living in a Nation of Changing Lands, Changing Faces, Changing Expectations 339
.j——— 12.1
12.2
123
Van Buren did win some 10 percent of the popular vote in 1848. Nevertheless, abolitionist rhetoric and political muscle were frightening an increasingly defensive slaveholding South.
Slaveholders and their political and intellectual allies responded to both the increased profit and the increased criticism. In the past, most slaveholders, including all of those from the South who attended the Constitutional Convention, had defended slavery as a “necessary evil.” Somehow, they argued, slavery had become an economic and social necessity that was, at best, unfortunate. However, after 1830, a new generation of slaveholders began to describe slavery as a positive good, an institution that Christianized “heathen” Africans while providing them with food, shelter, and an ordered life. These new defenders of slavery also contrasted it with work in Northern factories and noted that slaves, unlike factory workers, were not fired when work got slow or they grew old, but rather, were provided for throughout their lives. Southern apologists also became increasingly angry with Northern critics of slavery.
One example of the new proslavery ideology was the changing views of Roger B. Taney, who served as Chief Justice of the United States from 1836 to 1864. As a young attorney in Maryland in 1819, Taney defended a Methodist preacher, Jacob Gruber, who had warned it was inevitable that slaves would “rise up and kill your children, their oppressors....” When Maryland charged Gruber with breaking the peace and inciting rebellion, Taney asserted Gruber’s legal right to free speech and said that slavery was, “a blot on our national character, and every real lover of freedom, confidently hopes that it will be .. .wiped away.”
In 1857, however, almost 40 years after the Gruber trial and 20 years after Taney’s appointment to lead the Supreme Court, he wrote in reference to the Dred Scott decision (see Chapter 13) that blacks were “altogether unfit to associate with the white race, either in social or political relations; and so far inferior, that they had no rights which the white man was bound to respect.” The Chief Justice, like many other Southerners, had come to see slavery as simply the inevitable result of black inferiority. Taney was far from alone.
As every able-bodied slave and every new-born slave child became more valuable from 1800 to the outbreak of the Civil War in 1861, any thought of abolishing slavery disappeared among slaveholders. After 1830, Southern states also made it more difficult to set any slaves free and for free blacks to stay in the South.
The apologists for slavery never tired of pointing out the difference between the supposedly contented life of Southern slaves and the harsh lives of factory workers in the Northern states and Great Britain.
►40 Part V Expansion, Separation, and a New Union, 1844-1877

LU
American Voices
Edmund Ruffin, Slavery and Free Labor Described and Compared, ca. 1860
pdmund Ruffin (1794-1865) was a Southern agronomist who in Ethe 1850s turned from improving the productivity of Southern soil to defending Southern slavery. He published several proslavery articles and pamphlets (this one probably in 1860 or 1861), advocated succession of the Southern states after Lincoln's election, and fought in the first battles of the Civil War. At the end of the Civil War, he committed suicide rather than live under what he called "Yankee rule."
The privilege of the English laborer to choose his employment and his master, even when such choice legally exists, does not prevent his service being truly slavery. For he has no choice but to toil incessantly for wages barely affording a scant and wretched support, or to starve—and no change of pursuit, or of service, can make that condition better....[,]n comparison to the English pauper, and even to his earlier condition as the over-worked, under-fed and suffering hireling laborer, supporting a family on regular wages, the general condition of our negro slaves is one of comfort, ease and happiness....
Until recent investigation and discussion had elicited more truth, it had been claimed by the people of the North and by all the opposers of slavery, and even was generally admitted by the people of the Southern States, that the free-labour States of New England were greatly superior to the old Southern States in obtaining the fruits of industry and capita,... .Southern capita, and industry were almost exclusively devoted to agriculture—northern capital was
much more vested in commerce and manufactures, which are deemed much more profitable than agricultural investments....It has also been especially and loudly claimed, for and by the people of the New England States... that such difference was the necessary result of the blighting and demoralizing effects of negro slavery in the South, and of its absence in the North....
Instead of our labors and investments in slave-labor being less profitable than northern operations, it is manifest that the slaveholding States are much richer than the free States, and to make this result the more striking, even if counting every slave as if free, and supposing the whole property to be divided among all the population, (slaves included,) still on this general average, the individual share of every one, bond or free, would be considerably larger than in the free States.
Source: Edmund Ruffin, "Slavery and Free Labor, Described and Compared," Library of Congress, American memory, From Slavery to Freedom: the African-American Pamphlet Collection, 1824-1909, http://memory.loc.gov.
Thinking Critically
1.	Documentary Analysis
According to Ruffin, in what ways was the life of a poor white worker worse than that of a black slave in the South?
2.	Historical Interpretation
In what ways did Ruffin argue slavery was a "positive good"?
12,1
The growing value of individual slaves also led—ironically—to somewhat better treatment for them. A slave life was now of too much economic value to be lost easily.
The same states that made it difficult to free slaves passed new laws against their murder or mistreatment. In many instances, the nutrition and medical care provided for slaves also improved.
A healthy, relatively well-fed slave could work harder than a sickly or starving slave.
A pregnant slave could produce a valuable new slave who could, in time, also work or be sold. However, a slave who died of mistreatment was a lost investment. There is evidence that the actual treatment of slaves, while never approaching anything that could be called humane, did improve throughout the 19th century. Where multiple slave families had been crammed into cramped quarters, more plantation owners built—or had their slaves build—individual family cabins with board floors instead of dirt. More meat was added to slave diets, and slaves were allowed to grow their own vegetable gardens as well as hunt and fish to supplement their diet. Slave hours of work were controlled by custom and unspoken agreement; most slaves had Sunday as a day of rest, and except in harvest time, few were expected to work after dark. A new generation of slave children was allowed to play relatively freely until put to work at age 10 to 12. Former slave Harriet Jacobs wrote, “I was born a slave; but I never knew it till six years of happy childhood has passed away.” For defenders of slavery like Edmund Ruffin, such improvements in the lives of slaves became proof that slave life was better than the lives of some Northern or European workers and peasants.
Chapter 12 Living in a Nation of Changing Lands, Changing Faces, Changing Expectations 341
Slave quarters, like these shown on a South Carolina plantation, provided better living conditions than what was provided to previous generations of slaves, though hardly anything that could be called comfortable. The houses built close together also fostered a sense of community life that helped enslaved people survive.
The slave population of the United States grew from 1.5 million slaves in 1820 to 4 million slaves in 1860. After 1808, it was illegal and difficult to bring new slaves into the country, so much of this growth reflected reproduction among existing slaves. Many saw this growth as a sign of the new and better treatment that slaves were receiving. In the United States slaves were surviving, reproducing, and providing significant profits to others.
Although some improvements in slave life occurred, there were limits to those developments. The slave cabins were hot and stuffy in summer and inflammable in winter. The meals were monotonous. The work for adults was backbreaking, being called out to work at 4:00 or 5:00 a.m., and then working in hot fields, hoeing or picking cotton, with little break until sunset. Slaves were whipped routinely for falling behind in their work or for infractions of the plantation rules. While some Southern reformers talked of honoring slave marriages, the separation of spouses continued without interruption. Slave women could not protect their own bodies. Harriet Jacobs also remembered that once she came of age, “It was deemed a crime in her to wish to be virtuous.” And she spent considerable time avoiding the constant advances of the owner of her plantation and the jealous anger of his wife. Many slave women were not so fortunate, and the rape of slave women by white men was a commonly acknowledged reality. Mary Boykin Chestnut, wife of a plantation owner, described the treatment of slave women as a “monstrous system,” and noted that “Any lady is ready to tell you who is the father of all the mulatto children in everybody’s household but her own. Those, she seems to think, drop from the clouds.” Even laws that were being passed against murdering a slave could be enforced only if there was a white witness because slaves were not allowed to testify in court. Most of all, nothing could change the fact that slavery was still slavery. No amount of reform or improvement could change that reality.
In the midst of appalling conditions, slaves created lives for themselves and developed the psychological strength to withstand the horrors they faced. Historians have argued whether slave life was better on the small family farms that included only a few slaves or on large plantations with many. In reality, it probably depended on the conditions and the owner of an individual farm or plantation. Slaves on small farms
342 Part V Expansion, Separation, and a New Union, 1844-1877
V
American Voices
Susan Merritt, Memories of Slavery in the 1850s
1X1
12.2
/h the late 1930s, Susan Merritt was interviewed near Marshall, Texas, not far from where she had once been a slave, by historians working for the Federal Writers' Project. She estimated herself to be 87years old but still remembered slavery all too well.
I couldn't tell how old I is, but does you think I'se ever forget them slave days?...I'se born right down in Rusk County [Texas], not a long way from Henderson, and Massa Andrew Watt am my owner. My pappy, Hob Rollins, he come from North Carolina and belonged to Dave Blakely and Mammy come from Mississippi. Mammy have eleven of us chillen, but four dies when they babies. Albert, Hob, John, Emma, Anna, Lula, and me lives to be grown and married.
Massa Watt lived in a big log house what set on a hill so you could see it round for miles, and us lived over in the field in little log huts, all huddled along together. They have homemade beds nailed to the wall and baling sack mattresses, and us call them bunks. Us never had no money but plenty clothes and grub, and wear the same clothes all the year'round. Massa Watt made our shoes for winter hisself. He made furniture and saddles and harness, and run a grist mill and a whiskey still there on the place. That man had everything.
The hands was woke with the bit bell...They was in that field before day and stay till dusk dark. They work up till Saturday night and then washes their clothes, and sometimes they gets through and has time for the party and plays ring plays....
When the hands come in from the field at dusk dark, they has to tote water from the spring and cook and eat; and be in bed when that old bell rings at nine o'clock. About dusk they calls
the chillen and gives 'em a piece of corn pone about the size my hand and a tin cup milk and puts them to bed. But the growed folks et fat pork and greens and beans and such like and have plenty milk. Every Sunday Massa give 'em some flour and butter and a chicken. Lots...caught a good cowhiding for slippin' round and stealin' a chicken 'fore Sunday. Massa Watt didn't have no overseer...He carry a long whip round the neck and I's seed him tie [slaves] to a tree and cowhide'em till the blood run down onto the ground....
Lots of times Massa Watt give us a pass to go over to George Petro's place or Dick Gregg's place. Massa Petro run a slave market and he have big, high scaffold with steps where he sells slaves. They was stripped off to the waist to show their strength.
Our white folks have a church and a place for us in the back. Sometimes at night us gather'round the fireplace and pray and sing and cry, but us darn't 'low our white folks know it. Thank the Lord us can worship where we wants nowadays.
Source: Susan Merritt, interview, in Norman R. Yetman, editor, Voices From Slavery: WO Authentic Slave Narratives (Mineola, NY: Dover Publications, 2000), pp. 224-226.
Thinking Critically
1.	Documentary Analysis
On what aspects of slavery did Merritt focus? How would you characterize her relationship with her master?
2.	Comparison
How might Merritt's life have compared to that of poor Southern whites? How were they similar? How were they different?
12.3
worked alongside the owners and often shared the same meals. But if the owner was
cruel, there was little respite from the suffering, and it was hard to maintain connec-
tions with other slaves. If the owner ran short of funds, and many did, it was all too
easy to cut the food and clothing of the slaves. Working conditions on a large planta-
tion with several hundred slaves could be much harsher, but slaves had more opportu-
nity to create a community and cultural identity of their own, and often, the routines
and expectations were more regularized.
On large plantations, the work life of slaves was usually controlled by an overseer, often a poor white whom the plantation owner hired to get as much work—and profit—from the slaves as possible. Slaves and overseers had to develop a working relationship of sorts, however tense it might be. An overseer who was too lax would not produce the profits an owner expected; one who was too cruel could also be unproductive. The owner of one of Alabama’s larger plantations, A. H. Arrington, wrote in his diary, “I have this day discharged my overseer, Mr. Brewer. I found so much dissatisfaction amongst the negroes that I placed under his charge that I could not feel satisfied to continue him in my employment.” Such decisions were not uncommon. While overseers had total legal control over the slaves, slaves also knew that for any work to get done at all, an accommodation had to be reached
Chapter 12 Living in a Nation of Changing Lands, Changing Faces, Changing Expectations 343
123
12.2
123
between their white masters and themselves. Slaves knew how to make the most of what power they had. It was risky to complain about an overseer, but it was less risky to feign illness, even pregnancy, and more slaves did that. Some slaves feigned clumsiness and broke tools that then had to be repaired; others pretended laziness and attempted to slow the pace of work. Resistance took many ingenious forms, and it helped slaves survive.
Especially on larger plantations, slave families were also essential to the emotional, and often physical, survival of their members. While slaves were not allowed legally recognized marriages, many slave partnerships lasted for a long time while others were disrupted by the sale of one partner or the tensions that drive people apart in any circumstance. Slave parents, especially mothers, had a difficult task, loving children while also preparing them for the rigors of slavery. Many former slaves recalled parents being especially tough in ways that, as adults, they recognized as the most loving thing slave parents could do. After all, to allow a slave child to grow to adulthood without proper preparation for a world in which submission (at least outward signs of submission) was key to survival was to give that child a death sentence. Some slave mothers simply could not endure the thought of children they loved being raised to be slaves. One former slave told the story of a mother who, after seeing three children sold away from her, gave her fourth child “something out of a bottle” and soon it was dead: “’Couse didn’t nobody tell on her or he’d [the owner] of beat her nearly to death.”
Resisting Slavery
Enslaved people found many different ways to resist their enslavement. For those with no other options, they could pretend illness, laziness, or stupidity to resist their circumstances. Slave labor could be notoriously slow when slaves actively tried to subvert the work of a plantation, doing just enough work to avoid punishment. But passive resistance was not the only kind of resistance. Newspaper advertisements for runaway slaves give solid evidence that thousands and thousands of slaves tried to run away from the places where they were held. While many runaways were caught, many tried again and again to find shelter in free states of the North or in Canada, and quite a few succeeded. And finally, in every generation, there were full-scale slave revolts, some small and some large, in which enslaved people attacked their oppressors and sought to claim their freedom.
RUNAWAY SLAVES
In 1837, Joseph Taper and his family ran away from their lives as slaves on a Virginia plantation. It was a dangerous decision to do so. The chances of being caught were great and the punishments harsh—perhaps flogging, perhaps having the family separated and sold into the Deep South, farther from the opportunity for a second escape, perhaps being killed. At first, the Tapers made their way to Pennsylvania where Joseph Taper found work. But when he read the offer of a reward for his return, the family moved further north and eventually left the United States for Canada in 1839. Britain had abolished slavery in all its dominions in 1833, making it illegal for slave hunters to seek former slaves there. In November 1840, a year after their arrival in Canada, Joseph Taper wrote of his journey “that I am in a land of liberty, in good health... .My wife and self are sitting by a good comfortable fire happy, knowing that there are none to molest or make afraid.”
As happy as the Taper story was, the long and dangerous journey north was frightening for any slave who sought to escape. Harriet Jacobs escaped from slavery by boat in 1843. She remembered that even after she was safely on the boat,
“We were filled with constant apprehensions that the constables would come on board. Neither could I feel quite at ease with the captain...might he not be tempted to make more money by giving us up to those who claimed us as property?”
44 Part V Expansion, Separation, and a New Union, 1844-1877
But she was relieved when, the next morning I was on deck as soon as the day dawned...for the first time in our lives, on free soil.” Nevertheless, though she had successfully escaped from slavery, Jacobs remembered the next days as difficult ones. She was lonely, having left dear ties behind us; ties cruelly sundered by the demon Slavery.”
Ihe Taper and Jacobs stories are unusual. Most slaves who ran away were quickly caught. The route to freedom in the North was known as the Underground Railroad, a highly secret system of safe havens and supporters that guided slaves toward a new, free life. It was a symbol for many but a reality for only a few. Nevertheless, every year more and more slaves were aided by “conductors” who were either former slaves who had run away or free people, black and white, who hated slavery and were willing to take enormous risks to help new people on the road to freedom. Conductors on the Underground Railroad knew the hidden paths and the safe houses where sympathetic owners were willing to hide runaway slaves as they journeyed ever further north, either to cities in the United States or, increasingly, out of the United States to Canada. Both Taper and Jacobs were among the few slaves who were literate, which helped them elude the authorities and prosper. But they were not nearly so unusual in deciding to run away from slavery.
Advertisements that appeared in Southern newspapers in the 19th century offered considerable detail about runaway slaves. One 1850 issue of the New Orleans Daily Picayune reported the offer of rewards for Jack, Sam, Zip or Harry, Edward, Daniel, Henrietta, Mary Mackendish, William, and Tom. By 1860, some 50,000 slaves ran away every year out of a total slave population of 4 million who were held by 385,000 slave owners, which meant that one in seven slaveholders could expect someone to run away each year.
Runaway slaves became abolitionists and, later, national leaders during Reconstruction. Henry Highland Garnet, whose adult writing inspired fear in the hearts of many slaveholders, was born a slave in Maryland. While he was a child, his
12,1
12.2
Underground Railroad
Support system set up by antislavery groups in the upper South and the North to assist fugitive slaves in escaping the South.
12 J
By far the most famous conductor on the Underground the perhaps 300 people she led north out of slavery, ran again and again to lead others to freedom.
Railroad, Harriet Tubman, shown here with a few of away from slavery and then returned to the South
i
Chapter 12 Living in a
Nation of Changing Lands, Changing Faces, Changing Expectations 345
L-
123
12,2
123
family set out on the pretext of going to the funeral of a slave on a nearby plantation but went instead to the home of a Quaker Underground Railroad conductor in Delaware who started them on the road to freedom in New York City where each member of the family took a new name in a ceremony of baptism to Liberty.
Frederick Douglass was born a slave in Maryland around 1817. Douglass remembered visits from his mother who lived on another plantation 12 miles away and made the journey on foot at night before returning for the next day’s work: “She was a field hand, and a whipping is the penalty for not being in the field at sunrise.. .1 do not recollect of ever seeing my mother by the light of day.”
Douglass made his first attempt to run away in 1835 but was caught and sent to a former master in Baltimore. Instead of giving in to the fear of capture, Douglass tried again 3 years later and succeeded in running away to freedom in New York in 1838.
Harriet Tubman became famous as a slave who not only ran away but also returned to the South and guided between 200 and 300 others along the Underground Railroad to freedom. By most reckonings, she was responsible for freeing more slaves than any other person in the institution’s long history.
Tubman was born about 1820. Two of her older sisters were sold to a plantation farther south, and Tubman never shook her own fears of a similar fate. She almost died at the age of 14 from a severe head injury when an overseer threw a 2-pound weight at another slave but hit Tubman instead. In 1844, she married John Tubman, a free black who lived nearby. (Marriages of slaves and free blacks were uncommon, but not unknown.) The free husband thought his wife worried too much about being a slave. In 1849, Tubman made her way north to Philadelphia without her husband or other help and found work as a domestic. She recalled, “I was free; but there was no one to welcome me to the land of freedom.” Everyone she knew and cared for was “down in the old cabin quarters, with the old folks and my brothers and sisters.”
THINKING HISTORICALLY
Understanding Advertisements for Runaway Slaves
n December 22, 1848, the following advertisement appeared in the Baltimore Sun:
FIFTY DOLLARS
REWARD—Ran away from the subscriber, on the 10th inst [this month], a MAN named Celus, calls himself Celus Dorsey, about 23 years old, slender made, about 5 feet, 7 or 8 inches high, dark complexion, rather thick lip; he has a large scar on one of his hands from a burn. It is probable he is lurking about Baltimore. I will give the above reward if taken out of the State, and $30 if taken in the State, and secured so I get him again. SAML C. HUNT,
10 miles from Baltimore, on Baltimore and Susquehanna Railroad Historians have found hundreds of similar advertisements in newspapers in slaveholding states from the American Revolution to the middle of the Civil War. Each advertisement tells a small part of the story of someone who had the opportunity and
the courage to run away from slavery and the slaveholder's determination to see him or her returned.
Source: Baltimore Sun, December 22,1848.
Thinking Critically
1.	Contextualization
What does Hunt's location tell us? What opportunity would a slave living further from a city have to run away? Why might Hunt have thought that Dorsey was "lurking around Baltimore"? Was there something about a city, even in a slaveholding state, that might attract a slave?
2.	Historical Interpretation
Why were slaveholders so willing to advertise about runaway slaves and let others know that enslaved people were running away as often as the advertisements imply? What might be lost and what might be gained for a slave owner by posting such advertisements?
w
346 Part V Expansion, Separation, and a New Union, 1844-1877
Tubman decided that the best solution was to bring the rest of her family to freedom, though she never rejoined her free husband.
Having successfully brought most of her family north, Tubman developed a pattern that she would continue until the Civil War. She worked for a while, raised some money, and then made a trip south to free a group of slaves. Between 1850 and 1861, Tubman made trip after trip, helping slaves escape and taking them north. As the full impact of the 1850 Fugitive Slave Law took effect, she did not stop in Pennsylvania but accompanied each group to Canada. As Tubman’s fame grew, it earned her the support of Northern abolitionists and the hatred of many slaveholders. The reward for her capture grew steadily, but she kept returning south to free more people. Northern abolitionists supported her work, and in 1859, the Unitarian minister Thomas Wentworth Higginson took up a collection at the Massachusetts Anti-Slavery Society so that Tubman could “resume the practice of her profession!”
REBELS AND SLAVE REVOLTS
Although slaveholders typically claimed that their slaves were happy and content, the number of slaves who ran away undermined those claims. On some level, slaveholders were aware of the reality because, as much as they sought to catch runaway slaves, they most intensely feared the possibility of a slave revolt. Slave revolts were relatively rare, but they did happen. Historians have documented over 200 slave revolts in the United States in the 60 years before the Civil War. Some were little more than small-scale events on a single plantation; others were much larger. On August 30, 1800, Gabriel Prosser led over 1,000 slaves in a planned attack on Richmond, Virginia (see Chapter 7). In 1810, plans for a revolt were discovered in Lexington, Kentucky. In 1811, 400 slaves revolted in New Orleans. And in 1815, a white man named George Boxley attempted to lead a slave revolt in Virginia. In 1822, Denmark Vesey and his supporters planned to burn the military and financial center of Charleston, South Carolina, murder the white residents, and then seize the city’s caches of weapons and gold. They would then set sail for a new life of freedom in Haiti. Vesey, who had purchased his own freedom in 1800, had been plotting his revolt for years. He led a Bible class in Charlestown for the African Methodist Episcopal Church, and he spoke of the biblical stories of moving from slavery to freedom with the passion of a latter-day
Moses. He also spoke fluent French and was clearly influenced by the success of the Haitian slave revolt. No one really knows how close Vesey came to success before his plot was betrayed. Some estimated that his co-conspirators numbered in the thousands, making it one of the largest slave revolts. In stories whispered behind closed doors,
Vesey and his followers represented the ultimate terror to the white community.
In 1831, Nat Turner led a revolt that was more successful than Vesey’s. Terror spread throughout the South when Turner s forces killed over 60 slave-owning whites before the revolt was defeated by state and federal troops. Over 100 slaves were killed in the fighting or executed after capture. Turner himself was captured and interviewed bY his white, court-appointed attorney, Thomas Gray, before he was executed. Gray subsequently published an account of the conversation as The Confessions of Nat Turner.
Turner reported having been a religious man from his earliest years. His prayers and meditations convinced him of three things: “that I was ordained for some great purpose in the hands of the Almighty,” that the Almighty’s purpose included freedom for American slaves, and that “the great day of judgment was at hand.”
It was some time after the revolt before Nat Turner was captured.
In spite of his capture, his actions had already sent fear through the slaveholding South.
Chapter 12 Living in a Nation of Changing Lands, Changing Faces, Changing Expectations 347
12.1
12.2
123
In the aftermath of the Turner revolt, Southern fears increased, and repressive laws were passed across the South, including laws making it illegal to teach a slave to read and write to prevent others like Turner from studying the Bible and other information on their own. In the slave quarters, however, Turner became a legend, and stories of his exploits were told and retold. Despite the consequences, the revolts continued.
Some Northern blacks also called for slave uprisings. David Walker, who was born free in Ohio, published his Appeal to the Colored Citizens of the World in Boston in 1829. Walker’s goal was “To awaken in the breasts of my afflicted, degraded and slumbering brethren, a spirit of inquiry and investigation respecting our miseries and wretchedness in this Republican Land of Liberty!!!!!!” Walker also asked white Americans, will God “let the oppressors rest comfortably and happy always?” But the primary audience for Walker’s Appeal was among his fellow African-Americans to whom he said, “The whites want slaves, and want us for their slaves, but some of them will curse the day they ever saw us.”
In his 1843 “Address to the Slaves of the United States of America,” Henry Highland Garnet also did not mince words. He said to the slaves of the South,
Brethren, arise, arise! Strike for your lives and liberties. Now is the day and the hour....Let your motto be resistance! Resistance! RESISTANCE!
For Garnet and Walker, the time was long past for aiding individual escapes or agitating for a constitutional end to slavery; they were ready for direct action.
The Liberator
A newspaper dedicated to the antislavery cause launched by William Lloyd Garrison in 1831.
American Anti-Slavery Society
Founded in Boston in 1833, the society was dedicated to the abolition of slavery.
White Abolitionists
In the first issue of his newspaper The Liberator, published in 1831, William Lloyd Garrison declared, “I am in earnest—I will not equivocate—I will not excuse—I will not retreat a single inch. -AND I WILL BE HEARD.” Over the next 35 years until the passage of the Thirteenth Amendment ending slavery in the United States in 1865, Garrison never backed down. He was a loner who alienated most people who tried to work with him. Nevertheless, in 1833 he was one of the key members in launching the American Anti-Slavery Society in Boston, which, like The Liberator, was committed to the total abolition of slavery everywhere in the United States, and for a third of a century, he kept the issue of slavery in front of a white society that often did not want to hear about it. Garrison’s role in the abolitionist movement can hardly be overstated.
In the 1830s, Garrison was already a believer in the “free labor” doctrine that the Republican Party would adopt in the 1850s. He contrasted Northern free labor, which provided opportunities for anyone to gain the economic independence so important to freedom, and Southern slavery, which created a rigid hierarchy of wealthy elites, poor whites, and enslaved blacks.
Garrison was not a church member, but he modeled himself on the image of an Old Testament prophet, and he saw the considerable abuse that was heaped on him over many years as proof of his own righteousness. Other abolitionists, white and black, also were subject to considerable abuse. In 1835, Garrison himself was almost lynched in Boston. In New York City, Lewis and Arthur Tappan, highly successful merchants, were also shunned for their abolitionist activity. And in Alton, Illinois, on the Mississippi River opposite the slaveholding state of Missouri, Elijah Lovejoy was killed by a mob in 1837 after he had set up a small printing press to publish antislavery literature. Despite his status as a loner, Garrison did befriend other abolitionists and runaway slaves. He helped launch Frederick Douglass on his remarkable career as an abolitionist leader, though the two differed on many issues.
On the fourth of July in 1854, at a sunny afternoon picnic of the Massachusetts Anti-Slavery Society in Framingham, Massachusetts, Garrison burned a copy of the
348 Part V Expansion, Separation, and a New Union, 1844-1877
hated Fugitive Slave Act of 1850 that required all citizens to help return escaped slaves to those who claimed them. As it burned, Garrison shouted, And let all the people say, Amen. It was not a surprising action at an antislavery rally, but when the crowd roared its response, Garrison also held up a copy of the United States Constitution—a sacred document to many and called it the source and parent of the other atrocities” because of its clauses that protected slavery and set it on fire, too. And again the crowd responded to his call for an “Amen.” For all his radicalism, Garrison was also a pacifist. He always insisted that his goal was “to accomplish the great work of national redemption through the agency of moral power,” not force. While he argued that events like Nat Turner’s bloody rebellion were inevitable, he could never condone violence, even the violence of the Civil War, to end slavery.
Garrison may have crusaded independently, but many other white Americans were joining forces as abolitionists in the 1830s and 1840s, and especially after the passage of the Fugitive Slave Act in 1850. What came to be known as “Oberlin abolitionism” emerged from the revivals that Charles Grandison Finney led in upstate New York in the 1820s. In May 1836, the American Anti-Slavery Society began a campaign to evangelize the nation for abolitionism. What was needed, the society’s leaders decided, were antislavery revivalists who modeled their activities on the work of religious revivalists. Funds would be raised to send out at least 70 organizers to preach the sin of slavery and the need for the repentance of abolitionism. Theodore Dwight Weld, who had begun his career working with Finney, was commissioned to choose the agents.
Weld turned to his old classmates from theology school, especially now that many of them were seeking their first appointments as ministers. Eventually, 30 of the 54 students who had been part of Weld’s class at Lane Seminary in the early 1830s became antislavery agents. They carried revivalism and activism to all the free states of the union.
In the 1840s and 1850s, 12 to 15 percent of all Americans were slaves like Susan Merritt or former slaves like John Taper. Most Americans held some opinion about the condition of slaves, and increasingly, activists on both sides of the issue were taking strong stands. Some, including Edmund Ruffin, were defenders of slavery; others such as William Lloyd Garrison, David Walker, and Sarah Grimke were its opponents. But almost no Americans were completely free of economic ties to slavery or were able to ignore its impact on American culture and politics. Slaves produced cotton, which clothed most Americans and fueled the nation’s economy. By the 1850s, the issue of slavery also dominated American politics. Whatever one s place in society and one’s point of view, slavery was a central issue and topic of debate. It would not go away.
0 Quick Review In what different ways did enslaved people and their free allies, white and black, resist the institution of slavery and help individuals escape from it? How did apologists for slavery respond to the growing criticism of the institution that emerged in the 1830s and 1840s? What do the numbers of slaves who ran away say about the defense of slavery?
Oflll not oxcf se! M
| lam in earnest! b
This banner announced the publication of a new journal, The Liberator, dedicated entirely to the complete abolition of slavery in all parts of the United States.
Chapter 12 Living in a Nation of Changing Lands, Changing Faces, Changing Expectations 349
12.1
NEW STRENGTH FOR AMERICAN WOMEN___________________________
Describe how the women's rights movement developed in the United States in the 1830s and 1840s.
123
122
123
Declaration of Sentiments and Resolutions
The resolutions passed at the Woman's Rights Convention at Seneca Falls in 1848 calling for full equality, including the right to vote, for women.
On July 20, 1848, 68 women and 32 men signed a Declaration of Sentiments and Resolutions at the end of their 2-day meeting in Seneca Falls, New York. The document—which followed the form of the Declaration of Independence—is often viewed as the opening statement of the womens rights movement in the United States. This declaration stated,
We hold these truths to be self-evident; that all men and women are created equal; that they are endowed by their Creator with certain inalienable rights; that among these are life, liberty, and the pursuit of happiness.
Then, just as Jefferson listed grievances against George III, those who gathered in upstate New York offered their grievances against the male-dominated culture in which they lived. Their document made history and achieved far more recognition than its authors ever imagined. But the Seneca Falls convention would likely not have happened without the work of others who began to question women’s roles in the decades before the convention, and the work of the those at the convention still depended on the continued efforts of supporters to fight for change.
New Ideas about Women's Rights
The 1848 convention of women at Seneca Falls was not the first time women in the United States began to lobby for their rights. Although hardly a feminist in todays terms, Abigail Adams had reminded her husband, John, that the framers of a new government in 1776 should “remember the ladies.” In 1838, the abolitionist and feminist Sarah Grimke published Letters on the Equality of the Sexes and the Condition of Women, portions of which she first published in Garrisons The Liberator and which she originally addressed to the Boston Female Anti-Slavery Society. In the 1838 book she argued that in the present “condition of women in my own country,” well-off women were “taught to regard marriage as the one thing needful, the only avenue to distinction,” while “in those employments which are peculiar to women, their time is estimated at only half the value of that of men.” Grimke also argued that men suffered from the assumption that they alone needed to support families while she believed they would ultimately find greater happiness in seeing women “as their equal” even if that view did not come easily to them.
Few women symbolized the strong links between feminism and abolitionism as did Sarah and Angelina Grimke, sisters from South Carolina. Born to a prosperous South Carolina slaveholding family, both women broke with their family over the issue of slavery. By 1836, the sisters had become the first female representatives of the American Anti-Slavery Society, based in New York City. They had also become ardent feminists. In 1838, Angelina married another abolitionist, Theodore Dwight Weld. For most of the rest of their lives, Weld and the two sisters lived together and campaigned to end slavery, racism, and sexism in society.
Sarah Grimke wrote Letters on the Equality of the Sexes after she and her sister were criticized for giving public lectures on the antislavery cause. The ministers and others who criticized the sisters might have been sympathetic to the women’s antislavery views, but they thought women had no place speaking in public to a group that included women and men. Sarah had no intention of backing down on either topic. She began her Letters, “Here I plant myself. God created us equal:” Then, focusing on women’s rights, she continued:
All history attests that man has subjected woman to his will, used her as a means to promote his selfish gratification, to minister to his sensual pleasures, to be instrumental in promoting his comfort; but never has he desired
350 PartV Expansion, Separation, and a New Union, 1844-1877
to elevate her to that rank she was created to till. He has done all he could to debase and enslave her mind; and now he looks triumphantly on the ruin he has wrought, and says, the being he has thus deeply injured is his inferior....
To me it is perfectly clear that WHATEVER IT IS MORALLY RIGHT FOR A MAN TO DO, IT IS MORALLY RIGHT FOR A WOMAN TO DO... she is clothed by her Maker with the same rights, and.. .the same duties.
Grimke’s Letters were in circulation a decade before the meeting at Seneca Falls, but that gathering brought the cause of women’s rights to a much larger audience. Because it brought together such powerful women as Elizabeth Cady Stanton, Lucretia Mott, and many others—soon joined by others including Susan B. Anthony and Matilda Gage—Seneca Falls provided the foundation for a half-century long campaign for women’s rights and specifically women’s suffrage.
The Seneca Falls Convention Shapes a Movement
Elizabeth Cady Stanton and Lucretia Mott were the organizers of the 1848 Seneca Falls Women's Rights Convention that brought the cause of women’s rights to the attention of many. Stanton and her family had come to rural Seneca Falls, New York, only the previous year. They missed life in their former home in Boston but thought Seneca Falls would provide a rest. However, Elizabeth found life in Seneca Falls difficult and lonely.
In the summer of 1848, Lucretia Mott, already a well-known Quaker abolitionist and reformer, and her husband James were visiting Seneca Falls as part of a trip to the nearby Seneca Indian tribe and to former slaves now living as free people across the border in Canada. Stanton visited Mott and poured out her frustration. Mott had similar grievances. Both women had long been active in the antislavery cause. Henry B. Stanton, Elizabeth’s husband, was a well-known abolitionist, and he and Elizabeth had traveled widely in the service of the cause. Stanton and Mott had both attended the World Anti-Slavery Convention in London in 1840 with their husbands. At that gathering, all of the women were excluded from any speaking role. As they talked about it in 1848, Stanton and Mott decided, “then and there, to call a ‘Woman’s Rights Convention’” for the following week.
Ihe Woman’s Rights Convention at Seneca Falls generated far more attention-most of it negative—than the organizers expected. Stanton remembered, “All the journals from Maine to Texas seemed to strive with each other to see which could make our movement appear most ridiculous.” Looking back on the hostility that the convention generated, Stanton said, “If I had had the slightest premonition of all that was to follow that convention, I fear I should not have had the courage to risk it.
Not all the responses were hostile, however. The abolitionist Frederick Douglass attended the Seneca Falls gathering and spoke in favor of, and signed, the declaration. Abolitionists were used to hostility, and much of the abolitionist press supported the Seneca Falls statement, launching an important alliance between abolitionists and advocates for women’s rights. Stanton, Mott, and many like them were abolitionists first who then added women’s rights to their concerns, in part, because of their exclusion from leadership positions in the abolitionist movements and, in part, because they saw the rights of enslaved people and new freedoms for women as part of the same reform effort. Douglass and many male abolitionists were also among the strongest supporters of women’s rights. And many of the most determined opponents of one movement also opposed the other.
Reports of the Woman’s Rights Convention at Seneca Falls caught the attention of other women and subsequent conventions were held across New York state and in Massachusetts, Ohio, Indiana, and Pennsylvania. Among those who heard the news of the Seneca Falls convention were Susan B. Anthony and Matilda Joslyn Gage. Anthony was a teacher in Rochester, New York, and active in temperance and antislavery reforms.
Seneca Falls Women's Rights Convention
A significant convention demanding women's equality in legal rights, held in upstate New York in 1848.
Chapter 12 Living in a Nation of Changing Lands, Changing Faces, Changing Expectations 351
122
122
Elizabeth Cady Stanton and Susan B. Anthony became lifelong friends soon after the Woman's Rights Convention at Seneca Falls and, in spite of occasional disagreements, worked together for almost half a century to fight for women's right to vote.
Gage gave birth to a son just before the Seneca Falls meeting and could not attend. Both of these women quickly became friends with Stanton and fellow leaders of the women’s rights movement for over half a century. They also joined as editors of the first three volumes of History of Woman Suffrage published between 1881 and 1886. The gathering at Seneca Falls, the declaration that the convention issued, and the movement that followed became far more than the small band of organizers dared hope for when they gathered on those hot summer days.
A
Growing Women's Rights Movement Women continued to lead campaigns to open other doors to women during the years after the convention at Seneca Falls. Some collaborated with the Seneca Falls leaders and some worked on their own. When Lucy Stone graduated from Oberlin College in 1847—Oberlin and Antioch were among the first American colleges to admit women as students—she was chosen as the commencement speaker but was told that a man would have to read her speech because it was not appropriate for women to speak to mixed audiences. In response, she refused to write one. In 1855, when she married Henry B. Blackwell, Stone insisted on keeping her own name, a huge break with tradition. Stone’s Oberlin friend and sister-in-law Antoinette Brown Blackwell was the first woman ordained as a Protestant minister in 1851. In 1849, Elizabeth Blackwell, sister-in-law to both women, became the first woman awarded an M.D. degree.
Another reformer, Amelia Bloomer, who had participated in the Seneca Falls convention and served as a temperance lecturer, embraced a different kind of freedom for women when in 1851 she popularized a kind of trousers that women might wear instead of the cumbersome hoop skirts that were expected of all middle-class women.
Other women demanded other kinds of rights. One of the most important issues for many women was the right to control their own property. In nearly all the states before the 1830s, a married woman’s husband controlled all of the couple’s property. Women fought such rules, and after the Panic of 1837, in which many women saw their life savings disappear because of a husband’s bankruptcy, their voices began to be heard. Mississippi was the first state to pass laws specifically allowing women to keep the property they brought into their marriages. The 1839 law said that property that women had before a marriage or inherited during a marriage—including slaves—could not be controlled by their husbands. Michigan passed a law in 1844 that protected a women’s property from a husband’s creditors, and in the 1840s and 1850s, other states followed. In Texas and other states that had once belonged to Mexico, Spanish-era laws had long given women the rights to control their own property, and those rights were incorporated into the new American legal systems.
In the 1830s, other women formed antiprostitution societies to protect women from being forced into such work. Additional reformers of the 1830s became advocates for dietary reform, including Mary Gove Nichols, who along with Sylvester Graham (of Graham crackers) advocated a healthier diet free of alcohol, coffee, meat, sugar, and spices.
Advocates for the rights of women also had their differences with one another. Some of the most intense differences came over the issue of divorce. Frances (Fanny) Wright, who had been influenced by Robert Owen’s ideas about an ideal community (see Chapter 10), represented an extreme view of the topic. Wright tried to create her
352 Part V Expansion, Separation, and a New Union, 1844-1877
own utopian community at Nashoba, Tennessee, where she advocated that the best way to end slavery and the racial prejudice that maintained it was to promote interracial unions that would produce a new breed of Americans. Even after the failure of Nashoba, Wright continued to argue that the institution of marriage was a barrier to women’s equality. More moderate women, including Elizabeth Cady Stanton, argued that marriage was a simple legal contract, not a sacred institution, and that at least in the case of a husband who was a drunkard or abusive, divorce should be easy. Others disagreed, not only those hostile to women’s rights but also leaders of the women’s movement such as Antoinette Brown Blackwell.
The links between the women’s rights and antislavery efforts, important as they were, were not without their tensions. Some African-American women felt those tensions especially deeply. As early as 1832, the first female antislavery society in the United States was created by African-American women in Salem, Massachusetts. White women soon followed with their own societies in a number of large cities, but black women were often reluctant to join the integrated societies in which white women nearly always claimed all of the leadership roles. At a women’s rights convention in Akron, Ohio, in 1851, Sojourner Truth asked, “May I say a few words?” Truth was already a nationally recognized figure. She had been born a slave in New York State in 1799 but was freed by the New York Emancipation Act of 1827. She took the name Sojourner Truth and traveled across the nation demanding freedom for her fellow Americans of African origin. She told the convention:
I have as much muscle as any man, and can do as much work as any man. I have plowed and reaped and husked and chopped and mowed, and can any man do more than that? I have heard much about the sexes being equal. I can carry as much as any man, and can eat as much too, if I can get it. I am as strong as any man....But man is in a tight place, the poor slave is on him, woman is coming on him, he is surely between a hawk and a buzzard.
The "bloomers" that Amelia Bloomer popularized were much more than a fashion statement.They essentially meant that women could wear pants, liberating them from the long hoop skirts that were virtually required wear for middle-class women and that made any sort of activity, from walking upstairs to physical activity out of doors, extremely difficult.
Versions of the speech published later added the famous refrain “And ain’t I a woman?” In that speech, Truth linked the antislavery and women’s rights campaigns, telling those who opposed that link that they would indeed be caught between a hawk and a buzzard” if she had anything to do with it.
A
Quick Review What did the women's and abolitionist movements have in common? How did the two movements build on each other?
CONCLUSION
In the decades leading up to the Civil War, the United States grew in area and in population. From 1830 to 1850, the number of people living in the United States almost doubled, from fewer than 13 million to more than 23 million. Rising birth rates among native-born Americans fueled the largest proportion of this growth, but other forces also sent U.S. population statistics upward. Immigrants, particularly from China, Ireland, and Germany, contributed to the rise as did the multitudes of new residents acquired when the United States gained new territory after its war with Mexico. Responding to 3 variety of push-and-pull factors, immigrants flocked to America to escape hardships
Chapter 12 Living in a Nation of Changing Lands, Changing Faces, Changing Expectations 353
at home and to pursue economic opportunity on American soil as domestics, farmers, miners, railroad workers, builders, and factory laborers. In many cases, native-born Americans did not take well to immigrants, seeing them as a threat to their own jobs and quality of life. The country’s growing diversity brought new tensions.
Large territorial gains, ceded to the United States under the terms of the Treaty of Guadalupe Hidalgo in 1848 and purchased from Mexico by U.S. diplomat James Gadsden in 1853, stretched the nation’s borders farther south and west, bringing many Spanish-speaking people, as well as Plains and Pueblo Indians, into the country. Although the treaties had promised that these residents would be respected and allowed to continue living in the areas, Americans who flocked into those regions generally pushed out those who were already there, leaving them in much more marginal positions.
Changes in fashion, technology, and transportation led to cotton’s becoming a highly profitable crop in the 19th century, more profitable with each succeeding decade. Its cultivation spread across the lower South, transforming the Southern economy and the dynamics of slavery. The slave population also surged during this time, increasing from 1.5 million to 4 million between 1820 and 1860. By 1840, the American South was the leading producer of cotton in the world, and plantation owners, eager to exploit the rising demand for the crop, moved slaves into new cotton-growing regions to work in the fields from dawn to dusk. This new cotton economy made slavery in the South far more profitable than ever before. Slave owners justified the institution of slavery as a “positive good” wherein slaves were thought to be better off being provided for on plantations than left to fend for themselves. Slaves, through open revolt, escape, and other less dramatic means, resisted their enslavement. Abolitionists in the North—white and black—also resisted slavery, campaigning against the institution with renewed vehemence that heightened sectional tensions.
Women, who were also struggling for full rights as citizens, launched a suffrage movement at Seneca Falls, New York, in 1848 and a campaign for full rights in all areas of society. Many women and some men saw a link between freedom from slavery and the emancipation of women, and they agitated tirelessly for both causes, even though others of both sexes renounced their efforts.
CHAPTER
REVIEW
Which changes in the United States had the greatest impact on emerging social movements in the 1840s and 1850s? You may want to consider immigration, the growth of both antislavery and proslavery propaganda, and the campaign for equal rights for women in your answer.
354 Part V Expansion, Separation, and a New Union, 1844-1877
Chapter 12 Chapter Review
THE CHANGING FACE OF THE AMERICAN PEOPLE IN THE
1840s AND 1850s_____________________________________ B
Analyze how immigration from China, Ireland, and Germany, as well as the incorporation of Mexican citizens in the Southwest, changed the United States. Review Questions
1. Historical Interpretation
What forces pushed Chinese immigrants to leave their homeland? What forces pulled them toward California?
2.	Comparison
Compare and contrast the place of Irish immigrants in American society before and after the Great Famine of 1845-1850. How would you explain the differences you note?
3.	Chronological Reasoning
How did life change for Hispanic elites living in California, Texas, and New Mexico after the absorption of those territories into the United States? What explains the changes you note?
SLAVERY IN THE UNITED STATES,
1840s AND 1850s 12.2
Explain how the lives of slaves, slaveholders, and abolitionists evolved in the decades before the Civil War.
5.	Contextualization
How did slaves build lives and communities of their own within the institution of slavery?
6.	Historical Interpretation
How would you explain the growth of antislavery sentiment in the North after 1830? What connections do you see between the rise of the abolitionist movement and the changing nature of the Southern defense of slavery?
12.3
>
!
NEW STRENGTH FOR AMERICAN WOMEN
Describe how the women's rights movement developed in the United States in the 1830s and 1840s.
Review Questions
7.	Historical Interpretation
What links were there between the abolitionist and women’s rights movements of the 1840s and 1850s? How would you explain the connections you note?
8.	Chronological Reasoning
Why was the Seneca Falls convention such an important turning point in the history of the struggle for women’s rights?
Review Questions
4.	Chronological Reasoning
How did the nature of slavery change between 1800 and 1850? How would you explain the changes you note?
Chapter 12 Living in a Nation of Changing Lands, Changing Faces, Changing Expectations 355
1850-1861
13
The Politics of
	
C H A P T E R O B J E C T I VE
Demonstrate an understanding of the growing split between the North and the South that led to secession and civil war.
wSKasasaassBM
FROM UNION TO DISUNION
Leaflets like this reflected the outrage many northerners felt in response to the capture and reenslavement of African Americans that resulted from the passage of a tougher fugitive slave law.
Analyze the political jockeying in Congress and how reaction to the Fugitive Slave Act and the publication of Unde Toms Cabin, changed the opinions of many Americans—South and the North—making a break between them hard to avoid.
BLEEDING KANSAS AND DRED SCOTT V. SANDFORD
Analyze the causes and consequences of the battle over slavery in Kansas and the Supreme Court's decision in the Dred Scott case and the impact of those events on public opinion.
THE ECONOMY, THE PANIC OF
AND THE LINCOLN-DOUGLAS DEBATES
Explain how the economic crisis of 1857 and the growing political crises of the decade impacted each other and led the nation to divide. FROM JOHN BROWN TO THE SECESSION OF THE SOUTH
Analyze the political impact of John Brown's raid and why Lincoln won the presidential election of 1860 and the southern states then voted to leave.
356 Part V Expansion, Separation, and a New Union,
While thousands of Americans, along with Asians and Europeans, were pouring into California in search of gold, other Americans were attacking or defending slavery. These two seemingly separate issues came to a head in Congress in 1850. Because of its rapid gold-rush-inspired growth, President Taylor advocated statehood for California from the time that he took office in 1848, and in 1849, Californians adopted a state constitution and applied for statehood only 1 year after the United States acquired it from Mexico. The territory far exceeded the minimum population threshold for statehood, but there was a problem: although the admission of California as a free state would once again restore the carefully crafted balance of free and slave states, evening out the numbers after the balance in the Senate had been disrupted by admitting Texas as a slave state, other future free states might follow, which threatened those in the South. Contrary to some expectations, the U.S. War with Mexico had not produced another slave state for the Union after Texas. Admitting California as a free state would restore the balance in the Senate that had been the rule since the Missouri Compromise of 1820 and that the admission of Texas hah disrupted in 1846, leading to 15 slaves states represented, but only I4&ee states. Many in the North and South thought a balance was essential to maintaining the Union. But Southern senators, both Whig and Democrat agreed that if California were admitted as a free state, then other free states
1844-1877
13.1
might quickly follow, especially because there were virtually no slaves in either Oregon or New Mexico territories, the other land acquired by the United States in the 1840s that might logically soon be divided into states. The young senator from Mississippi, Jefferson Davis, concerned about that possibility, warned his colleagues that “we are about permanently to destroy the balance of power between the sections.” The Souths ill and aging champion John C. Calhoun wrote in his diary, “As things now stand, the South cannot with safety remain in the Union.” Much had happened to lead Davis and Calhoun to their conclusions. In the 1850s, more Southerners would come to believe that they could not remain in the Union, and hostility to the South and its peculiar institution of slavery would increase in the North. Although a new generation in Congress tried again to enact the kinds of compromises that had held the country together since the adoption of the Constitution in 1789, those efforts no longer worked. The tensions that led Southern states to feel compelled to secede from the United States in 1861 are the focus of this chapter.
FROM UNION TO DISUNION
Analyze the political jockeying in Congress and how reaction to the Fugitive Slave Act and the publication of Uncle Tom's Cabin changed the opinions of many Americans— South and the North—making a break between them hard to avoid.
The Congress that met in 1849 and 1850 and debated whether and how to admit California was one of the most contentious ever seated. The same three men, Daniel Webster of Massachusetts, John C. Calhoun of South Carolina, and Henry Clay of Kentucky, who had dominated the Senate as young men in 1820 now, as old men, played the central role in 1850. The dramatic debates of 1850 would be the last time the three would appear on the Senate floor. A new generation of senators would also play crucial roles in the coming years: Stephen A. Douglas of Illinois (who would contest the presidency with Abraham Lincoln in 1860), William H. Seward of New York and Salmon P. Chase of Ohio (who would both seek the Republican nomination for president in 1860 and then serve in Lincoln’s Cabinet), and Jefferson Davis of Mississippi (who would be elected president of the Confederacy in 1861).
Proslavery senators like Calhoun and Davis were worried about California, but they were even more worried about abolitionism in the North, which had been a growing force since the 1840s. Throughout the 1840s and 1850s there were many different kinds of abolitionists with differing levels of commitment to their cause, but Southerners tended to view all abolitionists as extremists. At the core of the movement were those known as the radical abolitionists for whom slavery was the greatest evil in the nation, an evil that needed to end immediately and completely. A larger group of Northerners were sympathetic with the radicals, but not willing to move as quickly or do as much to oppose slavery. Many of these moderates fell into the free-soil category, willing to let slavery stay where it already existed but adamantly opposing any extension of slavery to new territories where it did not yet exist by law. Finally, there were others for whom ending slavery was perhaps a good thing but not the highest priority. AU of these Northerners, however, were committed to free labor, the belief that slavery undermined the value and dignity of hard work and that many white people We also marginalized in places where slave labor was predominant. In the 1850s, this sentiment would lead voters in the new Republican Party to cheer for Free Soil, Free Speech, Free Labor, and Free Men.”
Many of the tensions that exploded in Congress in 1850 dated to the U.S. War with Mexico in the 1840s. In 1846, Democratic Congressman David Wilmot of Pennsylvania proposed an amendment to a military appropriations bill, prohibiting slavery in any territory acquired from Mexico. This so-called Wilmot Proviso sprang from growing anger among Northern Democrats at what they saw as the pro-Southern tilt of the Polk administration. With support from northern Whigs, the amendment

Wilmot Proviso
The amendment offered by Pennsylvania Democrat David Wilmot in 1846, which stipulated that "as an express and fundamental condition to the acquisition of any territory from the Republic of Mexico... neither slavery nor involuntary servitude shall ever exist in any part of said territory."
1850 Compromise of 1850 including Fugitive Slave Act passed
1852	Harriet Beecher Stowe's Unde Tom's Cabin
published in book form
1854	Kansas-Nebraska Act
Republican Party founded
1854-1859 Civil war in Kansas known as "Bleeding Kansas"
1857	Supreme Court's Dred Scott decision Lecompton Constitution adopted in Kansas, but free-soil majority boycott election
Panic of 1857
1858	Lincoln-Douglas debates Lecompton Constitution for Kansas rejected by Congress
1859	John Brown's raid on Harpers Ferry federal arsenal
1860	Democratic Party splits into Northern and Southern halves
Abraham Lincoln elected president South Carolina secedes from the Union
1861	More Southern states secede—total of seven by February 1
Confederate States of America founded Lincoln inaugurated as president
Chapter 13 The Politics of Separation 357
passed the House, but died in the Senate where Southern Senators were able to block all such measures in 1846 and 1847. A Boston newspaper said of the Proviso, “Asif by magic, it brought to a head the great question that is about to divide the American people.” By 1850, the question of slavery created divisions that cut across party lines, whether Democrat or Whig.
California, the Compromise of 1850, and the Fugitive Slave Act
A new Congress, elected just after the end of the War with Mexico, and a new president, war-hero Zachery Taylor, tackled the complex question of California’s statehood. Taylor was a political unknown. Southerners tended to trust him because he owned slaves and a Louisiana plantation, but 40 years as an officer in the U.S. Army had led Taylor to value the Union. He hated the threat of secession. In 1849, Taylor proposed admitting not only California but New Mexico as new states. California would certainly be a free state, but Taylors proposal left the future status of New Mexico uncertain, though there were virtually no slaves there. By the time Congress convened in December 1849, much of the country was in an uproar, with many in the South threatening secession if two free states were admitted and many in the North willing to call their bluff.
In that charged situation, Senator Henry Clay of Kentucky, long known as the “Great Compromiser” for his role in crafting the Compromise of 1820, tried again. Clay offered a series of proposals that he hoped would pass Congress and avert a sectional crisis by defusing tension in a number of areas. The first compromise would admit California as a state but organize New Mexico under a territorial government with no “restriction or condition on the subject of slavery.” As a territory, New Mexico would have no votes in the Senate, a key concern of slaveholders in Congress since they were certain—probably rightly—that New Mexico would opt to enter the union as a free state. The second compromise Clay proposed would resolve the contested question of the Texas-New Mexico border by giving more land to New Mexico and giving Texas $10 million to pay off the debts of the former Republic of Texas. Since many Southerners held Republic of Texas bonds, this proposal had great appeal in the South. The third proposal abolished the slave trade but not slavery itself in the District of Columbia. Finally, to ensure Southern support, Clay proposed a fourth compromise: a law enhancing slaveholders’ right to reclaim slaves who fled north. The whole package may have seemed to Clay like a careful balance that would appeal to both sections. In fact, most members of Congress from each section disliked it, claiming that it did not go nearly far enough in the direction they wanted.
In the debate that followed Clay’s proposals, John C. Calhoun warned that if California were admitted as a free state, it would “destroy irretrievably the equilibrium between the two sections,” and that Southerners could not remain in the Union. The threat of secession was clear. Three days later, Daniel Webster spoke in favor of the compromise. Webster began, “I wish to speak to-day, not as a Massachusetts man, nor as a Northern man, but as an American.. ..I speak to-day for the preservation of the Union.” It was an impressive speech and one memorized by generations of school children. But it virtually destroyed Webster’s reputation in an increasingly abolitionist Massachusetts where many of his constituents were no longer willing to compromise with slaveholders.
In the long hot summer of 1850, first Calhoun and then President Taylor both died in office. The new President Millard Fillmore, from New York, favored compromise, perhaps more than Taylor had. In addition, a new generation of senators, of whom Stephen A. Douglas was the leader, managed to forge a final compromise close to Clay s proposal. In a series of separate resolutions, California was admitted as a free state; New Mexico and Utah were organized as territories with no votes in Congress, thus maintaining the balance in the Senate; the slave trade but not slavery was pro-hibited in the District of Columbia; and Texas happily accepted the $10 million io exchange for a less expansive border with New Mexico. Most fatefully, Congress also
358 Part V Expansion, Separation, and a New Union, 1844-1877
Henry Clay, John C. Calhoun, and Daniel Webster, three men who had dominated the Senate since 1820, debated for the last time in Congress as they tried to resolve the complex issues raised by the admission of California as a state.
passed the Fugitive Slave Act, which was designed to please the South by giving them the right not only to reclaim runaway slaves but also to demand federal and local Northern help in the process.
There was great rejoicing in Washington in the fall of 1850 when the package passed. President Fillmore called it “a final settlement,” but not everyone agreed. A convention of delegates from Southern states condemned the compromise and affirmed the right of secession. In the North, Charles Francis Adams, son and grandson of moderately antislavery presidents, called the compromise “the consummation of the iniquities of the most disgraceful session of Congress.” Horace Mann, the former Massachusetts education leader who had succeeded John Quincy Adams as a representative from Massachusetts in the congressional seat that was, because of Adams’s long efforts, considered the abolitionist seat, said that the compromise meant the Declaration of Independence applied only to white men. For Northerners, the vigorous enforcement of the Fugitive Slave Act would soon become intolerable, and many Southern leaders became convinced that the abolitionists wanted to end slavery not only in the territories but also in the states where it was strong and that the only solution was to leave the Union. No one knew what the next decade would hold, but the most perceptive among them thought the celebrations of 1850 were premature.
Fugitive Slave Act
A law that was part of the Compromise of 1850. It created a new set of federal agents to help track runaway slaves and required authorities in the North to assist Southern slave catchers and return runaway slaves to their owners.
forcing the Fugitive Slave Act
len Henry Clay proposed a new Fugitive Slave Act as part of the Compromise of 50 and Stephen A. Douglas persuaded Congress to adopt it, or when Presidents [more (1850-1853) and Franklin Pierce (1853-1857) vigorously enforced that law, ne of them expected the firestorm that resulted. The core of the new law was not v. The Constitution said
No person held to service or labor (i.e., a slave) in one State under the laws thereof, escaping into another, shall in consequence of any law or regulation therein, be discharged from such service or labor, but shall be delivered up on claim of the party to whom such service or labor may be due.
Chapter 13 The Politics of Separation 359
CAPTION!!
COLORED PEOPLE
or BOSTON, ONE & ALE,
Tod are fcereby respectfully CAUTIONED ud advised, to avoid conversing with the
Watchmen and Police Officers of Boston,
For since the recent OttDER OF THE MATOB A AU>£RM£N, they are empowered to act as
KIDNAPPERS
Slave Catchers,
And they have already been actually employed la KIWAPPIW, CATCHIW, AND BEEFING-SLAVES. Therefore, if you value your UBSRTT) and the	o/flie	among you,SA«m
them in every possible manner, as so many JGfOfofJOJt on the track of the most unfortunate of your race.
Keep a Sharp Look Out for KIDNAPPERS, and have TOP EYE open.
After enforcement of the Fugitive Slave Act became common, abolitionists posted warnings to African-Americans that whether born free or escaping from slavery, they were no longer safe in Northern cities like Boston.
Even though Northern states had passed “personal liberty laws” in the 1830s that made it harder to recapture a former slave, the Supreme Court in 1842 had affirmed that slaveholders had a constitutional right to capture slaves who had escaped to a free state. Given the number of runaway slaves, slave catching was a growth industry in the United States before 1850.
Nevertheless, the new Fugitive Slave Act went much further than any previous law. It created a new corps of federal agents to help capture runaway slaves. Court-appointed federal commissioners would determine whether a person claimed by a slave catcher was truly a slave or actually a free person. Commissioners were paid a double fee every time they found that a person was a fugitive slave as opposed to a free person, and there was no appeal from their decisions. Finally, the law provided for a $1,000 fine and up to a year in jail for anyone who helped a fugitive slave. Across the North, free blacks were worried, and many, knowing that it would be difficult to prove that they had been born free, moved to Canada before trouble arrived. But the slave catchers, now supported by federal agents, fanned out across the North, seeking escaped slaves, and in town after town, people saw the results. It was an ugly spectacle.
Anthony Burns escaped from slavery in Virginia, went to Boston, and found work in a clothing store. But his former owner discovered his whereabouts, and under the Fugitive Slave Act, a federal marshal arrested Burns on May 24, 1854. Bostonians were incensed. White and black abolitionists attacked the courthouse where Burns was held, and a federal marshal was killed in the melee. President Pierce ordered marines, cavalry, and artillery to Boston to ensure that the Fugitive Slave Act was enforced. On June 2, 1854, federal troops marched Burns in chains through the streets of Boston to a Coast Guard ship that was waiting in Boston harbor to take him back to slavery in Virginia. Huge
crowds watched the spectacle, church bells tolled, and flags flew upside down. Pierce had upheld the law, but he had lost the respect of many of the nations citizens. Amos A. Lawrence, one of the richest men in Massachusetts and a conservative Whig, was a changed man after watching the Burns affair. He said that he and many of his friends “went to bed one night old fashioned, conservative, Compromise Union Whigs & waked up stark mad Abolitionists.” Lawrence was far from alone. Happily for Burns, his Boston supporters eventually purchased his freedom. Nevertheless, the sight of this man being marched by U.S. troops back to slavery on the streets of Boston was indelible for many who saw and heard about it.
Similar incidents happened across the North. In Ohio, Margaret Garner, an escaped slave who had crossed the Ohio River from Kentucky, discovered slave catchers at her door, and she tried to kill her children rather than allow them to be returned to slavery. One of the children died. Garner was sold back to slavery in New Orleans. For Northerners, these sorts of events undermined the notion that they were living in free states. Many concluded that freedom could not exist in a nation that allowed slavery anywhere.
Southern defenders of slavery and even their nonslaveholding neighbors were similarly coming to the conclusion that slave states and free states could not remain in the same country. The divisive issue could not be contained by compromise. Federal law had banned the international slave trade since 1808, but smugglers found ways to flout that ban and bring new slaves directly from Africa. Northerners likewise flouted the Fugitive Slave Act. When the best known of the Southern slave smugglers, Charles A. L. Lamar, was tried in federal court for smuggling slaves into the United States, a Southern newspaper asked, What is the difference between a Yankee violating the fugitive slave law in the North and a Southern man violating...the law against the
360 PartV Expansion, Separation, and a New Union, 1844-1877
African slave trade in the South? In the 1850s, the vigorous enforcement of some laws and the flouting of others angered many Americans, but they differed greatly on which laws they wanted enforced and which flouted.
Uncle Tom's Cabin
Anger at the Fugitive Slave Act also convinced Harriet Beecher Stowe, already a well-known author, to do something for the antislavery cause. As the Fugitive Slave Act took effect, Stowe wrote that the time is come when even a woman or a child who can speak a word for freedom and humanity is bound to speak.” And speak she did.
Although she was living in Brunswick, Maine, at the time, Stowe had spent many years in Cincinnati, Ohio, and had herself seen slavery directly across the Ohio River in Kentucky. Cincinnati—a city that faced the Ohio River and from which one could see the slave state of Kentucky on the far shore—was itself home to many fugitives from slavery. She began writing what would become Uncle Tom's Cabin. It was first published in serial form in the National Era in 1851 and 1852 and then as a book. Within a year, 310,000 copies were in print, making it the bestselling book of the century, other than the Bible. What seems to modern readers to be an unrealistic and sentimental story of Uncle Tom, the ever-patient and kind slave, his evil owner Simon Legree, and heroic Eliza Harris, the slave mother who jumps on ice floes in
13.1
135,000 SETS, 270,000 TQIOMES SOLI.
UNCLE TOMS CABIN
EDITION TOR THE MILLION.
WWUHli IN 1 V*. « W CENTS. IN LEHMAN. IN I PR,,R
58 TENTS. -	-	IN 2 Uls, CLOTH, * PLATES, PRICE SI-HL
>rn. huthhtb. OTiwi. b i >«-	™'"«
PRICKS PROM «*-OO TO OA.OO.
The GreatestBookof the Age.
fob sale
Selling 300,000 copies, Uncle Tom's Cabin was one of the best selling books of the century and helped to galvanize Northern opinion against slavery.
Chapter 13 The Politics of Separation 361
THINKING HISTORICALLY
Uncle Tom's Cabin
Early in Uncle Tom's Cabin, Stowe described her heroine Eliza's decision to run away from a Kentucky plantation after hearing that her young son was about to be sold away from her and the family to a new owner:
It is impossible to conceive of a human creature more wholly desolate and forlorn than Eliza, when she turned her footsteps from Uncle Tom's cabin.
Her husband's suffering and dangers, and the danger of her child, all blended in her mind, with a confused and stunning sense of the risk she was running, in leaving the only home she had ever known, and cutting loose from the protection of a friend whom she loved and revered. Then there was the parting from every familiar object....But stronger than all was maternal love, wrought into a paroxysm of frenzy by the near approach of a fearful danger. Her boy was old enough to have walked by her side, and, in an indifferent case, she would only have led him by the hand; but now the bare thought of putting him out of her arms made her shudder, and she strained him to her bosom with a convulsive grasp, as she went rapidly forward....
If it were your Harry, mother, or your Willie, that were going to be torn from you by a brutal trader, tomorrow morning,—if you had seen the man, and heard that the papers were signed and delivered, and you had only from twelve o'clock till morning to make good your escape,—how fast could you walk?
For many Americans, Eliza's fear and determination made the reality of slavery come alive in ways that decades of antislavery publications and true-life stories had not. What a modern reader reads as melodrama, readers of the time found compelling.
Source: Harriet Beecher Stowe, Uncle Tom's Cabin, or, Life among the lowly (Boston: J.P. Jewett, 1852).
Thinking Critically
1.	Historical Interpretation
How does Stowe transform the slavery question from an abstract political issue into a personal tragedy?
2.	Contextualization
How does Stowe build understanding for Eliza and therefore for all slaves in this short passage.
RVVl
the Ohio River to escape pursuing slave catchers, was not only a literary but also a political phenomenon in the 1850s and 1860s. If any one book brought home a picture of slavery to moderate or ambivalent Northerners it was Uncle Tom's Cabin.
The book also enraged the South. De Bow's Southern and Western Review, one of the nation’s largest proslavery publications, said the novel was “insulting to the South, because Mrs. Stowe wants the world to believe that all she has written is true!” In the turmoil of the 1850s, however, the book galvanized antislavery opinion not only in the North but also in England where it was credited with playing a role in keeping Britain neutral during the Civil War. The book angered both Southerners who rationalized slavery and Northerners, many of whom first saw the nature of slavery through its pages.
The Kansas-Nebraska Act of 1854
Developments in the early 1850s proved how wrong President Fillmore had been to think that the Compromise of 1850 was a “final settlement” of North-South tensions. The Fillmore administrations enforcement of the Fugitive Slave Act exacerbated antislavery opinion across the North and probably cost Fillmore the Whig nomination for president. In the 1852 elections, the Whigs, deeply divided between North and South, voted on 53 ballots before finally nominating another war hero, General Winfield Scott. An almost equally divided Democratic Party nominated Franklin Pierce of New Hampshire, whom many in the South considered “as reliable as Calhoun himself”
362 Part V Expansion, Separation, and a New Union, 1844-1877
on the issue of slavery because, they thought, he would win the White House for them by sweeping the South. The Democrats’ gamble paid off; Pierce won and enforced the Fugitive Slave Act as actively as Fillmore.
Despite that highly tense political atmosphere, Senator Stephen A. Douglas of Illinois hoped to get federal support for a transcontinental railroad from Chicago to the Pacific Coast. A railroad did not seem to be something that would immediately stir up the tensions swirling around slavery, but it soon did. As one step toward organizing the railroad, Douglas and Congressman William A. Richardson, a fellow Illinois Democrat, introduced bills into Congress in 1853 that would organize the remaining land in the Louisiana Purchase north of the Arkansas River into what they called the Nebraska Territory to facilitate awarding a right-of-way for the railroad (see Map 13-1).
Southern senators feared an effort to create another free state out of Nebraska and blocked the bill. After several failed efforts at compromise, Douglas proposed to split Nebraska into two territories—Nebraska and Kansas—and allow each territory to decide whether to allow slavery. He called this approach “popular sovereignty”— letting each state or territory decide for itself whether to allow or ban slavery in its jurisdiction. Others had used the term before him, but Douglas became its most prominent proponent. The term sounded democratic—as least for white voters—but

popular sovereignty
A solution to the slavery crisis suggested by Senator Lewis Cass of Michigan by which territorial residents, not Congress, would decide slavery's fate in any proposed new state.
C A NAD A
OREGON
TERRITORY
UNORGANIZED
TERRITORY
MINNESOTA , TERRITORY
VERMONT
MAINE
IOWA
CALIFORNIA (admitted free,
\ 1850)
UTAH TERRITORY
(1850) ■ ILLINOIS
NEW HAMPSHIRE
f^SACHVSETTS Z..x" .	" . ■	RHODE ISLAND
Connecticut
OHIO ■	JEW JERSEY
INDIANA	;
NEW YORK
PACIFIC
OCEAN
NEW MEXICO TERRITORY
INDIAN X V VIRGINIA
R. TERRITORY
TENNESSEE CAROUNA
Delaware X- ^MARYLAND
TEXAS
(claimed, ' ,836-50)
[~..| Free states and territories
I
Slave states [,	] To be decided by popular sovereignty
— “ Missouri Compromise line
MEXICO
TEXAS ' (after 1850)
LOUIS,
? 05
z £
ALABAMA
litH
Gulf of Mexico
SOUTH
CAROLINA GEORGIA
iSlK-
,/
ATLANTIC
OCEAN



%

3?
\ T \
1AP13-, The Compromise of 1850 and the Kansas-NebraskaAct. The Compromise of! 850 admitted aiif„ 'neuompromis	, h New Mexico and Utah Territories. Three years later,
rma as a free state and se	Unorganized Territory between Minnesota and Oregon
enator Stephen A. Douglas P^posed	th abo t whether the territory might eventually become
hat set off a firestorm in Congress and the country about wrieu.
lave or free states.
Chapter 13 The Politics of Separation 363
1 •
Kansas-Nebraska Act
A law passed in 1854 creating the Kansas and Nebraska Territories but leaving the question of slavery open to local residents.
Republican Party
A new political party created in 1854 that was dedicated to stopping the spread of slavery in any place in the nation where it did not exist.
it explicitly repealed the Missouri Compromise of 1820, which banned slavery north of Missouri no matter what local residents said. Ihe proposal to split the Nebraska Territory and allow popular sovereignty to overrule the Missouri Compromise got Douglas the support he needed from Southern senators, but it also raised “a hell of a storm,” as Douglas knew it would. For many moderates, even for President Pierce, the Missouri Compromise had held the Union together for 34 years, almost half the nation’s lifetime. Tampering with it seemed dangerous. Douglas was offering to repeal it to be able to organize the new territories that he thought were essential to his plans for a railroad. The risk was that repealing the Missouri Compromise could allow slavery, if the local voters supported it, in territory where it had been banned since 1820. While defenders of slavery were delighted, Northern abolitionists and moderates saw taking this risk as another step toward spreading slavery throughout the Union, something they found unacceptable.
Northern outrage was intense. The most moderate free-soil advocates who opposed extending slavery united with the most radical abolitionists in opposition. Five state legislatures and hundreds of meetings and conventions sent petitions to Congress declaring, “This crime shall not be consummated.” Whig Senator William Pitt Fessenden of Maine called the Kansas-Nebraska bill “a terrible outrage.” On the other hand, Southerners of both parties strongly supported the Kansas-Nebraska Act. In the end, the bill passed in 1854, Pierce signed it, and Douglas got his territory, but he also virtually destroyed the Whig Party.
The Congressional Elections of 1854 and the Birth of the Republican Party
The Kansas-Nebraska Act became the defining issue in the 1854 elections for Congress. Battles between antislavery and proslavery factions within Kansas dominated the national news for the next several years. In 1854, northern Whigs, led by Senator William H. Seward of New York, along with members of the declining Free Soil Party came together to create the Republican Party. Many former Whigs and members of smaller parties campaigned for office as Republicans—members of a brand new party—in the 1854 congressional elections, and the Republicans, not the Whigs, would nominate candidates for president in 1856 and 1860. Southern and proslavery Whigs tried to maintain their party for a few years, but what had been a major political party in the United States since it was organized to oppose Andrew Jackson disappeared during the 1850s.
In Illinois, a former one-term Whig Congressman, Abraham Lincoln, was “aroused...as he had never been before” by the Kansas-Nebraska Act and began a campaign for a seat in the U.S. Senate that would allow him to oppose the act on the national stage. Stephen A. Douglas, in the middle of his own 6-year term as the other senator from Illinois (since all states elect two senators for 6-year terms at different times), opposed Lincoln, hoping instead for a fellow Democrat to join him in the Senate. Since U.S. Senators were elected by state legislatures at that time, not by popular votes, the 1854 senatorial campaign was actually a race among candidates for the Illinois legislature, who would then elect the new U.S. Senator. Everyone understood that, if the Democrats won a majority of the state legislature, they would elect a Democrat to join Douglas, but if the winning majority was the emerging Republican Party, supported by the remnants of the Whig Party, they would, many expected, elect Lincoln.
In the fall of 1854, Lincoln and Douglas campaigned throughout the state to support the candidates they favored for the Illinois legislature. Lincoln was a moderate, far too moderate for many abolitionists, and he remained a Whig throughout the 1854 campaign, choosing at that time not to join the new Republican Party; however, his opposition to the spread of slavery was growing stronger. He argued that while the Constitution protected slavery in the states where it existed, it “furnishes no more
164 Part V Expansion, Separation, and a New Union, 1844-1877
excuse for permitting slavery to go into our own free territory, than it would for reviving the African slave trade. When Douglas defended his long-standing policy of “popular sovereignty and the sacred right of self-government,” Lincoln responded, “when the white man governs himself that is self-government; but when he governs himself and also governs another man...that is despotism.” Lincoln said that he understood that ending slavery where it existed was difficult, but he also insisted that there could be no moral right for anyone to enslave any other person.
Lincoln s coalition won the majority of the Illinois legislature, but the coalition included former Democrats who would not vote for a Whig like Lincoln. In the end, Lincoln backed Lyman Trumbull, a former Democrat turned Republican, for the Senate rather than allow a Democrat to win. But during the 1854 campaign, Lincoln had established himself as a national actor on the political stage. The speeches that both Lincoln and Douglas made were a preview of the more formal debates that would take place between them 4 years later when Lincoln campaigned directly against Douglas in an effort to win his seat in the Senate.
Across the North, the 1854 election led to victories by anti-Kansas-Nebraska Act coalitions in state after state. Democrats lost control of most Northern state legislatures. The majority of the members of the Senate were not up for election in 1854 but the state of Wisconsin elected the first Republican to serve in that body. More significant changes came in the House of Representatives—the members of which are elected for 2-year terms directly by the voters, not by state legislatures. Northern Democrats dropped from 93 to 23 seats in the House of Representatives while Southern Democrats held 58 seats. But 150 members of Congress were now committed to stopping slavery in the territories, some as Whigs, some as Republicans, and some as members of minor parties. Since the formation of the Jacksonian Democrats and Whig opposition in the 1830s, leaders had changed party affiliations on occasion in response to strong issues, but never as often as they did in the 1850s as the old parties weakened. After 1854, voters—South and North—cared mostly about whether candidates were anti- or proslavery and whether they were moderate or radical in their views. The Kansas-Nebraska Act had unified Northern political opinion against the spread of slavery as nothing before it had done. A new political party, the Republican Party, was forming to speak for that point of view. Unlike the Whigs or the Democrats, both of which included Northern and Southern members, the Republican Party represented only one section of the nation and one political perspective. Ihe party had virtually no Southerners and no one who spoke for popular sovereignty or any other plan to allow the growth of slavery. When the new Congress assembled in late 1855, the House eventually elected as its new Speaker, Nathaniel P. Banks of Massachusetts, a former Know Nothing who had recently switched his political allegiance to the Republican Party. A representative of a political party that had not existed 2 years earlier now held the gavel in the House of Representatives.
13.2
j
Quick Review How did the escalation of hostility over slavery indicate the issue could not be settled peacefully?
BLEEDING KANSAS AND DRED SCOTT V. SANDFORD
■H
of the battle over slavery in Kansas and the Supreme
and the impact of those events on public opinion.
Analyze the causes and consequences Court's decision in the Dred Scott case
The Kansas-Nebraska Act, however, was still the law of the land in spite of the
outcome of the 1854 elections. The act essentially split the former unorganized
territory in half (see Map 13-1). The southern portion was the modern state of
Kansas and the northern, called Nebraska, included the modern states of Nebraska,
Chapter 13 The Politics of Separation
365
Lecompton Constitution
Proslavery draft written in 1857 by Kansas territorial delegates elected under questionable circumstances; it what was decisively defeated by Congress.
In 1854 and 1855, thousands of "Missouri Ruffians" as their opponents called them arrived in Kansas, well armed and determined to control the territory. Before long, equally well-armed abolitionists from the North began arriving in the territory. Given the presence of so many guns and such anger, it was not surprising that bloodshed quickly followed.
66 Part V Expansion, Separation, and a New Union, 1844-1877
South Dakota, and North Dakota. Kansas and Nebraska each now had to decide whether to apply for admission to the Union as slave or free states. No one was sure when elections would be held or who would vote, though many wanted to control the outcome. While Nebraska stayed relatively calm, Kansas, with its proximity to the slave state of Missouri but also within easy travel of the free states of Illinois and Iowa was easier for Southerners and Northerners to move to. It quickly became a dangerous and violent place.
Even before President Pierce appointed Andrew Reeder, a Pennsylvania Democrat, as territorial governor, hundreds of proslavery “border ruffians” from Missouri and abolitionists from the North began pouring into Kansas. The Missourians got there first and when the first elections were held for the territorial representative to Congress in November 1854, they won easily. They also gained a majority of the territorial legislature that was elected in March 1855. The proslavery faction could probably have won these early elections fairly, but the votes were accompanied by widespread cheating, fraudulent vote counting, votes by people who still resided in Missouri, and voter intimidation. So the results were challenged even as more antislavery voters began arriving in larger numbers and quickly came to outnumber the proslavery advocates.
In response to the first elections, the settlers who supported admitting Kansas as a free state called a convention in December 1855 in which they declared the territorial legislature elected in March to be illegitimately elected. They then held their own election, established their own legislature to meet at Topeka, adopted a state constitution (the Topeka Constitution), and elected their own governor. Thus by January 1856, Kansas had two legislatures and two governors as well as sent two different territorial representatives to Congress. For the most part, each faction voted in its own elections and boycotted the elections called by the other.
In 1856, U.S. troops under orders from President Pierce, dispersed the Topeka legislature since it lacked any legal mandate to meet, and the “official” legislature called a convention to write a state constitution. A new federal governor, Robert Walker, finally began to establish order in the territory and convinced both sides that an honest election could be held. In the October y	1857 elections—probably the most honest in the territory—in
which both factions voted for the first time, the free-state faction won a sizeable majority. But while the free-state majority now controlled the legislature, the constitutional convention, which had been appointed by the previous proslavery legislature, continued to write a constitution. The situation in Kansas then got even more complicated.
The proslavery convention at Lecompton, Kansas, that wrote what came to be known as the Lecompton Constitution finished its work in the fall of 1857, and a vote on the constitution was called for December. However, the convention decreed that the vote was only on the clause that would decide whether Kansas would be a slave or a free state. Free-state residents were convinced that the whole Lecompton document was a fatally flawed defense of slavery: even if voters made Kansas a free state, the Lecompton document said that slaves already in the territory were bound to remain slaves. They boycotted the election, and the proslavery clause won by a vote of 6,226 to 569. Then the new legislature called for a vote on the whole constitution in January 1858. Proslavery residents boycotted this election, and the constitution was defeated by a vote of 10,226 to 162. Both votes were then sent forward to Congress to sort out.
After another long and bitter debate on Kansas in the late spring of 1858—this time with Douglas in opposition to admitting Kansas as a slave state because of the “trickery and juggling Congress called for a new vote in Kansas on the Lecompton Constitution. The legislation said that if the constitution passed, Kansas would gain immediate statehood, but if it did not, statehood would be delayed significantly. In August 1858, Kansas voters defeated the Lecompton Constitution and the offer of immediate statehood by a vote of 11,300 to 1,788. Kansas would remain a territory until 1861.
The 4-year battle from 1854 to 1858 gave the territory the name of Bleeding Kansas and hardened public opinion North and South. The battle in Kansas not only was confusing but also was violent. Missouri “border ruffians” and Missouri militia intimidated and killed free-state voters. But the violence was not all on one side. Samuel Jones, the country sheriff for Lawrence, Kansas, was shot while trying to serve warrants on the free-state leaders. He survived and led the militia back to town to take prisoners and demolish a hotel, a newspaper office, and the home of the free-state governor. His successor threatened the free-state legislature in 1857 and was killed.
John Brown came to Kansas to “strike terror in the hearts of the proslavery people.” Brown attacked a small proslavery community near Pottawatomie Creek and killed and mutilated five settlers. The battles continued in 1856 and 1857. Missourians boarded steamboats on the Missouri River to search for antislavery immigrants. Both sides claimed their martyrs. In most parts of the territory, the U.S. Army slowly asserted control, but just before the final resolution in May 1858, proslavery guerrillas shot nine unarmed free-state farmers, and five of them died.
The violence was not limited to Kansas. In Washington, Congressman Preston Brooks of South Carolina, who believed that protecting the status of Kansas as a slave state was a “point of honor,” badly beat Massachusetts Senator Charles Sumner in the Senate chamber after Sumner delivered his “Crime Against Kansas” speech favoring a free-state Kansas. In Brooklyn, New York, the nation’s most famous
Bleeding Kansas
Violence between pro- and antislavery forces in Kansas Territory after the passage of the Kansas-Nebraska Act in 1854.
1J.1
13.2
133
13 A
cZXXX Brooks of south Carolina was enraged by IXkTn S hoX? antislavery arguments during the debates about Kansas, which Brooks took an attack on the honor of his family andthe South. In May 1856, Brooks came into the Senate chamber and beat Sumner w,th a cane while h/sat at his desk. Sumner never fully recovered from his injuries but remamed ,n the Senate as a staunch Republican through the Civil War and Reconstruction until he died in 1874.
Chapter 13 The Politics of Separation 367
Dred Scott v. Sandford
A
Supreme Court case brought by Dred Scott, a slave demanding his freedom based on his residence in a free state and a free territory with his master. After the Supreme Court's decision on the Dred Scott case, many Americans, North and South, concluded that slavery had to be banned everywhere or nowhere.
preacher, Henry Ward Beecher, warned of the need to “stand firm, and collected funds for “Beecher’s Bibles,” which were Springfield rifles to be sent to Kansas. Even after the nation turned to other matters, few Americans forgot the intense emotions Kansas aroused.
The Supreme Court and Dred Scott
While the battle for Kansas transfixed the nation, a court case was making its way through the nations slow judicial process. Ihe case, Dred Scott v. Sandford, resulted in one of the most far-reaching decisions in the history of the Supreme Court. It began in state courts in St. Louis, Missouri, in 1846 when abolitionists urged Dred Scott, a slave, to sue for his freedom because his owner, an army surgeon, had taken him to Illinois and then on to Fort Snelling in what is now Minnesota (then simply the northern tip of the Louisiana Purchase where the Missouri Compromise banned slavery). After living for years in free territory, his lawyers claimed, Scott had won his freedom.
In a series of trials and appeals, Scott’s case went back and forth. Scott lost the first time, but on retrial in state court in St. Louis, he won his freedom. The Missouri Supreme Court then overturned the decision on appeal in 1852 and returned Scott to slavery. Although the Missouri high court had previously found in favor of slaves who had lived in free territory, ideas were hardening across the South, and the court concluded that Missouri law governed the case even though Scott had been in federally controlled free territory for years. Scott’s lawyers appealed to the federal courts, and when the district court in Missouri decided against Scott, his lawyers appealed to the U.S. Supreme Court where the case was heard in 1856.
The Supreme Court also decided against Scott. The justices could have based their ruling on fairly narrow grounds. Instead, the majority used the case to make a larger legal point. Considerable (though behind the scenes) pressure was apparently brought to bear on the justices. Chief Justice Roger Taney, however, did not need pressure to speak his mind. On March 6, 1857, he spoke for a majority of the court. In a long and complex decision, Taney made two key points. First, as a black man (presumably even a free black man), Taney said that Scott had no rights that the United States needed to honor. Based on his reading of the Constitution, Taney said that black people “had no rights which a white man was bound to respect.” When two dissenting justices noted that blacks had actually been voters in five of the states that had ratified the Constitution in 1789, Taney countered that they might, indeed, “have all the rights and privileges of the citizen of a State,” but that they were “not entitled to the rights and privileges of a citizen in any other state.” This opinion seemed to directly contradict Article IV, Section 2, of the Constitution, which said, “The citizens of each state shall be entitled to all privileges and immunities of citizens in the several states,” but Taney ignored the clause and previous case law.
Second, Taney broadened the ruling. Scott had no standing to bring the case, the Chief Justice said, and even if he did have standing, he did not have a case. Fort Snelling was not actually free territory because the Missouri Compromise was unconstitutional. Congress did not have the right to bar slavery in any federal territories. Depriving slave owners of their slaves, he said, violated the Fifth Amendment that said no one could be deprived of life, liberty, or property without due process of law, and slaves were the private property of their owners. He did not say anything about the lives or liberties of enslaved people. But he did say that Congress “could not authorize a territorial government to exercise” any power to prohibit slavery.
>8 Part V Expansion, Separation, and a New Union, 1844-1877
The Court not only returned Scott to slavery but also ruled that Congress could not prohibit slavery in any federal territory under any circumstances. Abolitionists soon purchased Scott and set him and his wife free. But the decision seemed to lock millions of their fellow African-Americans either in slavery or in second-class status even if they were free.
The outcome thrilled Southern leaders. The proslavery Constitutionalist in Augusta, Georgia, editorialized that “Southern opinion upon the subject of Slavery... is now the supreme law of the land.” At the same time, many Northern Democrats were also delighted, seeing the decision as “the funeral sermon” of the new Republican Party. Many moderate Northerners, however, were outraged. William Cullen Bryant, editor of the New York Evening Post, wrote that Taney’s decision was a “willful perversion” of the Constitution. Republican leaders, especially Seward of New York and Lincoln of Illinois, attacked the decision as the result of a secret negotiation between the Chief Justice and President-elect James Buchanan. Lincoln also said that if the Taney policy stood, then the advocates of slavery would soon make it “lawful in all the States...North as well as South” He promised that, if a Republican were elected president in 1860, he would find a way to undo the decision. The lines between the pro- and antislavery camps were hardening, not only in Congress but also in the country as a whole.
B
Quick Review Why was the Dred Scott case a significant turning point in public opinion— North and South—in the years leading up to the Civil War? 133
THE ECONOMY, THE PANIC OF
AND THE LINCOLN-DOUGLAS DEBATES________________________________________________________________
Explain how the economic crisis of 1857 and the growing political crises of the decade impacted each other and led the nation to divide. Historians have long debated the degree to which economic issues, rather than arguments over slavery, caused the Civil War. The disagreements are nearly always ones of emphasis, but most agree that both issues—economic factors in the nation and debates over the morality of slavery—were factors.
The growth of the cotton economy between 1815 and 1860 tied the nation together, creating common interests among Southern slave-owning producers of cotton, Northern mill owners, and owners of ships that transported cotton to Britain. Abolitionist Senator Charles Sumner of Massachusetts despaired of a country dominated by the “lords of the lash and the lords of the loom.
Other economic forces, however, were dividing the country. Ihe opening of the Erie Canal in 1825 created an east-west trade axis from New England through New York and into the Midwestern states of Ohio, Indiana, and Illinois with connections through the Great Lakes to Michigan, Wisconsin, and even Minnesota. This trade network rivaled and then exceeded the trade down Mississippi River. In 1835, 95 percent of the trade in the Ohio Valley flowed south through New Orleans and only 5 percent through New York. But by 1850, more trade went from the Midwest to New York than to New Orleans. Midwesterners who before the mid-1830s saw their economic lives connected to the states that bordered the Mississippi were now much more connected to New York and New England and had little reason to care about the Southern states that had once been so important to them.
As the railroads were built, slowly in the 1820s and 1830s but much more rapidly in the 1840s and 1850s, they also followed the newer trade routes, linking the Midwest to the Northeast while other rail networks linked the interior of the South to Charleston and New Orleans. New settlement followed the trade
Chapter 13 The Politics of Separation 369
routes. More and more of the growing population of the upper Midwest came from New York and New England, the most antislavery regions of the country. In the 1850s, the new Republican Party reflected the interests of this fast-growing swath of the nation that stretched from New England into all of the Ohio River Valley and beyond to Indiana, Illinois, and Iowa. Most people in the region tended to be opposed to slavery, even if few were serious abolitionists. In addition, the Republican Party also spoke for their economic interests. John Sherman (brother of Civil War General William Tecumseh Sherman) began his political career as a Whig, but by 1854, he was elected to Congress as a Republican from an Ohio district on the shores of Lake Erie. Sherman said that while the Republican Party was born with “the immediate purpose and aim” of stopping the spread of slavery into the territories, it also supported an increase in the tariff to strengthen American industries; a homestead bill to encourage settlement of the new territories by people who wanted to build small family farms and who had no intention, or money, to bring slaves with them; land grant colleges that would serve agriculture and industry; and a transcontinental railroad that would link California to the East Coast. It was a good summary of what would become the Republicans’ economic program in the 1860s and 1870s, and it played well across the region.
However, neither that same economic program nor the Republicans’ opposition to the spread of slavery was seen as a benefit in the South, especially the Deep South. The pre-Civil War South was not an economic backwater. Indeed, it was the most prosperous part of the nation in the 1850s, but the prosperity could not be separated from cotton growing and slavery. As much as Southern cotton served as the raw material for New England mills, far more of it was shipped across the Atlantic to the larger mills in England. As much as the South was building railroads—often with slave labor—its rivers and extended coastline meant that water transport served the South better than the North. The Southern planter elite saw far less reason than most Northerners to support federal spending on canals
As the price of Midwestern wheat and goods produced in Pennsylvania and Ohio fell rapidly in 1857, panic hit the nation s financial center of New York's Wall Street. Newsboys sold extra editions of newspapers with
.	news brought by telegraph from around the country, and the papers were snapped up by fearful investors.
370 Part V Expansion, Separation, and a New Union, 1844-1877
or a federal tariff that protected Northern industries. Southern-leaning presidents from Polk in the 1840s to Pierce in the 1850s vetoed bills for internal improvement that most Northerners, regardless of political party, badly wanted.
The Panic of 1857 exacerbated the economic split between the regions. It was much more severe in the North than in the South. Overproduction of Northern wheat helped precipitate the panic. When the Crimean War, which had pitted Britain and France against Russia, ended in 1856, European farmers resumed full-scale wheat production, and prices for American wheat fell sharply. But the English mills continued to need Southern cotton, and the price of cotton held steady. Moreover, in the iron- and coal-producing areas of the country, Pennsylvania and Ohio, demand for steel fell, people lost their jobs, banks failed, and panic ensued. Not surprisingly the Republican platform of 1860 supported a tariff both to provide revenue for the government and to protect Northern industry. The platform solidified support for the Republicans, especially in Pennsylvania and New Jersey. It also showed how deeply these states were cut off from the interests of the South where the tariff raised the cost of manufactured goods but did nothing to keep the price of cotton high.
Panic of 1857
A banking crisis that caused a credit crunch in the North; it was less severe in the South, where high cotton prices spurred a quick recovery.
S
The Lincoln-Douglas Debates Define the Political Parties
On June 16, 1858, Abraham Lincoln spoke to the Republican State Convention in Springfield, Illinois, that had just nominated him as their candidate against Stephen A. Douglas for the U.S. Senate. Reflecting on the Fugitive Slave Act, the Kansas-Nebraska crisis, and the Dred Scott decision, Lincoln quoted the Bible—well known to all of the convention delegates—and told them: “A house divided against itself cannot stand.” He continued:
I believe this government cannot endure, permanently half slave and half/ree.
I do not expect the Union to be dissolved—I do not expect the house to fall— but I do expect it will cease to be divided.
It will become all one thing, or all the other.
Either the opponents of slavery, will arrest the further spread of it, and place it where the public mind shall rest in the belief that it is in the course of ultimate extinction; or its advocates will push it forward, till it should become alike lawful in all the States, old as well as new—North as well as South.
With all that had happened since 1850, Lincoln could see no other option. He begged his fellow Republicans to be sure the outcome was what they wanted. “Ihe result is not doubtful,” he concluded. “We shall not fail—if we stand firm, we shall not fail.” Some of the delegates who had just nominated Lincoln thought the speech was too radical and would hurt Lincoln in the fall elections but by 1858 he was prepared to stand firm on his ideas.
Later that summer, on August 21, 1858, Democratic Senator Stephan A. Douglas met Lincoln in Ottawa, Illinois, for the first of seven debates they held across Illinois in that election season. Douglas and Lincoln were campaigning to be elected by the Illinois legislature to represent the state in the U.S. Senate. They were also seeking to define the philosophy of their respective political parties. Hundreds attended their debates, and newspapers in every part of the country took their words to thousands of Americans. The debates were long and closely argued. Each sometimes spoke for 2 hours at a time. Ihe speeches and the responses were not sound bites, but carefully reasoned arguments that forced each leader to refine his views and the audience to follow them closely.
At the Ottawa debate, Douglas spoke first. He painted Lincoln and the Republican Party (Black Republicans Douglas called them) as allies of the most radical abolitionists. He attacked Lincoln’s “a house divided against itself’ speech. “Why can it not exist divided into Free and Slave States?” Douglas asked. “Washington, Jefferson, Franklin, Madison, Hamilton, Jay, and the great men of that day, made this government divided into Free States and Slave States, and left each State perfectly free to do as it pleased on the subject of slavery.
Chapter 13 The Politics of Separation 371
In the 1850s, Frederick Douglass, who had grown up in slavery, became one of the nation's best known abolitionist speakers. Even many who disagreed with, or were frightened by, his words admired his public speakving ability and his capacity to win many to the abolitionist cause.
13.3
Douglas also criticized Lincoln’s attack on the Dred Scott decision. Douglas said that he agreed with the decision and told his audience that Lincoln’s approach would fill Illinois with blacks who would “become citizens and voters, on an equality with yourselves.” He warned that Lincoln was trying to “array all the Northern States in one body against the South, to excite a sectional war between the Free States and the Slave States.” He and the Democrats, Douglas said, were the party of unity while Lincoln and the Republicans promised only civil war. In response, Lincoln declared that he was no abolitionist and that he had “no prejudice against Southern people.” He also said that he would not himself know how to quickly abolish slavery where it already existed and, indeed, would honor all of the South’s “constitutional rights,” to protect slavery. He would even support the Fugitive Slave Act if it “should not, in its stringency, be more likely to carry a free man into slavery.” But the issue for him, Lincoln said, was the spread of slavery in the territories. Lincoln said that he had no interest in “perfect social and political equality with the negro.” Douglas’s efforts to say that he did were a “fantastic arrangement of words, by which a man can prove a horse-chestnut to be a chestnut horse.” Lincoln also attacked Douglas’s belief in “popular sovereignty”: “When he invites any people, willing to have slavery, to establish it, he is blowing out the moral lights around us.”
The Republicans lost the campaign for the legislature, and therefore Lincoln lost the senatorial election of 1858 to Douglas. But the 1858 debates helped shape the core philosophies of the nation’s political parties. They also put in the spotlight two political rivals who would meet again in 1860.
Quick Review How did the various expressions about slavery—written, spoken, and acted—deepen the already profound split in the Union?
FROM JOHN BROWN TO THE SECESSION OF THE SOUTH
13.4
Analyze the political impact of John Brown's raid and why Lincoln won the presidential election of 1860 and the southern states then voted to leave.
Mason-Dixon Line
A line surveyed by Charles Mason and Jeremiah Dixon between 1763 and 1767 that settled the border between the then colonies of Pennsylvania and Maryland.
The year 1859 was an off year in American electoral politics. Regardless, in August, not far north of the Mason-Dixon Line that divided Pennsylvania from Maryland and thus free states from slave states, people in the small town of Chambersburg, Pennsylvania, suddenly turned their attention to the issue of slavery and abolition. One of the nations best-known abolitionists, Frederick Douglass, who had escaped from slavery on a Maryland plantation when he was a young adult and began his abolitionist career with William Lloyd Garrison, gave a speech in the Franklin County town. Both the town’s Democratic and Republican newspapers gave Douglass high marks as a speaker even though both said they disagreed with his views. But the speech was a cover for the real reason for Douglass being there. He had been summoned for a secret meeting with his old friend John Brown, who was a fugitive for his role in the violence in Kansas and who was living in Chambersburg under the name of Dr. Isaac Smith.
John Brown at Harper's Ferry
Douglass knew that Brown harbored dreams of sparking a slave uprising across the South. Until he met with him that August day in 1859, however, he had no idea how close Brown was to implementing his ideas. Years later, Douglass recounted their meeting while the two went fishing at an old quarry: “The taking of Harper’s Ferry, of which
72
PartV Expansion, Separation, and a New Union, 1844-1877
American Voices
Lydia Maria Child and Governor Henry A. Wise, Letters Regarding John Brown, 1859
* O/:
i
t/U^hen she heard of John Brown's raid and trial, Lydia Maria WW Child, a well-known Massachusetts abolitionist, defender of women's rights and the rights of American Indians, who was also a popular children's author, deplored the violence of Brown's effort but offered to go to Virginia to support him while he recovered from his wounds and awaited execution. Virginia Governor Henry A. Wise, known as a moderate, responded, offering Child protection in Virginia but also making it clear he held her and her fellow abolitionists guilty of inspiring Brown's violence. Their correspondence was published in Garrison's Liberator.
Wayland, Mass., Oct. 26th, 1859.
Governor Wise! ...Enclosed is a letter to Capt. John Brown. Will you have the kindness, after reading it yourself, to transmit it to the prisoner?
I and all my large circle of abolition acquaintances were taken by surprise when news came of Capt. Brown's recent attempt; nor do I know of a single person who would have approved of it had they been apprised of his intention. But I and thousands of others feel a natural impulse of sympathy for the brave and suffering man. Perhaps God, who sees the inmost of our souls, perceives some such sentiment in your heart also. He needs a mother or sister to dress his wounds, and speak soothingly to him. Will you allow me to perform that mission of humanity?...
I have been for years an uncompromising abolitionist, and I should scorn to deny it or apologize for it as much as John Brown himself would do. Believing in peace principles, I deeply regret the step that the old veteran has taken.... But... I will also say that if I believed our religion justified men in fighting for freedom, I should consider the enslaved everywhere as best entitled to that right. Such an avowal is a simple, frank expression of my sense of natural justice.
Yours, respectfully, L. MARIA CHILD.
Richmond, Va., Oct. 29th, 1859.
Madam: ...I will forward the letter for John Brown, a prisoner under our laws...for the crimes of murder, robbery and treason, which you ask me to transmit to him....
You ask me, further, to allow you to perform the mission "of mother or sister, to dress his wounds and speak soothingly to him." By this, of course, you mean to be allowed to visit him
in his cell, and to minister to him in the offices of humanity.	p-———
Why should you not be so allowed, Madam? Virginia and j Massachusetts are involved in no civil war, and the Constitution j
"which unites them in one confederacy" guarantees to you privi-	......
leges and immunities of a citizen of the United States in the State of Virginia. That Constitution I am sworn to support, and am, therefore, bound to protect your privileges and immunities as a citizen of Massachusetts coming into Virginia for any lawful and peaceful purpose.
Coming, as you propose, to minister to the captive in prison, you will be met, doubtless, by all our people, not only in a chivalrous, but in a Christian spirit...your mission being merciful and humane, will not only be allowed, but respected, if not welcomed....
I could not permit an insult even to a woman in her walk of charity among us, though it be to one who whetted knives of butchery for our mothers, sisters, daughters and babes. We have no sympathy with your sentiments of sympathy with Brown....His attempt was a natural consequence of your sympathy, and the errors of that sympathy ought to make you doubt its virtue from the defect on his conduct. But it is not of this I should speak. When you arrive at Charlestown, if you go there, it will be for the Court and its officers, the Commonwealth's attorney, sheriff and jailer, to say whether you may see and wait on the prisoner. But, whether you are thus permitted or not, (and you will be, if my advice can prevail,) you may rest assured that he will be humanely, lawfully and mercifully dealt by us in prison and on trial.
Respectfully, HENRY A. WISE
13.4
Source: Anti-Slavery Tracts, No. 1. New Series (Boston: American Anti-Slavery Society, 1860).
Thinking Critically
1.	Documentary Analysis
How would you describe the tone of the two letters? What might explain the authors' strenuous efforts to demonstrate respect for one another?
2.	Historical Interpretation
What light do these letters shed on regional tensions in the years before the Civil War? What values and beliefs do the authors appear to share? On what points are they divided?
Captain Brown had merely hinted before was now declared as his settled purpose.” Douglass thought Browns idea was crazy, would result in immediate defeat, and as “an attack upon the Federal government.. .would array the whole country against us.” Brown was not persuaded. Douglass left Chambersburg dejected and fearful, perhaps doubly so because the former slave Shields Green who had accompanied Douglass to the meeting had decided to stay with Brown. As he told Douglass, “I b’leve I’ll go wid de ole man.”
Chapter 13 The Politics of Separation 373
13.1
13 3 I
All that summer, Brown had been planning for his raid. In the fall, he moved from Chambersburg to a farmhouse in Maryland not far from Harper’s Ferry, where a lightly guarded federal arsenal stood at the junction of the Potomac and Shenandoah rivers. Brown and his army of 16 white and five black men began their attack on the evening of October 16, 1859. They were confident that the slaves of the region would rise up to join them. As they entered Harper’s Ferry, they cut telegraph lines and took hostages, but they were also quickly attacked. They were encircled by angry townspeople, and within hours, federal troops under the command of Robert E. Lee arrived in Harper’s Ferry. When Brown refused to surrender, the troops attacked, killing or capturing most of the rebels. Only a few escaped. Brown was wounded. He and the other captured fighters were tried on charges of insurrection and treason against the state of Virginia. The jury took less than an hour to find them all guilty, and they were sentenced to hang on December 2, 1859.
Brown used the 6 weeks between his arrest and execution effectively. His calm words and actions after the raid, much more than the raid itself, made him a hero in much of the North and a frightening figure in the South. At his trial, Brown told the court:
Now, if it is deemed necessary that I should forfeit my life for the furtherance of the ends of justice, and mingle my blood further with the blood of my children and with the blood of millions in this slave country whose rights are disregarded by wicked, cruel, and unjust enactments, I say, let it be done.
While in prison, Brown also managed to conduct interviews and write letters that were widely circulated. He told a reporter from the New York Herald, “You may dispose of me very easily...but this question is still to be settled—this negro question I mean— the end of that is not yet.”
This famous painting of John Brown on his way to the gallows, stopping to kiss a slave child, shows Brown as the hero to the antislavery cause, which is the way that many in the North were beginning to see him.
mansion, Separation, and a New Union, 1844-1877
374 Part
Immediately after the October raid, virtually everyone—Democrats, Republicans, even many abolitionists—condemned Brown as an insane fanatic. Soon, however, public opinion started to shift. In the North, Brown’s words and actions began to galvanize a wide spectrum of public opinion. People who initially dismissed him as insane started, much to their own surprise, to be swayed by his condemnation of slavery and—even more surprising to themselves—to consider his claim that violence might be needed to end it.
Henry David Thoreau’s “Plea for Captain John Brown” argued that Brown’s violence could not be compared with the violence of slavery. The pacifist William Lloyd Garrison criticized the raid but came to view it as “a desperate self-sacrifice for the purpose of giving an earthquake shock to the slave system.” Many Northerners concluded that Brown was a hero.
Northern sympathy for Brown sent a chill through the white South. With the emergence of the telegraph and faster printing presses, news traveled fast. Many Southerners became convinced that most Northerners were in league with radical abolitionists like Brown and with those slaves who harbored thoughts of revolt. Many in the South started to think that abolitionists really did want to promote a slave uprising. In response, much of the South quickly became an armed camp, and doubts about remaining in the Union began to grow.
The Election of 1860
The Republican Party that nominated Lincoln for the Senate in 1858 was still very new on a fast-changing political landscape. The first election that the new Republican Party contested had been in 1854 and resulted in a Republican Speaker of the House of Representatives. The Republicans, it seemed, were the party of the future. In contrast, the Democrat and the Whig parties had struggled with opposing members that included antislavery Northerners and proslavery Southerners. The Kansas situation had split both parties and was the death knell of the Whigs. They never again nominated a candidate for president.
By the 1856 presidential elections, the nation had three political parties, two of them new. The Democrats managed to continue as an uneasy coalition. The Republicans consolidated their strength in the North but were virtually nonexistent in the South.
A third party, the American Party, more commonly known as the Know Nothing Party, gained strength as anti-immigrant hysteria swept the country. The Democrats nominated James Buchanan from Pennsylvania whose prime strength seemed to be an exceeding vagueness about slavery and who had been seeking the presidency since serving as Polk’s secretary of state in the 1840s. The Republicans nominated war hero and adventurer John C. Fremont. And the Know-Nothings nominated former president Millard Fillmore. Fillmore carried only Maryland where anti-immigrant feelings were especially strong, while Fremont carried most of the most Northern states and Buchanan carried the South, including the more moderate parts of the South, plus Illinois, Indiana, and California, winning easily. If Buchanan entered the White House with any mandate in 1857, it was to avoid the issue of slavery. It was one the new president could not possibly fulfill, try though he did.
After 1856, the Know Nothing Party faded rapidly. Opposition to immigration did not have staying power as a political issue, especially when new immigrants provided the swing votes in key states like New York. Most Know-Nothings became Republicans in an uneasy alliance with the proimmigrant faction of the party. Republicans were also divided on just how far to go in embracing the abolitionists among them. As late as June 1859, Lincoln had begged Ohio Senator Salmon P. Chase to be sure that the Ohio Republican Party’s demand for “a repeal of the atrocious Fugitive Slave Law” not become an issue in the national Republican convention because “it will explode it.” But after 1857, it was the Democrats turn to divide as it became impossible for Northern moderates like Douglas and Southern extremists like Jefferson Davis to stay in the same political organization. Everyone
Chapter 13 The Politics of Separation 375
knew that the elections of 1860 were going to involve tough political contests. No one knew they would lead to war.
While the Lincoln-Douglas debates of 1858 established Abraham Lincoln as a national political leader, it was by no means certain that he would be the Republican nominee for president in 1860. Lincoln himself had mixed feelings about a presidential nomination since he had hopes of a career in the U.S. Senate. The frontrunner for nomination was New York Senator William Henry Seward, a former Whig and a founder of the Republican Party. But Seward also had many enemies, people who thought he was too radical or who just did not trust him. Many, including Lincoln, thought that if Seward did not get the nomination on the first ballot, his support would melt away. Two other prominent Republicans were also in the field—Governor Salmon Chase of Ohio, one of the party’s staunchest opponents of slavery, and Judge Edward Bates of Missouri, the candidate of the more moderate Republicans. And then there was Lincoln, respected by everyone, an extraordinary speaker, and more moderate than either Seward or Chase.
Lincoln’s convention manager, Judge David Davis, reported to Lincoln, “We are laboring to make you the second choice of all the Delegations we can, where we can’t make you first choice.” The strategy worked. While Seward took the lead on the first ballot, Lincoln—not Chase or Bates—came in second. By the third ballot, it was all over as delegates made Lincoln’s nomination unanimous. Of course, being the nominee of a new political party did not guarantee victory. Seward, Chase, and Bates all campaigned hard for Lincoln, and after the election, he appointed all three to his Cabinet as secretaries of state and treasury as well as attorney general. But in between the nomination and the victorious election, there was a hard-fought presidential campaign.
Given the tensions in the country in the summer of 1860, it is not surprising that traditional political parties splintered. A faction of the old Whig Party reemerged as the Constitutional Union Party. It nominated slaveholder John Bell of Tennessee for president and Edward Everett of Massachusetts for vice president on a vague platform of “the Constitution, the Union, and the Enforcement of the Laws” (presumably a reference to the Fugitive Slave Act). Some saw this small party as the best hope to hold the country together through new compromises. Others ridiculed them as the “Old Gentlemen’s Party,” since most of those who campaigned for Bell were well past age 60.
The Democrats, who had elected the last two presidents, met in Charleston, South Carolina, in April 1860. They were deeply divided. Stephen A. Douglas was the frontrunner for the nomination, but although Douglas had once been popular in the South, after his opposition to admitting Kansas as a slave state, most Southern political leaders now considered him to be a traitor to their cause. Mississippi Senator Jefferson Davis insisted on a platform that pledged the party to protect “the constitutional right of any citizen of the United States to take his slave property into the common territories. But Douglas’s supporters could not stomach abandoning their candidate’s long-held commitment to “popular sovereignty” and would not support a platform that opened all the territories to slavery regardless of what the voters said. After 57 ballots, the convention could not agree on any nominee and adjourned to meet again in Baltimore in 6 weeks to try again.
When the Democrats convened again in Baltimore, however, the same splits were evident. One-third of the delegates—nearly all of the Southerners and a few proslavery Northerners—walked out of the convention. The remaining Democrats nominated Douglas and adopted a popular sovereignty platform. The delegates who had walked out of the convention organized their own convention and nominated John C. Breckinridge of Kentucky, who was Buchanan’s vice president, adopting the platform advocated by Jefferson Davis. Southern Democrats understood that the split in the party would benefit the Republicans, but they were so angry with Douglas that they were willing to accept that result. Some also believed that a Republican victory would build support for their real goal, which was secession. A Democratic Party leader and former congressman, William Lowndes Yancey, told a crowd in Charleston that it was time for “a new revolution,” and “an Independent Southern Republic.”
Part V Expansion, Separation, and a New Union, 1844-1877
This political cartoon published during the 1860 presidential election depicts Lincoln and Douglas, on the left, fighting over much of the country while, in the center, Breckinridge tries to tear off the South and, on the right, Bell, with glue pot in hand, tries to put the whole thing back together.
13.1
132
132
13.4
The Republican ticket did not even appear on ballots in most of the South, and Republican candidates would have risked their lives campaigning in the region. Lincoln campaigned against Douglas in the North. Breckinridge campaigned against Bell in the South. No one had ever seen a presidential election quite like it. Despite the crazy split, the North, with its larger population, was going to settle the election. Douglas had a chance to win the election if he and the Northern Democrats could carry enough Northern states and some of the slave states known as “border states” where Northern influence was strongest and the attachment to slavery was weakest (see Map 13-2). Douglas claimed to be the only candidate who could unite the nation. He continued to paint Lincoln as a radical and tried to frighten Northern voters by saying that Lincoln would bring blacks into the North as the social equals of whites who would also compete with whites for jobs.
The Republicans had a lot going for them. They were new. They attracted young, first-time voters. They were united. Their economic policies appealed to many in the North. Even so, some abolitionists did not trust the Republicans. William Lloyd Garrison said that “the Republican party means to do nothing, can do nothing, for the abolition of slavery in the slave states.” Frederick Douglass, perhaps more of a realist, countered, saying that a Republican victory must and will be hailed as an anti-slavery triumph.”
On Election Day in November 1860, the breadth of the Republican victory was dear. Breckenridge carried most of the South. Bell won Virginia, Kentucky, and Tennessee. Although Douglas received far more votes than either Breckenridge Or Bell, he carried only Missouri and half the electoral votes of New Jersey. Lincoln received only 40 percent of the national popular vote, but it was the most of any single candidate, and his 180 electoral votes were a solid majority. As cheering crowds his hometown of Springfield, Illinois, celebrated, Abraham Lincoln, who had served one term in Congress and had never held an executive position, became the President-elect of the United States. What his election would mean for him and for country only time would tell. Few thought it would lead to a long and bloody war.
Chapter 13 The Politics of Separation 377
\'
UT4HTERR,T0l
KY
UNORGANIZED
TERRITORY
NEBRASKA ,TERRITORY
NEW MEXICO TERRITORY/
MINNESOTA
j x .......... f
KANSAS TERRITORY
INDIAN TERRITORY
Lincoln, Republican Douglas, Democratic (Northern) Breckinridge, Democratic (Southern) Bell, Constitutional Union
NEW HAMPSHIRE
(5) VERMONT ,
MASSACHUSETTS \ V MAINE (13) \ \ ,\ (8)
WISCONSIN	( RHODE
,SLAND > x (4)
IOWA
(4)
(5) MICHIGAN ) (8)
•4HO.J
T§)
ARK-
(UNORGANIZED, (4)
TEXAS
(4)
IND. OHIO
(11) ,O3V ^23 r '• ' X"1-VIRGINIA KY
TtNN(«)
MISS ALA-
\ (7) W
LOUISIANA
(8)
GA
(10)
CONNECTICUT (6)
NEW JERSEY
(4) DELAWARE (3)
MARYLAND
NORTH CAROLINA
(») SOUTH
CAROLINA
(6)
FLORIDA
(3)





/
MAP 13-2 The Election of 1860. This map, indicating the electoral vote of each state, illustrates the regional nature of the final vote in the 1860 presidential election. Lincoln carried all of the North as well as California and Oregon. Breckinridge, the southern Democrat, carried all of the Deep South and beyond. Bell, the candidate who called for glossing over all the differences, carried the key border states of Virginia, Kentucky, and Tennessee that Douglas had been counting on. In the end, Douglas carried only the slave state of Missouri and split the electoral votes of New Jersey with Lincoln.
As Alexander McClure, a prominent Pennsylvania attorney, wrote 40 years after the Civil War, “The North believed that the South was more bombastic than earnest in the threat of provoking civil war for the protection of slavery, and the South believed that Northern people were mere money-getters, ready to yield anything rather than accept fratricidal conflict.”
The Secession of the South
As some had predicted, Lincoln s election provided Southern secessionists with just the rationale they needed. Many Southerners, including moderates, were furious about Lincolns election. They saw the breadth of Northern support for a committed free-soil candidate as one more effort to exclude slavery from the territories. They also saw it as part of a larger pattern that included Northern failure to enforce the Fugitive Slave Act and Northern support for John Brown. The Charleston Courier editorialized that Lincolns election meant it was time for “a Southern Confederacy,” something “desired by all true hearted Southerners.”
The night after the election, a huge crowd of demonstrators in Charleston demanded action, and the South Carolina legislature called a special convention to consider secession. On December 20, 1860, the convention voted 169-0 in favor of dissolving “the union now subsisting between South Carolina and other states.” Other states in the Deep South followed. In January 1861, Mississippi, Florida, Alabama, Georgia, and Louisiana all voted to leave the Union, followed by Texas
378 Part V Expansion, Separation, and a New Union, 1844-1877
on February 1. None of the other states after South Carolina were unanimous in their votes, but over 80 percent of the delegates in each of these states voted for secession, which was probably a fairly accurate reflection of the opinions of the white male population. Nevertheless, a minority in most Southern states, even in the Deep South, preferred to wait and see what Lincoln would actually do, but as Louisiana Senator Judah P. Benjamin wrote, the “prudent and conservative men” of the South were not able “to stem the wild torrent of passion which is carrying everything before it.”
The reality was, however, that the demands of these “prudent and conservative men” of the South were for things to which Lincoln would not agree. When Kentucky Senator John Crittenden proposed the Crittenden Compromise to preserve the Union by extending the Missouri Compromise line to the Pacific and thus protect slavery in the New Mexico Territory and California, Lincoln refused to consider the compromise even though his close ally William Seward urged him to do so. As he had made clear in his various campaigns, he did not intend to abolish slavery where it existed, but he did not want to spread slavery any further. Lincoln had also come to believe that any effort at appeasement would do nothing to control slavery but would simply open the door for continuing demands. The pressing question in February and March of 1861 was about the slave states that had not yet voted to secede, the so-called border states that were closer to the North, less militant in their defense of slavery, and perhaps most likely to stay with the Union: Maryland, Arkansas, North Carolina, Delaware, Missouri and, most of all, the strategically placed states of Kentucky, Tennessee, and Virginia—the largest and most industrialized state in the South. Lincoln did not want to lose them, at least not all of them.
In the face of the secession crisis, the wait from November 1860 to the presidential inauguration in March 1861 seemed especially long. The outgoing Buchanan administration, never decisive, seemed more unsure of itself than ever. Rumors of a Southern invasion or an internal coup filled the capital. Many senators joined Seward and Crittenden in seeking a compromise that would avoid secession or war. Others in and out of Congress proposed all sorts of solutions, including even abolishing the office of president. The senators and representatives of the seven states that had voted to secede by February 1 packed their belongings, gave their farewell speeches, and left town to organize the government of the Confederate States of America—a project they accomplished with amazing speed at a 6-day convention in Montgomery, Alabama, where they drafted a temporary constitution and selected a provisional president and vice president. In the meantime, the rest of the country seemed frozen.
Although the states of the Deep South voted to leave the Union, conventions in Virginia, Arkansas, and Missouri did not vote on secession. North Carolina and Tennessee did not even hold conventions. But leaders in all of these states warned that any violence by the federal government against those states that had voted to leave the Union would force them to depart also. Some in the North seemed happy to see part of the South depart. The Chicago Tribune said that if South Carolina wanted to leave, “let her go, and like a limb lopped from a healthy trunk wilt and rot where she falls.” In New York, Horace Greeley’s Tribune said, “If the Cotton States shall become satisfied that they can do better out of the Union than in it, we insist on letting them go. However, secession angered others in the North.
One resident of Illinois wrote to Congress saying, We elected Lincoln, and are just as willing, if necessity requires, to fight for him. A resident of Ohio wrote that Lincoln “must enforce the laws of the U.S. states against all rebellion, no matter what the consequences.” Even Senator Sewards wife criticized her husbands efforts at compromise, telling him, “Compromise based on the idea that the preservation of the Union is more important than the liberty of nearly 4,000,000 human beings cannot be right.” While it is likely that many Northern white voters would have been willing to preserve the Union at the cost of 4 million people remaining in slavery, a good
Crittenden Compromise
A last-ditch effort at a compromise to amend the Constitution to protect slavery in states where it existed.
Chapter 13 The Politics of Separation 379
13.4
portion of Northerners—though far from all—seemed to be ready to fight rather than let the Union be dissolved. In that tense and uncertain situation, after months of waiting, Lincoln made his way from Springfield to Washington.
Abraham Lincoln was inaugurated as the 16th president of the United States on March 4, 1861. His inaugural address broke little new ground. He said that he considered secession illegal and that he would assert federal authority, especially over forts and other federal installations in the South. He insisted that he had no interest in interfering with slavery in the states where it existed. And he promised to enforce the Fugitive Slave Act while also asserting that he wanted stronger protection against free people being kidnapped in the name of enforcing the law. In closing, he made a poetic plea that the Union must be preserved:
We are not enemies, but friends. We must not be enemies. Though passion may have strained, it must not break our bonds of affection. The mystic chords of memory, stretching from every battle-field, and patriot grave, to every living heart and hearthstone, all over this broad land, will yet swell the chorus of the Union, when again touched, as surely they will be, by the better angels of our nature.
Northern response to the speech was mixed. Garrison’s Liberator noted that Lincoln’s insistence that free blacks needed protection from the Fugitive Slave Act represented the first time any president had spoken of citizenship rights for blacks—a direct contradiction of the Dred Scott decision. Other abolitionists were disappointed. Many moderates agreed with the Jersey City newspaper that said, “it was hardly possible for Mr. Lincoln to speak with more mildness.”
Confederate leaders did not see the speech as mild. Lincoln’s refusal to recognize the right of secession and his claim on the federal property in the South seemed to them to be a prelude to war. Two days after the speech, the Confederate Congress authorized a call for 100,000 troops. Lincoln did not respond by making any similar call of his own. One of his advisors, Orville H. Browning, had written to the president that it was “very important that the traitors shall be the aggressors.... [T]hen the government will stand justified, before the entire country, in repelling that aggression.” That policy was exactly the one Lincoln planned to follow.
Conflict seemed most likely to begin at Fort Sumter, a new federal installation guarding the harbor of Charleston, South Carolina. Sitting within view of the city where secession had begun, Fort Sumter was a dramatic symbol of federal authority in the heart of the Confederacy. The 80-man garrison was commanded by Major Robert Anderson, a former slaveholder from Kentucky, whose decades in the army had made him a devoted supporter of federal authority. Soon after their vote to secede from the Union in December 1860, South Carolina authorities demanded that outgoing President Buchanan remove the federal garrison and hand the fort over to them. In an uncharacteristic show of strength, Buchanan refused and tried to reinforce the fort in January 1861. South Carolina fired on the supply ship—but not the fort—and the ship turned back. By the time Lincoln came to office in March, Anderson was running low on supplies and knew he would have to either surrender or evacuate soon.
On April 6, after some hesitation, the new president announced that he was sending a supply ship with food and medicine, but not arms, to Fort Sumter. Jefferson Davis was not willing to allow the federal presence in what Davis now considered an independent country and ordered Pierre G. T. Beauregard, the officer in charge of Confederate troops in Charleston, to attack the fort. On April 12, 1861, at 4:30 a.m.> shore batteries in Charleston began to shell Fort Sumter and continued to do so for the next day and a half. On April 13, out of food and ammunition, Major Anderson surrendered. Anderson and the defending troops were allowed to leave, and they sailed to New York where they were greeted as heroes, but the Confederates had control of the fort. The Confederates had won the battle, but they had fired on the American flag and started a war.
Part V Expansion, Separation, and a New Union, 1844-1877
This popular illustration of the firing on Fort Sumter adds drama to the scene. Confederate guns did fire on the fort almost nonstop on April 12 and 13, and the fort's defenders, with very little ammunition, fired back on occasion before finally, out of food and ammunition, they surrendered on April 13.
President Lincoln declared that a state of insurrection existed and called on the state governors for 75,000 volunteers while also ordering the expansion of the regular army and navy and recalling some troops from the West. Ihe attack and Lincoln’s response brought unity—even if temporary—to most of the North. Stephen A. Douglas, though seriously ill, came to the White House to promise his support and then returned to Illinois to tell Democrats and Republicans that they owed undivided loyalty to the Union.
As the president focused on preserving the Union, some African-Americans and their supporters called the looming war “a White Man’s war.” Lincoln had made it clear, they said, that the fighting was to “save the union” not necessarily to free the enslaved. Nevertheless, some abolitionists saw an opportunity. Senator Charles Sumner of Massachusetts reminded Lincoln that “under the war power the right had come to him to emancipate the slaves.” Ihe black-owned Weekly Anglo-African told readers that the slaves “have a clear and decided idea of what they want—Liberty.” It would take time before the president or Northern public opinion would agree, but some supported the goal of emancipation from the first days of the war, especially slaves who followed the news closely.
Lincoln’s call for federal troops united the South. Tennessee’s governor announced that his state “will not furnish a single man for the purpose of coercion, but fifty thousand if necessary for the defense of our rights and those of our Southern brothers.” Within days of the firing on Fort Sumter and Lincoln’s call for hoops, every border state had begun to consider secession and four—Virginia, North Carolina, Tennessee, and Arkansas—voted to join the Confederacy. Ihe 88 to 55 vote to secede in Virginia was far from South Carolina’s unanimity, and the western counties of Virginia later declared their loyalty to the Union. Representatives from that area took Virginia’s seats in Congress until West Virginia could be organized as a separate state in 1863.
Missouri had its own civil war that started with mob violence in St. Louis where most German immigrants favored the Union cause while recent arrivals from the South supported the Confederacy. Ihe Confederate government admitted Missouri as its 12th state, but Union loyalists also organized their own state government. Two opposing Missouri state governments sent representatives to both Washington and Richmond while lawlessness reigned in most of the state throughout the war.
Chapter 13 The Politics of Separation 381
13 2
132
132
13.4
Kentucky declared neutrality. Since there was probably more proslavery and pro-Confederacy sentiment in Kentucky than in any other slave state that remained in the Union, Lincoln courted the state carefully. If Kentucky seceded, the border between the United States and the Confederacy would be the Ohio River, dangerously far north. If Kentucky stayed in the Union, then Lincoln and his generals would have much easier access to multiple points of attack on the heartland of the Confederacy. Given its strategic importance, Lincoln was reported to have said that “he hoped to have God on his side, but he must have Kentucky.” He got Kentucky. Ihe state did not secede, and sentiment for preserving the Union was strong in that state, though Kentucky sent soldiers to both sides. Perhaps more than anywhere else, the Civil War in Kentucky was a war of brother against brother. Four of Henry Clay s grandsons fought for the Confederacy and three for the Union.
Ihe other two border states also remained loyal to the Union: Delaware’s northerly location and the few slaves there made the decision almost inevitable. Maryland’s loyalty to the Union was assured by the influx of federal troops and Lincoln’s arrest of some pro-Confederacy members of the state legislature. If Maryland had joined the Confederacy, Washington would have been cut off from the rest of the country, and Lincoln was not going to let that happen. Thus Maryland, Delaware, and Kentucky remained as slave states within the Union throughout the duration of the war while Virginia and Missouri were represented in both the Union and Confederate congresses. After Union victories in Louisiana and Arkansas, those states were also represented in the U.S. Congress by one set of people while others represented them in the Confederate Congress.
Despite Lincoln’s success in retaining some of the border states, the loss of others, especially Virginia, was a severe blow to the Union. Over half of all those who fought in the Confederate Army came from border states, including several of the South’s most prominent generals. On the day Virginia voted to secede, Robert E. Lee was offered command of the Union army but responded, “I cannot raise my hand against my birthplace, my home, my children.” Lee resigned from the U.S. Army and eventually commanded the Confederate Army of Northern Virginia. Almost as important, Virginia included the Tredegar Iron Works in Richmond, the only factory in the South capable of making heavy shells and armor, and the federal arsenal at Harper’s Ferry and the Gosport Navy Yard. All of these facilities were in Confederate hands by the end of April.
Even after the attack on Fort Sumter and the secession of the border states, many doubted that a real war would take place. People in the North were confident that the South would come to its senses, perhaps after an easy Union conquest of Richmond, Virginia. People in the South were confident that the North was not really up for a fight, certainly not a fight to end slavery where it had existed for over 200 years and probably not a fight to save the Union either. Both sides were terribly wrong.
13.4
Quick Review How did Lincoln's election impact the thinking of people in the South and, therefore, the course of U.S. history?
CONCLUSION
Throughout the 1850s, divisions between the North and the slaveholding South intensified despite efforts of some politicians on both sides to keep growing tensions in check. The burning question that continually threatened to divide the nation-would slavery be permitted to expand into new territories and states—could not be amicably decided.
Attempts by Southerners to defend the institution of slavery, and to ensure that slavery could expand into new states in the West, were met by growing choruses of antislavery sentiment in the North. Once-moderate opponents of slavery hardened their positions against the South as the events of the decade unfolded. Abolitionism,
382 PartV Expansion, Separation, and a New Union, 1844-1877
whose adherents saw slavery as an evil that had to be destroyed, continued to grow in force, and many in the North, regardless of their opinions about racial equality, simply did not want the future of the country to be defined by slave labor. Slave labor, if it were allowed to exceed the confines of the South, would undermine the value of the “free labor” ideology of the North.
California’s application for statehood endangered the balance of power in the Senate between the North and the South. In an effort to find a new middle ground, the Compromise of 1850, originally planned by the aging Senator Henry Clay of Kentucky, admitted California to the Union as a free state but gave Southerners several incentives for resisting secession, including a new, strengthened Fugitive Slave Act. But the Fugitive Slave Act infuriated many in the North, and Northern reluctance to enforce the law infuriated many in the South, even people who themselves did not hold slaves.
The Compromise of 1850 did not save the Union for long. Harriet Beecher Stowe’s 1852 novel, Uncle Tom's Cabin, written in response to her own anger about the Fugitive Slave Act, may have seemed to be a romanticized version of events to some, but it brought the reality of the pain of slavery home to many in the North. It quickly became a best seller and inflamed public opinion. When Congress passed the Kansas-Nebraska Act in 1854 in an effort to organize a government for the previously Unorganized Territory between Minnesota and Oregon, the legislation provided new opportunities for slavery to spread, even in regions north of the geographical divide between free and slave that had been established by the Missouri Compromise in 1820. The result was not only national tension but a civil war in Kansas so bloody that the territory came to be known as “Bleeding Kansas.” In 1857, the Supreme Court’s landmark decision in Dred Scott v. Sandford triggered further outrage in the North when it declared that the federal government had no authority to regulate the spread of slavery in any of the territories. In that same year, the Panic of 1857, which hit the North far more than the South, illustrated how distinct the two regions had become in their economies. Later, Southerners were outraged by Northern sympathy for the radical actions of John Brown when he attacked the federal arsenal at Harper s Ferry, Virginia (now in West Virginia but then part of the state of Virginia), in 1859. These events deepened sectional tensions and rivalries. As the nation responded, a new political party, the Republican Party, emerged, and an established political party, the Whigs, dissolved. At the same time, Abraham Lincoln gained national prominence as he campaigned first for a U.S. Senate seat and then for the presidency. With Lincoln’s election to the presidency in 1860, tensions came to a head: a majority of Southern states seceded from the Union and civil war, which many hoped and expected would be short, began.
C HI RE
What areas of conflict between North and South led to the Civil War? What do most historians consider to be the single most important cause of the war? Why?
Chapter 13 The Politics of Separation 383
Chapter 13 Chapter Review
13.1
FROM UNION TO DISUNION__________________________________
Analyze the political jockeying in Congress and how reaction to the Fugitive Slave Act and the publication of Uncle Tom's Cabin, changed the opinions of many Americans—South and the North—making a break between them hard to avoid.
Review Questions
1.	Historical Interpretation
What light does the debate over the admission of territories acquired by the United States at the conclusion of the War with Mexico shed on the root issues dividing the North and South in the decades before the Civil War?
2.	Crafting Arguments
How did passage of the Kansas-Nebraska Act contribute to the rise of the Republican Party and the demise of the Whigs?
3.	Crafting Arguments
How did the Fugitive Slave Act of 1850 affect public opinion about slavery in the North? How would you explain the impact of the law?
BLEEDING KANSAS AND DRED SCOTT V. SANDFORD
Analyze the causes and consequences of the battle over slavery in Kansas and the Supreme Court's decision in the Dred Scott case and the impact of those events on public opinion.
Review Questions
4.	Contextualization
Why did both pro- and antislavery forces believe that victory in Kansas was critical to their cause?
132
13.3
5.	Crafting Arguments
Why did the Supreme Court ruling in the Dred Scott case make a peaceful resolution of the conflict between the North and the South over slavery less likely?
THE ECONOMY, THE PANIC OF
AND THE LINCOLN-DOUGLAS DEBATES
Explain how the economic crisis of 1857 and the growing political crises of the decade impacted each other and led the nation to divide.
Review Question
6.	Contextualization
What light do the Lincoln-Douglas debates shed on Lincoln's views on slavery and race in 1858?
FROM JOHN BROWN TO THE SECESSION OF THE SOUTH
Analyze the political impact of John Brown's raid and why Lincoln won the presidential election of 1860 and southern states then vote to leave the Union?
Review Questions
7.	Historical Interpretation
How did John Brown’s 1859 raid on Harper’s Ferry help radicalize public opinion in both the North and the South?
8.	Crafting Arguments
Defend or refute the following statement: “After Lincoln’s election in November 1860, war between the North and the South was inevitable.”
13.4
384 Part V Expansion, Separation, and a New Union, 1844-1877
Demonstrate an understanding of the strategies involved in fighting a civil war and the impact of the war on American life—North and South.
1861-1865
North and South, men volunteered with enthusiasm to serve in their respective armies.These new Confederate soldiers, like their Northern counterparts, reflect a commitment that did not always last as the long years of fighting the war continued. Homer, Winslow (1836-1910.) Prisoners form the Front. 1866. Oil on canvas, 24x38 in. (61 x 96.5 cm). Gift of Mrs. Frank B,
Porter, 1922 (22.207). Metropolitan Museum of Art, New York, NY, U.S.A. Image copyright ©The Metropolitan Museum of Art. Image source: Art Resource, NY
Once Fort Sumter had been fired on, large patriotic rallies were held North and South. Of course, what it meant to be patriotic varied depending on where one lived. Calls for volunteers by Confederate and Union authorities were quickly oversubscribed. Young men did not want to miss out on the fun and glory of what everyone thought would be a short war and an easy victory. A Confederate volunteer from Mississippi wrote home in June 1861 that he was ready “to fight the Yankees-all fun and frolic.” On the Union side a New York volunteer wrote “I and the rest of the boys are in fine spirits.. .feeling like larks.
Letters from new recruits also showed seriousness of purpose. A New
Jersey soldier wrote that he joined the army because Our glorious institutions are likely to be destroyed,” while a Midwestern recruit said that his service was “a duty I owe to my country and to my children to do what I can to preserve this government.” Sentiment among soldiers in the Confederacy was equally patriotic. Mississippi’s Lucius Lamar, who would achieve high rank in the Confederate army, said, “Thank God! We have a country at last to live for, to pray for, to fight for, and if necessary to die for.” An enlisted man in the Confederate army gave a simple answer when he was asked after his capture why he, a nonslaveholder, fought for the South, “I’m fighting because you’re down here.” Soldiers were sent off in new uniforms with cheering parades. The war did not long remain so lighthearted.
LEARNING OBJECTIVES
FORT SUMTER TO ANTIETAM,
1861 -1862 Explain how the early battles of the war shaped future events.
THE ROAD TO EMANCIPATION
Analyze how the war influenced attitudes toward slavery in white and black communities, leading to the Emancipation Proclamation and to black soldiers in the Union army.
THE HOME FRONT—SHORTAGES, OPPOSITION, RIOTS, AND BATTLES
Explain how the war's death toll and civilian shortages affected life—North and South—during the war.
FROM GETTYSBURG TO APPOMATTOX AND BEYOND
Analyze the strategies and costs of fighting a long and terrible war.
14.1
14J
14.3
14.4
Chapter 14 And the War Came: The Civil War 385
lL-
Significant Dates
!
1861	Confederate States of America organized Abraham Lincoln inaugurated
Fort Sumter surrenders
Slaves who come to Union army declared "contraband of war"
Confederates win First Battle of Bull Run
1862	Monitor vs. Merrimack sea battle
Union army wins Battle of Shiloh, Tennessee
Union navy captures New Orleans
Second Battle of Bull Run, Confederate victory protects Richmond Union victory at Antietam
1863	Emancipation Proclamation takes effect Richmond Bread Riots
Fall ofVicksburg
Battle of Gettysburg, Union victory protects Washington, DC New York City Draft Riots
1864	Battle of the Wilderness
Atlanta falls to Sherman's army, beginning of Sherman's March to the Sea Farragut wins Mobile, Alabama Lincoln reelected
1865	Congress passes 13th Amendment outlawing slavery
Lee surrenders at Appomattox Court House
Lincoln assassinated
This chapter traces life in the United States through the 4 years of the Civil War. The battles that were fought over those 4 long years determined the war s outcome. But the fighting also helped shape public opinion. No one, North or South, was prepared for the terrible death toll of the war, and the fear of being killed or losing loved ones haunted almost everyone in the United States during the Civil War. Ideas were also changing throughout the nation as the war continued. Many in the North who started fighting a war to save the Union went through periods of wondering whether it might be better to just let the South go and then ended up fighting to end slavery. Many in the South—slaveholders and nonslaveholders alike—who started out fighting to preserve their independence from Northern influence slowly became resigned to a different fate even if they never stopped resenting the reality that the war created. And many who began the war as enslaved people, officially “owned” by other human beings, ended the war as free citizens, many of them veterans of the Union army that had won their freedom. The Civil War changed all of subsequent U.S. history, and its impact is important to understand.
FORT SUMTER TO ANTIETAM,
1861-1862___________________________________ Explain how the early battles of the war shaped future events.
14.1
After Fort Sumter surrendered in mid-April, no further serious battles occurred for the next 2 months as each side sought to understand the others goals and strategy. Both governments raised and positioned their armies. The Confederates had only to fight a defensive war to protect their territory. They did not need to win victories in the North, only protect their lands to win what they wanted. The North, however, needed to defeat the Confederate army to reunite the nation. As the war began, the commander of the Union armies was the aging hero of the War with Mexico, General Winfield Scott. He proposed what came to be known as the Anaconda Plan to blockade the South by sea, take control of the Mississippi River, and slowly squeeze the Confederacy into submission—as an anaconda snake squeezed its victim—without a full-scale invasion of the region that he thought would be too bloody and lead to generations of hatred no matter what the outcome. But many Northerners believed that the North needed to defeat the Confederates on Confederate turf.
Union generals wanted a lot of time to prepare supplies and train recruits. In Lincoln’s opinion, his generals always wanted more time—until Grant took command much later in the war. When General Irvin McDowell, commander of the Union forces in 1861, complained that he had only green recruits, the president responded, “[Y]ou are green, it is true, but they are green, also; you are all green alike. For Lincoln, a quick attack on the Confederacy, especially if Richmond could be taken, would mean victory. No one was yet thinking of a long war.
rebel yell
A frightening yell that Confederate soldiers gave when entering battle. Many Northern troops commented on how unnerving it could be.
Early Inconclusive Battles
The first serious battle of the war took place on July 21, 1861 (see Map 14-1). At Lincolns prodding, McDowell, with 18,000 troops, finally advanced fro® Washington across the Potomac River into Virginia. The army was accompanied by Northern reporters, members of Congress, and others who thought it would be the one time they would see a battle. Confederate commander Pierre Beauregard was alerted to the Union army s movement by Confederate spies in Washington. The armies met at the small town of Manassas, Virginia, on Bull Run Creek. (Northerners called it the First Battle of Bull Run, Southerners the Battle of Manassas.) Union troops, tired from the long march from Washington, started to surround the Confederate forces, but the Confederates held their ground. In an afternoon charge, Confederates let out the scream that came to be known as the rebel yell. One Northerner said “There is nothing
386 Part V Expansion, Separation, and a New Union, 1844-1877

Soldiers on both sides, like these Union soldiers in camp, spent most of the first months of the war either in training or sitting in camp and waiting. Note the one African-American off to the side. This early in the war, African-Americans were not yet in uniform, but that would soon change.
like it on this side of the infernal region.” The Union troops began to flee, merging with panic-stricken civilians who ran back to the relative safety of Washington, DC.
The Battle of Manassas, or First Bull Run, was a clear Confederate victory. It gave the Confederates great, perhaps even dangerously high, levels of confidence. Confederate newspapers asked why their generals had not gone on to capture Washington, though in fact McDowell had done a good job of developing the defense of the capital. Northerners were despairing. Horace Greeley, who had done much to stir up support for the war, now wrote to Lincoln, “If it is best for the country and for mankind that we make peace with the rebels, and on their own terms, do not shrink even from that.” Lincoln had no intention of taking that action, but the president now realized that it would take more than a few easy battles to win the war. Perhaps Mary Boykin Chesnut, the plantation wife who was deeply devoted to the Southern cause but never blind to reality, best understood the impact of the first battle when she wrote that she feared this early victory “lulls us into a fooTs paradise of conceit.
Lincoln responded to the loss at Bull Run by calling for 1 million new volunteers. He fired several Union generals, including the unlucky McDowell, reorganized the army on the Maryland-Virginia line as the Army of the Potomac—which would remain the prime Union army throughout the war—and appointed George B. McClellan to command it. He tightened federal control in Washington and Maryland. In addition, he reorganized federal troops in the West as a separate army, with orders to proceed down the Mississippi River and try to divide the Confederacy. The country was in for a long war.
Although some in the South were clamoring for Confederate troops to march north and defeat the “damn Yankees,” Jefferson Davis believed that the key to Confederate victory was doing what George Washington had done in the Revolution: simply survive. In time, he hoped, Northern opinion would tire of war and foreign governments would recognize the South.
Many in the South were confident that Britain would support them because of British need for Southern cotton. But they underestimated abolitionist opinion in Britain-which had abolished slavery in its own colonies in the 1830s-and the
Army of the Potomac
The main Union army led by a series of generals until Ulysses S. Grant took command in 1863 and led it to the final victory in 1865.
Chapter 14 And the War Came: The Civil War 387
MAP 14-1 Major Civil War Battles, 1861-1862. As this map shows, during the first 2 years of the war,the major battles took place in northern Virginia, where the Confederacy tried to defend its capital of Richmond and Union forces defended Washington, DC, and in the Mississippi River valley.
Part V Expansion, Separation, and a New Union, 1844-1877
caution of the British government, which wanted to “keep quite clear of the conflict.” Some owners and workers in the cotton mills in Manchester and Liverpool wanted a Confederate victory, but overall, British opinion was opposed to slavery. In the end, Britain stayed neutral.
General McClellan was a first-rate organizer, and he trained the Union army well. Ihe Army of the Potomac became a strong fighting force. Nevertheless, McClellan was never quite ready to fight. In one meeting with Lincoln, the general made but one request, “Just don’t let them hurry me, is all I ask.” By October 1861, McClellan was in command of 120,000 soldiers. The Confederate Army in Virginia was about 45,000 strong, but McClellan was sure it included at least 150,000 soldiers. Considering the possibilities for terrible loss of life, McClellan’s caution is understandable. For Lincoln, however, that kind of caution would result only in the end of the Union.
By December 1861, there had been no major land battle since Bull Run. The cost of maintaining and supplying an army was still high, however, much higher than the expenditures of any previous peacetime government had been. Secretary of the Treasury Salmon Chase reported difficulty balancing the federal budget. The London Times reported “the independence of the South virtually established.” Then McClellan got sick. In January 1862, a discouraged Lincoln said, “The people are impatient; Chase has no money;.. .The General of the Army has typhoid fever. The bottom is out of the tub. What shall I do?”
The U.S. Navy Takes Control of Southern Rivers and Ports
The Union cause was not as bleak as Lincoln feared. Although the North and South began the war with more or less equal size armies, the North had a much stronger navy. As early as August 1861, the U.S. Navy attacked Confederate fortifications on the Atlantic and Gulf coasts. By November, the Union controlled the sea islands off South Carolina and, not incidentally, some 10,000 slaves who had been left behind by fleeing plantation owners. With the U.S. Navy attacking Southern coastal fortifications and beginning a blockade of Southern ports early in the war, the South was losing access to the Atlantic. By April 1862, only the ports of Charleston, South Carolina; Wilmington, North Carolina; and Savannah, Georgia, were still open. From these ports, the South sent fast blockaderunning ships to maintain contact with the rest of the world, getting supplies from the Bahamas, Bermuda, and Cuba as well as from Britain and France, but at high cost.
The closing of its ports by the U.S. Navy also led the Confederacy to build a new kind of ship. At the Tredegar Iron Works in Virginia, armor plates were placed on a salvaged ship that had been the U.S.S. Merrimack but was renamed the C.S.S. Virginia. The Virginia also had 10 well-protected guns and an iron ram that could sink wooden ships. While the North celebrated the early naval victories, word of a new Southern ironclad led the U.S. Navy to plan for a similar ship. An eccentric designer, John Ericsson, proposed a strange but potentially powerful design for an ironclad that looked like a floating raft that had a revolving gun turret with two 11-inch guns. His ship was named the Monitor. When the C.S.S. Virginia sank two Union ships off the mouth of the James River, the Navy ordered the Monitor to proceed south from the Brooklyn Navy Yard without even time for a test run. On March 9, 1862, the crew of the Virginia saw something they thought “was a raft” taking one of the Navy ships boilers “to shore for repairs,” but then the boiler started firing at them. After hours of firing and maneuvering, the Virginia returned to port, and each side declared victory. The two ships never fought again—the crew of the Virginia blew up their ship rather than let it fall into Northern hands when the Union army invaded Virginia in May 1862, and the Monitor sank in a gale. But naval warfare had changed forever as the two ships showed that ironclads could easily defeat a wooden-hulled navy. For the remainder of the Civil War, however, fast wooden ships continued as best they could to keep the Confederacy supplied with war material by outrunning the U.S. Navy, and the U.S. Navy blockaded most Southern commerce.
14.1
Chapter 14 And the War Came: The Civil War 389
14.1
The seagoing ironclad ships, the Virginia (formerly the Merrimack) and the Monitor fought one battle in March 1862, but the Union Navy's smaller ironclad riverboats, like the one shown here, did more to turn the tide of the war as they attacked Confederate fortifications all along the Mississippi River and its tributaries.
In early 1862, the U.S. Navy also won important battles on the Mississippi River. Cairo, Illinois, where the Ohio River flows into the Mississippi, was the southernmost city under Union control. South of Cairo, the Confederacy controlled the Mississippi as well as the Cumberland and Tennessee Rivers that flowed into it. The navy commander at Cairo was Andrew H. Foote, a sober abolitionist, while the army commander was the hard-drinking Ulysses S. Grant, who had given little thought to abolition before the war. Together, they attacked the South’s rivers. On February 6, 1862, Union forces overwhelmed Confederate Fort Henry, and Union gunboats turned the Tennessee River into a Union thoroughfare. Grant became a hero. The Union controlled most of Kentucky and Tennessee. Southern optimism disappeared.
In April 1862, a fleet commanded by David G. Farragut got past a string of Confederate forts and took New Orleans, the largest city in the South, which remained in Union hands for the duration of the war. Farragut’s ships moved up the Mississippi, capturing Baton Rouge and Natchez by the end of June. Only Vicksburg on high bluffs over the Mississippi River prevented complete Union control of the river, which would have cut the Confederacy in half.
The Beginning of a Long War
While the Union navy won battles, General Grant led 40,000 troops in an attack on Corinth, Mississippi. Corinth was where the South’s major north-south and east-west rail lines crossed, and Grant meant to disrupt the network. Before Grant’s forces got to Corinth, however, Southern forces attacked the Union army near Shiloh Church in Tennessee on April 6. In 2 days of terrible fighting, Grant won, but at a high cost of killed or wounded troops—13,047 for the Union and 10,699 for the Confederates.
Shiloh undermined morale in both armies. A Confederate private wrote, “I never realized the pomp and circumstance’ of the thing called glorious war until I saw this... .Men. • • lying in every conceivable position; the dead.. .with their eyes wide open, the wounded begging piteously for help.” Union General William T. Sherman said, “The scenes on this field would have cured anybody of war.” The cost of the Union victory at Shiloh convinced many that it would be a long and terrible war. Mary Boykin Chesnut wrote in her diary, “I have nothing to chronicle but disasters.” Nevertheless, by May 1862, Union forces had won control of several Southern rivers and cities, disrupted the Southern rail system, and taken many prisoners. Grant, however, would spend the next year stalled at Vicksburg.
Part V Expansion, Separation, and a New Union, 1844-1877
390
With Union victories in the west, Lincoln urged McClellan to attack the Confederate forces in the east. The Confederate Army of Northern Virginia was the South’s elite force, assigned to protect the capital of Richmond, Virginia, and the essential supply sources nearby. McClellan landed troops on the Virginia coast to march up the peninsula—hence the name the Peninsular Campaign of 1862—to capture Richmond. With 135,000 troops, he seemed poised for victory. But McClellan moved slowly, with great caution, driving Lincoln to distraction.
In May and June 1862, Confederate General Stonewall Jackson defeated Northern forces in the Shenandoah Valley and kept Knoxville and much of east Tennessee in Confederate hands. It was an area filled with Northern sympathizers. But Jackson kept winning. Northern troops had had to be diverted from the attack on Richmond to deal with Jackson, whose troops had captured badly needed food and medical supplies.
At the end of May, Union and Confederate forces fought a series of inconclusive engagements at the Chickahominy River only a few miles from Richmond. Jefferson Davis made Robert E. Lee commander of the Army of Northern Virginia, a move that almost turned the tide of war. Lee forced McClellan to pull back from Richmond to the James River. The costs of the war were getting higher. General D. H. Hill, whose unit Lee had ordered to attack Union forces at Malvern Hill on July 1, said of the result, it “was not war—it was murder.” Some 20,000 Confederates had been killed or wounded, twice as many as in the Union army, but Lee kept up the pace.
At the end of August 1862, Union and Confederate armies met again at Manassas on Bull Run Creek where the South had won its first victory a year before. The Confederates, led by Lee and Jackson, again defeated the Union army, which pulled back into northern Virginia. At the beginning of the summer, Union soldiers could hear the church bells of Richmond. By the end of August, Richmond was safe, and the Confederate army was within 20 miles of Washington, DC. It was a major reversal of fortunes.
Army of Northern Virginia
The main Confederate army led for most of the war by Robert E. Lee, it fought in Virginia, Maryland, and Pennsylvania before surrendering at Appomattox Court House in April 1865.
142
143
144
By the fall of 1862, Lee and Jefferson Davis wanted a decisive win as badly as Lincoln had. The Confederate army planned to encircle Washington, DC. At Antietam Creek near Sharpsburg, Maryland, McClellan attacked Lee’s army on September 17, 1862. The result was the single bloodiest day of the war with approximately 23,000 soldiers killed or wounded—four times the number of U.S. soldiers killed or wounded on D-Day in World War II. Neither side could claim victory at Antietam, but neither side was defeated. The next day, Lee withdrew his army to the relative safety of the Shenandoah Valley in Virginia, but McClellan did not pursue Lee’s retreating forces, which was the last straw for Lincoln. When a month later McClellan still had not moved and reported that he needed to rest his horses before any attack, Lincoln telegraphed, “Will you pardon me for asking what the horses of your army have done since the battle of Antietam that fatigue anything?” It was the end of the president’s patience, and he relieved McClellan of command.
14.1
Quick Review Why were early Union Army generals so reluctant to fight as hard as Lincoln wanted? Why was the Navy so important to the North's ultimate victory?
14.2
THE ROAD TO EMANCIPATION
Analyze how the war influenced attitudes toward slavery in white and black communities, leading to the Emancipation Proclamation and to black soldiers in the Union army.
Lincoln had long insisted that although he personally thought slavery evil, it was not the role of the national government to interfere with the settled institutions of states. Soon after his election, he wrote to former Congressman Alexander Stephens of Georgia, who was trying to convince his state not to secede:
Do the people of the South really entertain fears that a Republican administration would, directly, or indirectly, interfere with their slaves, or with them, about their slaves? If they do, I wish to assure you, as once a friend, and still,
I hope, not an enemy, that there is no cause for such fears.
After he had assumed office, and even after the fighting began, Lincoln kept restating the same position.
Once the Southern states began to secede, his top priority was to hold the Union together with or without slavery. As late as August 1862, Lincoln wrote to Horace Greeley, knowing that his words would be published in the New York Tribune, insisting, “My paramount object in this struggle is to save the Union, and is not either to save or destroy slavery.” He closed the letter noting that this was his official position but that he also intended “no modification of my oft-expressed personal wish that all men everywhere could be free.” But his official position was evolving, and some historians would argue so were his personal views.
Contraband of War
While Lincolns views were evolving, slaves and former slaves were clear on what they wanted from the war. Only a month into the Civil War, on May 23, 1861, three slaves found their way to the Union-held Fortress Monroe in Virginia and asked the fort’s commander, General Benjamin F. Butler, for his protection. Butler, needing workers, put them to work. He also coined a term for escaped slaves who came behind Union lines: “contraband of war.”
Since American law then defined slaves as private property, and since international law allowed belligerent nations to seize goods and property meant to help the other side wage war, there was logic to Butler’s new term. If slaves were property that the Confederacy planned to use against the Union, then the Union had a right to seize that property. Throughout much of the war, slaves who fled to the Union army were
392 Part V Expansion, Separation, and a New Union, 1844-1877
14
known as contrabands. There were contraband camps” and “contraband schools.” Word of Butler s decision spread rapidly. More slaves started coming to Fortress Monroe, which some now called freedom fort. Lincoln was not yet ready to set firm policy, but Butler s policy was approved, and Fortress Monroe continued to be a haven for escaping slaves.
Nevertheless, federal authorities—including new officials appointed by Lincoln— continued to enforce the Fugitive Slave Act in the District of Columbia, and some generals returned slaves to their rightful” owners. With no national policy to guide him, General John C. Fremont, the head of the U.S. Army in Missouri, announced that his troops would emancipate any slave belonging to a Confederate supporter. This announcement infuriated Lincoln because he believed that he—and not one of his generals—should decide an issue as weighty as emancipation.
Lincoln pressed for compensated emancipation in which the government would pay to free slaves in the areas loyal to the Union. Slaveholders in Kentucky, however, had no interest in giving up their slaves with or without payment, and the idea went nowhere. Lincoln also pursued the possibility of colonization in which freed slaves could leave the United States for Central America or even Africa. No nation showed much interest in the project, and freed slaves showed even less interest. Lincoln continued to be more interested in keeping Kentucky loyal to the Union than in the fate of any slaves. A Northern reporter noted, “In all attempts to soothe southern wrath, the negro is thrown in as the offering.” Well into 1862, there was little cause for optimism for those who wanted the war to end slavery. Former slave and abolitionist leader Frederick Douglass wrote of his disappointment: “In dealing with the causes of our present troubles, we find in quarter high and low, the most painful evidences of dishonesty.” For Douglass, the problem was obvious, “We have attempted to maintain our Union in utter defiance of the moral chemistry of the universe.... We have sought to bind the chains of slavery on the limbs of the black man, without thinking that at last we should find the other end of that hateful chain about our own necks. Regardless, in 1862, most of Northern white public opinion was not ready to agree with Douglass.
contrabands
Also known as contraband of war, the name Union generals gave to former slaves who escaped to the Union lines and worked in support of Union troops.
colonization
A plan, popular in the 1830s and briefly considered by President Lincoln, to create colonies in Africa to which former slaves might return. It was never popular with slaves or former slaves themselves.
, Mrmpr slaves now officially contraband of war, waited for their next r of 1862, a group of	WQu|d be fight|ng as full-fledged soldiers in the Union army.
•nthesu
assignment. Before long many such former s
Chapter 14 And the War Came: The Civil War
393
I
As the Union army marched deeper into the Confederacy, however, commanders realized that slaves could be of great value to them. Slaves knew the country, they knew hidden roadways, and they knew what white Southerners were thinking. George E. Stephens, one of the few black newspaper reporters accompanying Union troops, wrote that “when the Union soldier meets the negro in the enemy’s country, he knows him as a friend.” For many Union soldiers, meeting slaves firsthand began to change their minds. Future president James A. Garfield, commanding an Ohio unit in Tennessee, said that he found “the rank and file of the army steadily and surely becoming imbued with sympathy for the slaves and hatred for slavery.”
With or without authorization, some blacks began to fight in the Union army. In Indian Territory (Oklahoma), blacks who lived with Creeks and Seminoles joined them in attacking other tribal members who had signed a treaty with the Confederates. Union officers in Kansas and on the coast of South Carolina began to recruit black troops. Secretary of War Edward M. Stanton approved the move, though he asked his officers to keep it quiet because it was “so much in advance of public opinion.” But the government needed more soldiers, and many blacks wanted to fight—if the fighting was for their freedom.
Issuing the Emancipation Proclamation
President Lincoln also began to change his mind. Lincoln was far too wise a politician to reveal all of his thinking. He had long said that although he thought slavery a terrible evil, the Constitution protected slavery where it already existed, and his only goal was stopping its spread into new territories. In 1861 and early 1862, his priority was securing the loyalty of Kentucky and other border states, which meant protecting slavery there. He understood that many Northerners feared free blacks almost as much as they disliked slavery. Public opinion would support a fight to save the Union, but not necessarily a fight to end slavery.
But by 1862, Northern opinion was changing. Generally, the Northern thinking was that the slaveholding South was waging war against the United States because it wanted to defend the institution of slavery, and it was using slaves to support the war effort while its young white men went off to war. Abolitionists were getting an audience where they had previously been shunned. Blacks were willing to fight in the Union army when many whites were not. And many slaves were fleeing to the Union lines. In July 1862, the Republican-dominated Congress declared that anyone convicted of assisting the rebellion against the U.S. government was liable to seizure and sale of all property and that all rebel-owned slaves who escaped to the Union army were “forever free of their servitude.” Lincoln then began discussing emancipation with his cabinet in July. Secretary of State Seward among others urged caution until a Northern victory would make talk of emancipation look less like a desperate measure.
On September 22, 1862, Lincoln told his cabinet that he had promised God that if Lee’s army was forced out of Maryland where they were then trying to encircle Washington, DC, then he would act. The Battle of Antietam enabled him to do so. Senator Sumner had told him more than a year before that the South’s rebellion gave the president war powers, including the right to seize property, even the kind of private property known as slaves. The proclamation that Lincoln was planning to issue was, he said, a matter of military strategy. It was also directed at building Northern support for the war, especially black and abolitionist support. His proposed emancipation would apply only to those areas of the country that were in a state of rebellion as of January 1,1863. Lincoln hoped that, as a result, at least some areas would vote to shift sides and support the Union, and in an ironic twist, voters in Tennessee and southern Louisiana around New Orleans—both areas where the Union army was in control" did just that, thus exempting themselves from the impact of the proclamation.
The Emancipation Proclamation did not free a single slave when it was first issued. It did not apply in areas loyal to the Union, including slave states, and though it technically freed all of the slaves in the Confederate areas, the government had no
94 Part V Expansion, Separation, and a New Union, 1844-1877
Emancipation Proclamation
Decree announced by President Abraham Lincoln formally issued on January 1,1863, freeing slaves in all Confederate states still in rebellion.

power as of yet in areas that were not under Union control. However, the proclamation did resolve the issue of contraband slaves, made abolishing slavery a military goal, and fundamentally changed the Civil War.
Northern Democrats immediately attacked the proclamation. While the Democratic minority in Congress supported the war effort to save the Union, they opposed any widening of the war s goals. By 1862, some in Congress known as Peace Democrats advocated letting the Confederacy go rather than endure further bloodshed. In the November 1862 congressional elections, Peace Democrats attacked Republicans because, they said, the Emancipation Proclamation was widening the purpose of war and therefore making it longer and more bloody. The New York Democratic platform called the Emancipation Proclamation a proposal for the butchery of women and children, for scenes of lust and rapine, and arson and murder.” For governor, New York’s Democrats nominated Horatio Seymour who said that “the people of the South should be allowed to withdraw themselves from the government.” Seymour won, as did a Democrat in New Jersey, Joel Parker, who, although a “war Democrat” because he supported the war effort, was highly critical of the Emancipation Proclamation. Democrats gained control of the state legislatures in Illinois and Indiana. Northern Democrats opposed to emancipation also won 34 more seats in the House of Representatives. Since few Southerners remained in Congress, this number was not enough to win a majority, but it expanded the influence of those who wanted to challenge the president’s new war goals.
The November 1862 Democratic gains seem to have hardened the views of Lincoln and his cabinet. Just after the election, Attorney General Edward Bates, usually one of the cabinet’s more cautious members, ruled that free blacks had all the rights of citizens and that the Dred Scott decision held “no authority” except in the specific circumstances of the case. Bates’s ruling did not include voting rights; free blacks were considered like women and children, who were citizens but could not vote. Nevertheless, they were now citizens.
On January 1, 1863, Lincoln signed the Emancipation Proclamation, declaring that all slaves in areas then in rebellion—about 3 million of the nation’s 4 million slaves—“are and henceforth shall be free,” and that the military should “recognize and maintain” their freedom. The proclamation also said that black soldiers and sailors could be organized in the “armed service” of the United States. There was no stirring rhetoric about human rights, only a claim of “military necessity,” but the Civil War was now a war to end slavery.
While Northerners debated and voted, slaves in the South voted with their feet. Slaves came to understand that their freedom was one of the issues the war would settle. Early in the war, many Virginia plantations lost all their slaves, and by August 1862, as Confederate troops had to be diverted from fighting to ensure that slaves did not escape, a North Carolina resident wrote that “our Negroes are beginning to show that they understand the state of affairs, and insolence and insubordination are quite common.”
Peace Democrats
Also known as Copperheads, a large faction within the Democratic Party that advocated immediate peace with the Confederacy on terms that would allow it to leave the Union.
Black Soldiers in the Union Army
In January 1863, just after Lincoln signed the Emancipation Proclamation, the Weekly
Anglo-African said, “A century may elapse before another opportunity shall be afforded
of reclaiming and holding our withheld rights.” Blacks, both slave and free, joined the
military in great numbers. More than 180,000 black soldiers—one-fifth of the nations
adult black male population under age 45 and about 10 percent of the total Union
force—eventually fought for the Union.
Former slaves quickly signed up for service, especially in the west where Grant encouraged full inclusion of blacks in the army. In Massachusetts, Governor John Andrew, with Lincoln’s support, authorized the organization of what became the Fifty-fourth and Fifty-fifth Massachusetts regiments. Civil War regiments were typically organized by states, but the Fifty-fourth and Fifty-fifth, although they were Massachusetts regiments, recruited free blacks from across the North-though with
Chapter 14 And the War Came: The Civil War 395

American Voices
Susie King Taylor, “Reminiscences of My Life in Camp,” 1862
Susie King Taylor (1848-1912) published her autobiography long after the Civil War, but her memories of the war and the rumors of freedom that arrived in advance of the reality remained vivid. Taylor was born in rural Georgia but lived in Savannah as a child where she attended a secret—and illegal—school for slaves and learned to read and write. Soon after her trip to St. Simon's Island and freedom with the Union army, she opened a school for other newly freed slaves and later taught black troops to read and write while also serving as a nurse.
I WAS
born under the slave law in Georgia, in 1848, and was brought up by my grandmother in Savannah. There were three of us with her, my younger sister and brother. My brother and I being the two eldest, we were sent to a friend of my grandmother, Mrs. Woodhouse, a widow, to learn to read and write. She was a free woman and lived on Bay Lane, between Habersham and Price streets, about half a mile from my house. We went every day about nine o'clock, with our books wrapped in paper to prevent the police or white persons from seeing them. We went in, one at a time, through the gate, into the yard to the L kitchen, which was the schoolroom. She had twenty-five or thirty children whom she taught, assisted by her daughter, Mary Jane.... About this time I had been reading so much about the "Yankees" I was very anxious to see them. The whites would tell their colored people not to go to the Yankees, for they would harness them to carts and make them pull the carts around, in place of horses. I asked grandmother, one day, if this was true. She replied, "Certainly not!" that the white people did not want slaves
to go over to the Yankees, and told them these things to frighten them. "Don't you see those signs pasted about the streets? one reading,'I am a rattlesnake; if you touch me I will strike!'Another reads, 'I am a wild-cat! Beware,' etc. These are warnings to the North; so don't mind what the white people say." I wanted to see these wonderful "Yankees" so much, as I heard my parents say the Yankee was going to set all the slaves free....
On April 1,1862, about the time the Union soldiers were firing on Fort Pulaski, I was sent out into the country to my mother. I remember what a roar and din the guns made. They jarred the earth for miles. The fort was at last taken by them. Two days after the taking of Fort Pulaski, my uncle took his family of seven and myself to St. Catherine Island. We landed under the protection of the Union fleet, and remained there two weeks, when about thirty of us were taken aboard the gunboat P—, to be transferred to St. Simon's Island; and at last, to my unbounded joy, I saw the "Yankee."
Source: Susie King Taylor, Reminiscences of My Life in Camp with the 33D United States Colored Troops Late 1 st S.C. Volunteers (Boston: Published by the Author, 1902), pp. 10-12.
Thinking Critically
1.	Documentary Analysis
What steps did Taylor's family take to prepare her for freedom?
2.	Historical Interpretation
What does this document tell you about the priorities of enslaved African-Americans as freedom approached? What might explain the importance they attached to education?


ini
white officers. In rural Franklin Country, Pennsylvania, not far from the Mason-Dixon Line, 45 free black men signed up for the Fifty-fourth regiment and more joined the Fifty-fifth. Most free blacks who volunteered for service were from the lowest rungs of the economy, including Thomas Burgess, a carpenter; Joseph Christy, a woodcutter; and Hezekiah Watson and Thomas Cuff, quarrymen. The bounties paid to all soldiers for joining and the subsequent pay mattered to poor families—black or white. The opportunity to fight for freedom mattered even more to black soldiers.
In spring 1863, black soldiers in Louisiana fought hard and rescued white troops who faced defeat, turning what could have been defeat into a victory. At Fort Wagner, South Carolina, the Fifty-fourth Massachusetts regiment lost half its number, including its white commander Robert Gould Shaw, after requesting the right to be first in the assault. After those encounters, many shared Secretary of War Stanton’s view that these troops were “among the bravest of the brave in fighting for the Union.” Their bravery convinced some, including Lincoln, that they were as deserving as any whites not only of their freedom but also of the right to vote and participate equally in the political process.
Black soldiers also demanded, and eventually got, equal treatment within the army. Officers were told that any soldier, whatever his rank, who mistreated freedmen would be dismissed. The Militia Act of 1862 set the pay of black soldiers at the level of military laborers on the assumption that their work would be behind the lines. As their role changed, black soldiers demanded equal pay. Soldiers in the Massachusetts Fifty-
fourth and Fifty-fifth regiments refused to accept any pay until it was raised to that of Part V Expansion, Separation, and a New Union, 1844-1877
J
1
Even before, and especially after, the Emancipation Proclamation formalized their place in the Union army, thousands of African-Americans joined the army to fight for the Union cause and for freedom.
white soldiers. In June 1864, Congress provided equal pay and enlistment bounties for blacks and whites. In the army, blacks also had equal rights in military courts and rights to testify in trials, something they could not do as civilians in most of the country. Finally, during the last months of the war, blacks were promoted to the officer ranks.
The presence of black troops in the Union army enraged many in the Confederacy. In May 1863, the South refused to include black troops in prisoner of war exchanges since they had declared all such troops to be runaway slaves who should be returned to slavery. In response, and despite pressure, Lincoln suspended the exchange of prisoners until early 1865 when the Confederacy agreed to resume exchanges. Black prisoners of war were treated more harshly than white prisoners. In April 1864, when the Union garrison at Fort Pillow, Tennessee, surrendered to Confederate General Nathan B. Forest, he ordered the massacre of black soldiers. Blacks who fought knew what danger they faced, and they fought anyway.
Quick Review How did the battles fought at the beginning of the Civil War change people's attitudes about the war in the North and the South?
THE HOME FRONT—SHORTAGES, OPPOSITION, RIOTS, AND BATTLES
14.3
Explain how the war's death toll and civilian shortages affected life—North and South— during the war.
After the initial euphoria wore off, and as the reports of casualties began to circulate, support for the war dropped in both the North and the South. Even those supporting the war had second thoughts. It was not only the terrible toll from the battlefields, though nearly every family was touched by those losses, but also the wars effects on the home front, which had not been expected when it began.
Inflation and Bread Riots in the South
The wars heaviest toll was in the South. Ihe Confederate government never succeeded
in placing its financial house in order. Southern politicians had long objected to federal
tariffs and other taxes. It was hard now that independence was claimed to turn to
Chapter 14 And the War Came: The Civil War 397
these taxes. Although there were modest tax increases, the Confederate government was always short of money. To finance the war, the Confederates issued war bonds. It was fair, many argued, for future generations to pay the cost of the war. But buying war bonds that paid 8 percent per year in interest when inflation was running at 12 percent per month was not a good investment. And even rich Southerners often did not have much cash to invest. Southern wealth was invested in land and slaves, and neither could be easily converted to cash, especially in wartime. So the Confederate government sought to solve its financial problems by simply printing more money—$20 million in May 1861, $100 million in August. Creating more currency, however, caused terrible inflation that undermined the sale of war bonds and drove the price of goods out of sight. In 1862, Southern workers saw their wages increase by about 55 percent while the cost of living increased by 300 percent. The price of salt, essential to preserving meat, rose from $2 a bag before the war to $60 by the fall of 1862. In addition, the disruption of southern transportation, especially after the loss of the rail terminals in Memphis in June 1862, meant that though one area might have ample supplies of food, other areas were literally starving.
Managing the home front in the South fell primarily to women. During the war, three out of four white men of military age—ultimately defined by the Confederate government as ages 17 to 50—served in the army, and one out of five of this age range were killed in the war. Margaret Junkin Preston of Lexington, Virginia, described a world in which there were “no men left.” In New Bern, North Carolina, women wrote to the governor to say that of 250 whites remaining in their town, only 20 were male, and of these 11 were old and three about to join the army. And in Carrollton, Alabama, a woman wrote to her governor in 1862 to say that the latest call for soldiers “almost literally depopulates the country of men.” For white women, this situation meant taking on new roles, including managing slaves. In 1863, Lizzie Neblettof Texas wrote to her husband that she was “doing my best,” as a manager and overseer, but by 1863, she realized that the news of the Emancipation Proclamation spreading in the slave quarter had changed everything: “I don’t think we have one who will stay with us.” Letters to distant husbands reflected how terribly their wives missed them and how these long separations were changing women’s role in a society that had prided itself on male dominance and female fragility. As the Montgomery Daily Advertiser wrote in July 1864, “The surface of society, like a great ocean, is upheaved, and all the relations of life are disturbed and out of joint.”
In spring 1863, food shortages led to bread riots across the South from Richmond, Virginia, to Mobile, Alabama. Women, often wives whose husbands were off fighting and who were trying desperately to sustain themselves and their children, attacked shops and warehouses.
By March 1863, the Army of Northern Virginia was subsisting on half rations, but the women of Richmond had far less. In April, a mob of over 1,000 women shouting “Bread, Bread” and “Our children are starving,” began looting shops in Richmond—first for bread and then for clothing. When President Davis threatened to shoot rioters, they dispersed, but the anger did not subside. The government tried to distribute food and to stop hoarding in warehouses. Nevertheless, as the war continued, it created streams of refugees, inflation, and starvation across the South. As many as 50,000 civilians died in the South during the war, in addition to the 260,000 Confederate war dead.
Taxes, Mourning, and Resistance in the North
Life was easier in the North. Most of the fighting took place on Southern soil, and the Northern economy was more stable. The North also had an established Treasury Department and tax system when the war began, though revenue that had been sufficient for the 1850s was not even close to meeting
the needs of a war economy. The financier Jay Cooke, one of the richest and most reviled bankers of his day, advised the Treasury Department and created new federal bonds in amounts that allowed not only banks but also individuals to buy war bonds. Cooke made a significant profit on these transactions, but the bonds kept the government solvent.
Congress also created the Internal Revenue Service and began a federal income tax in August 1861. Most people were exempt from the tax since income under $800 per year was not taxed, and only a minority made more than that. Finally, the federal government began issuing federal notes that were secured not by gold or silver but simply by the government’s promise to redeem them. Congress not only authorized such bank notes, which came to be known as “greenbacks’’ for their green ink, but also declared that they were legal tender, which meant that no one could refuse them as payment for goods or debts. The result was the creation of a solid monetary system that lasted long after the war.
Although there was little fighting in the North, families saw sons march off to war and often received the terrible news that they were never coming home. Death on the scale of the Civil War had never been known before—and has not been known since—in the United States. After major battles, newspapers and telegraph offices posted casualty lists. Close comrades or hospital nurses caring for those who died wrote letters to their families, and the awful news changed life for those waiting at home.
In many parts of the North, as in the South, communities were virtually depopulated of military-aged men during the war, and women took on roles that they had never before considered. Although the prewar North had less rigidly defined gender roles than the South, changes were significant for many.
Many Northerners never supported the war effort, and their numbers increased after the Emancipation Proclamation. By 1863, as the death toll rose and the prospects of defeating the Confederacy dimmed, the peace faction within the Northern Democratic Party grew rapidly, though the party always included not only Peace Democrats but also War Democrats who supported the war to save the union, if not the Emancipation Proclamation. Peace Democrats came to be known as Copperheads, after Republicans had coined the term, comparing antiwar Democrats to venomous snakes. But by 1863, Peace Democrats proudly took up the term and continued to call for peace while hoping to make more gains in the state elections of 1863.
By 1863, Ohio Congressman Clement L. Vallandigham had emerged as the leader of the Peace Democrats. For Vallandigham, the result of the war was “defeat, debt, taxation, sepulchers.” Vallandigham strongly disapproved of the Emancipation Proclamation, declaring that the government should, “look only to the welfare, peace, and safety of the white race.” His words touched a nerve in Northern public opinion but did not win over a majority. In a May 1863 speech, he said that “King Lincoln had widened the war from one to save the Union to one to free the slaves and must be stopped. General Ambrose Burnside, the Union military commander in Ohio, had issued an order that “declaring sympathy for the enemy” was against the law. Vallandigham was arrested and convicted. After briefly being jailed, he was exiled to the Confederacy. He met with Confederate officials in Richmond, then made his way to Canada where, from exile, he ran as a Peace Democrat for governor of Ohio in November 1863. Although he lost the election, Vallandigham did win 40 percent of the votes.
New York City was a center of opposition to the war. Its large Irish Catholic population had little interest in fighting for the rights of African-Americans. More free blacks, they thought, meant more competitors on the streets and docks of New York, and they did not like it. After Lincoln issued the Emancipation Proclamation, New York’s Catholic Archbishop John Hughes wrote that we Catholics...have not
14,1
I
j 1C2
Internal Revenue Service	i
An agency created by Congress during the Civil War to collect federal taxes in support of the war effort.
143
greenbacks	i
Papercurrency printed on order of Congress * *
based on the federal government's promise 1 --- .
to pay rather than backed by actual gold or silver as security.
the slightest idea of carrying on a war that costs so much blood and treasure just to
gratify a clique of Abolitionists.”
While Northern support for the abolition of slavery was growing as the war
progressed, especially among troops in the army, Northern opinion was divided.
r 7	Chapter 14 And the War Came: The Civil War 399
New York Draft Riot
A mostly Irish-immigrant protest against conscription in New York City that escalated into class and racial warfare.
Irish Catholics were far from the only people in the North to dislike free blacks and have little interest in freeing slaves. As word of the Emancipation Proclamation spread in 1862, antiblack riots broke out in several cities, including Cincinnati where a strike by Irish dockworkers was defeated with the use of black strikebreakers. In Brooklyn, a mob attacked a tobacco factory where blacks were working.
As opposition grew in the North to the war itself, especially expanding the war goals to include emancipation, voluntary enlistment in the army declined. In July 1863, the government began to enforce a military draft, and the antiblack, anti-Abolitionist, antiwar fervor broke into violence. In New York City on July 13, mobs attacked the draft offices and then turned on black neighborhoods, Republican newspapers, and government offices. Blacks were beaten, lynched, and shot. Before it was over, 105 people, most of them black, were killed. Ihe New York Draft Riot was the worst riot in American history up to that time. Only the arrival of federal troops on July 15, fresh from the Battle of Gettysburg, ended the violence.
Warfare in the North and West
Although the Civil War was fought primarily in the South, battles took place in distant areas of the nation. A victory at Glorieta Pass near Santa Fe kept New Mexico in Union hands. In Missouri, bands loyal to each side fought battles throughout the war that spilled over into neighboring states and often were fueled by earlier disputes. William Clarke Quantrill, who had been among the Missouri “border ruffians” in the 1850s, led attacks on Union troops and sympathizers in Missouri, and in 1863, Quantrill led a band of 450 Southern sympathizers in a raid on Lawrence, Kansas. In retaliation for events in “Bleeding Kansas,” Quantrill ordered, “Kill every male and burn every house.” The band followed orders, killing 183 men and boys and burning 185 buildings in Lawrence, eluding capture by Union troops. Quantrill was eventually killed by Union soldiers, but many of his followers, including Jesse and Frank James, became famous outlaws and continued to terrorize parts of the West long after the war was over. Confederate agents also tried to arrange attacks on the Union from Canada and planned an uprising in Chicago during the Democratic convention of 1864, but nothing came of that effort.
Those involved in the New York Draft Riot of July 1863 attacked Union draft officials, Republican newspapers and supporters, and, most of all, African-Americans.
400 PartV Expansion, Separation, and a New Union, 1844-1877
Confederate and Union leaders both sought allies among the tribes in Indian Territory. Cherokee, Creeks, and Seminoles were all divided between some who thought the Confederacy would offer better terms than the United States had done, and others who sided with the United States. Even without Confederate influence’, some Northern tribes were angry at the U.S. government over the loss of supplies that had been diverted to the war effort and over Lincoln’s withdrawal of troops that were protecting the tribes from expanding white settlements, as promised in various treaties. In Minnesota in August 1862, Santee Sioux under Little Crow killed hundreds of white settlers and U.S. troops but were soon defeated. Little Crow along with 37 other Santee leaders were executed in the largest public hanging in U.S. history. Many from the tribe moved to Canada. In early 1863, the Shoshoni under Chief Bear Hunter, angry at the growing presence of white settlers and migrants in the tribe’s region, attacked white settlements in the Utah and Idaho Territories. Union troops retaliated, massacring most of the Shoshoni warriors along with women and children in an attack on January 29, 1863. As Indian-white relationships degenerated during the war, Union troops were diverted from the war with the Confederacy to fight Indians. Indians suffered no matter which side they took, and most whites looked the other way.
Quick Review How did political opposition, popular opposition (especially where violent), and economic upheaval threaten the war effort in the North and South?
FROM GETTYSBURG TO APPOMATTOX AND BEYOND
14.4
Analyze the strategies and costs of fighting a long and terrible war.
As both its proponents and opponents understood, the Emancipation Proclamation
widened the purpose of the Civil War. Military tactics also changed in 1863. Early in
the war, generals hoped for a short and limited war. McClellan was far from the only
general, North or South, who tried to avoid large losses of fighting troops. By the time
the war entered its third year, however, military and civilian leaders on both sides had
concluded that only a much more sustained offensive would end the war.
Lincoln relieved several cautious generals—McClellan, Hooker, and Meade—
before he promoted Grant to overall command. Davis, on the other hand, promoted
Lee to be the top military commander early in the war. In Grant and Lee, each
president had selected a general who was willing to fight a large-scale offensive war
and absorb large troop losses to win.
Gettysburg and the War in Pennsylvania and Virginia
In spring of 1863, Hooker, while he was still in command, marched Union troops into
Virginia, and the two armies fought for 7 days at Chancellorsville. When Stonewall
Jackson led his troops around the end of the Union lines, Hooker lost his nerve and
ordered a retreat. Chancellorsville was a major Confederate victory, though it came
at the high cost of 10,000 Confederate dead and wounded and 14,000 Union losses.
In the battle, Jackson was accidentally shot by his own troops and died a week later.
Lincoln relieved Hooker of command and appointed General George Meade to replace
Hooker. Meanwhile, Lee convinced Davis that the time had come to invade the North,
cut Washington, DC, off from the rest of the country, and end the war.
June 1863 was the high point of Confederate confidence and Confederate advances.
As Lee led the South’s largest army through rural Pennsylvania, many in the North—
not just the unfortunate inhabitants of the towns through which the army marched
grew fearful. If the Confederate army could control the Pennsylvania countryside,
Chapter 14 And the War Came: The Civil War
14.1
14.2
14.3
14.4
they could attack Philadelphia or Washington as a well-fed, well-organized army of conquest. The North could not continue the war if its capital and major cities were under rebel control.
Long before any battles took place, Pennsylvania residents knew one was coming. While people living in many parts of the South had already experienced 2 years of war, such fears were new north of the Mason-Dixon line. Philip Schaff, a theologian and historian teaching at Mercersburg Seminary in Pennsylvania, remembered that trying times did not bring out the best in frightened and confused people. They turned on their neighbors because of pro- or antiwar politics or over squabbles about what to hide and where to hide it.
When the rebel army did arrive, Mercersburg was luckier than some towns, at least for its white citizens. General Lee ordered that “no private property shall be injured or destroyed.” Schaff described the first Confederate officer he met as “intelligent and courteous, but full of hatred for the Yankees.” Not all the Confederates who followed were as polite.
Mercersburg had a large free black population, and they suffered far worse than whites. Schaff said that some of the troops went “on a regular slave-hunt, which presented the worst spectacle I ever saw in this war.” When white households hid black friends, the invading troops “proclaimed, first, that they would burn down every house which harbored a fugitive slave.” And they considered all blacks to be fugitive slaves. Schaff was terrified that his servant Eliza and her son would be found. They escaped, but other blacks in the town were caught and sold into slavery. For blacks and whites, southern Pennsylvania in 1863 was every bit as much a war zone as Virginia or the Mississippi River valley had been in 1862.
Lincoln and Meade ordered the Army of the Potomac to stop Lee’s advance at all cost. The Northern and Southern armies found each other near the town of Gettysburg, Pennsylvania. On July 1, Confederate forces drove Union troops out of the town and onto Cemetery Hill. The next morning, Lee ordered a major attack, but the Union army held its ground. After another major charge directly at the heart of the Union lines on July 3 known as Pickett s Charge for the officer commanding the lead unit— it became clear to Lee that, despite terrible losses, the Union forces, now reinforced, could not be dislodged. Of the 14,000 soldiers that Pickett led in the assault, only half returned. Confederate General Longstreet spoke of the Battle of Gettysburg as hopeless slaughter.. .one of the saddest [days] of my life.” In the 3 days at Gettysburg,
In the days after the Battle of Gettysburg, bodies littered the battlefield. Photographs brought the high cost of war home to people, North and South.
402 Part V Expansion, Separation, and a New Union, 1844-1877	___
£■1
51,000 soldiers were killed or wounded, 23,000 from the North and 28,000 from the South. On July 4, Lee began a painful retreat back to Virginia. The Confederate army would never again be a major presence in the North. Lincoln, however, was furious that Meade, like McClellan, did not pursue the retreating Confederates.
While news was arriving in Washington that the Confederate forces had been turned back, word also came of a second Northern victory. Unable to defeat the Confederate garrison at Vicksburg in 1862, Grant surrounded the city and starved it. After holding on for a year, on July 4, 1863, the Confederate forces at Vicksburg surrendered. Watching the Union army march into Vicksburg, a local resident wrote, “What a contrast [these] stalwart, well-fed men... [were to].. .the worn men in gray, who were being blindly dashed against this embodiment of modern power.” The entire Mississippi River was now under Union control. The Confederacy had been cut in half. Lincoln made Grant General-in-Chief of all Union armies. But it would be another hard year before there was another Northern victory like Gettysburg or Vicksburg and 2 years before the war ended.
The Terrible Cost of War
In early 1864, Grant took direct command in the East and marched into Virginia to attack Lee. He quickly stalled. In early May 1864 at the Battle of the Wilderness, Southern forces mounted a furious attack with high casualties. Neither side won the Battle of the Wilderness, but unlike his predecessors, Grant pursued the Confederate forces
14J
p—
i
j 14,2
! 143
14.4
American Voices
Cornelia Hancock, “Letters of Cornelia Hancock,” July 7,1863
s a young woman from a Quaker family in New Jersey, Cornelia Hancock was originally rejected for service by the Union army's Superintendent of Female Nurses, Dorothea Dix. Hancock responded by making her way, on her own, to the field hospital set up in the days immediately after the Battle of Gettysburg and, once there, was quickly put to work. Her letter home was written just 3 days after the battle ended.
Gettysburg, Pa., July 7th, 1863 Wall Street, Half Past Two O'clock, October 13,1857 by James H. Cafferty and Charles G. Rosenberg
Dear Cousin
I am very tired tonight; have been on the field all day— went to the 3rd Division 2nd Army Corps. I suppose there are about five hundred wounded belonging to it....There are no words in the English language to express the sufferings I witnessed today. The men lie on the ground; their clothes have been cut off them to dress their wounds; they are half naked, have nothing but hardtack to eat only as Sanitary Commissions, Christian Associations, and so forth give them. I was the first woman who reached the 2nd Corps after the three days fight at Gettysburg. I was in the Corps all day, not another woman within a half mile....To give you some idea of the extent and numbers of the sounds, four surgeons, none of whom were idle fifteen minutes of time, were busy all day amputating legs and arms. I gave to every man that had a leg or arm off a gill of wine, to every wounded in the Third Division, one glass of lemonade,
some bread and preserves and tobacco.
I feel very thankful that this was a successful battle; the spirit of the men is so high that many of the poor fellows said today, "What is an arm or leg to whipping Lee out of Penn." I would get on first rate if they would not ask me to write to their wives; that I cannot do without crying, which is not pleasant to either party. I do not mind the sight of blood, have seen limbs taken off and was not sick at all.
It is a very beautiful, rolling country here; under favorable circumstances I should think healthy, but now for five miles around, there is an awful smell of putrefaction. Women are needed here very badly, anyone who is willing to go to field hospitals.
Cornelia
Source: Henrietta Stratton Jaquette, editor, South after Gettysburg, Letters of Cornelia Hancock, 1863-1868 (New York: Crowell, 1956), pp. 16-19; reprinted in p. 288.] Robert D. Marcus, David Burner, Anthony Marcus, America Firsthand: Readings from Settlement to Reconstruction, Sixth Edition, Volume One (Boston: Bedford/St. Martin's, 2004), p. 288.
Thinking Critically
1.	Documentary Analysis
What language does Hancock use to make the hospital come alive for those who are reading her letter?
2.	Historical Interpretation
What assumptions about women of the Civil War era is
Hancock challenging? What assumptions might she be reinforcing?
Chapter 14 And the War Came: The Civil War 403
Id
14J ?
j
14.4
after the battle. At the end of May, Union forces took control of the crossroads town of Cold Harbor, Virginia, but Confederate forces attacked, and Grant ordered a counterattack. The armies fought along a line from Cold Harbor to the Chickahominy River. In this case, even Grant thought the cost too high. Wounded soldiers could not escape fires that roared through the thick undergrowth, and the suffering was terrible. He wrote in his Memoirs that this attack was the only one he wished he had never ordered. The Union lost 13,000 troops to the Confederate 2,500. In spite of the terrible losses, Grant still did not retreat.
In June 1864, Grant attacked Petersburg, then the second largest city in Virginia, and settled down for a siege. Grant telegraphed Lincoln, “I propose to fight it out on this line if it takes all summer.” It was what Lincoln wanted from a general. But while Grant was not retreating, he was not making much progress either. Some newspapers began to call Grant a “butcher.” Others just wondered if the war would ever end.
At least three factors now caused the Civil War’s high death toll. Lee and Grant had shifted tactics from a limited war to a war of attrition. Each army meant to destroy the other, killing and wounding as> many soldiers as possible. After 1863, there were no more limited engagements. Weapons were also deadlier than anything used in previous wars. Finally, medicine was still in its infancy. The wounded often died from infections that only a few years later a new generation knew how to treat. Given all three factors, grieving became part of life, for troops and for families at home.
Before the Civil War, armies fought with muskets, which took time to load and were not that accurate. Most military authorities in prior wars agreed that the best way to attack was in a close-order formation in which a well-trained army marched forward shooting, reloading, and shooting again. If both sides had muskets, the inaccuracy and short range of the weapons reduced the danger to any one soldier. That strategy was what had been taught at West Point where most senior officers of both the North and the South had been trained.
But the close-order formation was a virtual death sentence to troops facing an army with rifles. The new rifles, developed in France and by the American James H. Burton at the federal armory at Harper’s Ferry in the 1850s, increased the distance that a soldier could shoot four-fold, and the spin a rifle gave to a bullet meant that it did a lot more damage to the human body. By 1863, Union factories developed repeating rifles that made the firepower of these weapons much faster and more deadly. The accuracy of rifles also meant that opponents could identify officers and shoot them, a reason why so many generals were killed in the war and why generals, like Grant, began wearing private’s uniforms. The South never matched the North in weapons production, and many of its new weapons were either captured or came from blockade runners. The South’s slow production of rifles was one reason it suffered more casualties than the North.
Artillery also became a key defensive weapon in the Civil War. New cannons that fired grapeshot and canister, rather than old fashioned cannon balls, were like giant shotguns. Defending armies in the Civil War could shoot down row after row of attackers.
A
Union cavalry officer described the results of these new weapons in combat. In July 1862, the morning after Confederate army units attacked Union placements at Malvern Hill, Virginia, he said, “Our eyes saw an appalling spectacle upon the slopes down to the woodlands half a mile away. Over five thousand dead and wounded men were on the ground...enough were alive and moving to give the field a singular crawling effect.” That result is what the new weapons of war did to people. Medicine, Nursing, and a New Role for Women
Many of those wounded in the Civil War died because of a lack of effective medical treatment. Indeed, more soldiers died of diseases during the war than died in combat. It was just after the war that European researchers Louis Pasteur and Joseph Lister developed modern bacteriology. No Civil War doctor, North or South, knew that
404 Part V Expansion, Separation, and a New Union, 1844-1877
microbes in contaminated water or on hands or unsterilized instruments caused infection, or that mosquitoes could be as dangerous to troops as enemy bullets. Antiseptics did not exist. Medical education was primitive.
Military camps, where large numbers of men lived in close and often unsanitary quarters, were breeding grounds for disease. Many soldiers thought that it was better to avoid a physician than get close to one. Soldiers North and South agreed with the Alabama soldier who wrote that “I believe the Doctors kill more than they cour [cure] and with the Massachusetts officer who said that the regimental surgeon was “a jackass.”
To fill gaps in medical care, women began to nurse the wounded and the sick. Before the war, nursing had been almost exclusively men’s work. But now the men were fighting, and the women were determined to aid the cause for which sons, husbands, and lovers were risking their lives. In the North, the United States Sanitary Commission became a powerful voluntary women’s organization that was able to brush aside the army Medical Bureau and take on everything from raising money for medical supplies to providing nurses in field hospitals.
Elizabeth Blackwell, the first American woman M.D., began organizing the Sanitary Commission in 1861 and with widespread support, most of all from the troops whom its nurses aided, it flourished despite hostility from male army physicians. Ihe reformer and social worker Dorothea Dix was named “Superintendent of Female Nurses.” By the end of the war, Dix had organized 3,000 Northern women volunteers to serve as army nurses in addition to others who were paid directly by the Sanitary Commission. Still other women, most notably Clara Barton, who later helped create the American Red Cross, became free-agent nurses, helping wherever they could. Mary Ann Bickerdyke began serving as a nurse at Cairo, Illinois, and followed Grant’s and Sherman’s armies across the South. Mother Bickerdyke, as the troops called her, was the only woman Sherman authorized to serve in his advanced base hospitals.
Women in the South took up similar duties, often despite greater hostility. Southern culture, even more than Northern, treated middle-class white women as in need of constant protection. Moving into a hospital as a nurse was hardly protected work, and it brought women into close contact with male bodies, something
Sanitary Commission
Created in 1861 to improve the medical services and treatment for sick and wounded Union soldiers during the course of the war.
a nil	11 q ^nitarv Commission, treats wounded Union soldiers.
Ann Bell, a young nurse with the U.S Sanitary Lomun»iu' ■,
Chapter 14 And the War Came: The Civil War 405
14.4
previously thought improper. But the sick were there, and the women were determined to help. The Confederate Baptist offered religious sanction for this new role for women saying that “they are most valuable auxiliaries. In spite of concerns about “delicacy,” “modesty,” and “refinement,” women went to work as nurses in the South.
Sara Agnes Pryor, who had lived in <omfort before the war, volunteered to help in Virginia hospitals. When she saw a nurse kneeling to hold the stump of an amputated arm she fainted and thought she was wholly “unfit for the work.” But Pryor overcame her “fine-lady faintness” and became a serious professional. Mary Rutledge Fogg was from one of the South’s grand families in Nashville, and she used her status to pressure Jefferson Davis to allow her to start military hospitals in Nashville, Memphis, and Knoxville after seeing “50 brave soldiers” die “for the want of proper nurses.” Phoebe Yates Levy Pember, a 40-year-old widow, was named matron of the Confederate hospital in Richmond where she and her sisters provided for the hundreds of wounded soldiers who streamed into the Confederate capital.
Women nurses, North and South, looked to their hero Florence Nightingale, the English woman who had virtually invented modern nursing while serving British troops in the 1853-1856 Crimean War. And, like Nightingale, the nurses of the Civil War sought to bring healing to wounded soldiers as well as comfort to the dying and those who were recovering.
Presidential Politics and Sherman's March to the Sea, Then North
While women like Pryor and Barton tried to comfort the wounded, soldiers fought, and Grant held his line in Virginia, it was not clear whether Lincoln could hold his office. Continuing losses, lack of progress at Petersburg, and hostility to emancipation all combined to strengthen the chances of the Copperhead antiwar Democrats in the 1864 presidential election. None were more aware of this situation than the leaders of the Confederacy. Lee knew he could not hold Petersburg forever, but he was confident that all he needed to do was hold the city until the November elections. If Grant made no progress, and casualties remained high, Lee and Davis thought that the Copperhead Democrats would win the election and make peace.
While the Democrats grew stronger, many Republicans were losing heart by 1864. Congressman Martin F. Conway, a Republican from Kansas who had once criticized Lincoln for pursuing the war too slowly, now asked the president, “For god’s sake try and arrange [peace] with the South.... The war-spirit is gone.” When in August 1864 the Democrats nominated General McClellan, whom Lincoln had fired for being too cautious, Lincoln expected to be a one-term president. His only hope, he wrote, was “to save the Union between the election and the inauguration” that would take place in March 1865. Then, the picture on the battlefield changed dramatically (see Map 14-2).
When Grant had come east to fight in Virginia, he left his closest subordinate William T. Sherman in charge in the west. Sherman began a march across the heart of the Confederacy. Just as the Mississippi River campaign had cut the Confederacy in half from north to south, Sherman aimed to cut it in half from west to east. Slowly avoiding major confrontations and keeping a careful eye on his supply trains, Sherman led his army, moving from Tennessee across Mississippi, Alabama, and into Georgia. Sherman saw little value or glory in winning battles. He said that glory in war, “is all moonshine; even success the most brilliant is over dead and mangled bodies, with the anguish and lamentation of distant families.” Sherman just kept maneuvering and kept marching, fighting when necessary.
Confederate General John Bell Hood tried to stop Sherman before he reached Atlanta, an important railroad center. In August 1864, Sherman changed course, and the Confederate general thought Sherman was retreating, but Sherman won the next battle on August 30. The Confederates then evacuated Atlanta and burned most of
406 Part V Expansion, Separation, and a New Union, 1844-1877
v
MAP 14-2 Major Civil War Battles, 1863-1865. While armies fought in Pennsylvania, Maryland, and Virginia all through 1863,1864, and 1865, a Union force led by William T. Sherman marched through the Confederate states from Tennessee to Georgia and the Carolinas.
the city. On September 1, Sherman led his troops into Atlanta. Mary Boykin Chesnut
wrote in her diary, “Since Atlanta I have felt as if all were dead within me, forever.
We are going to be wiped off the earth.”
As Sherman was taking Atlanta, Admiral Farragut led a daring raid on Mobile Bay, Alabama. Confederate forts guarded the harbor and well-placed mines (known then as torpedoes) blocked the entrance. When the lead ship in Farragut’s fleet was sunk by an exploding mine, the fleet stopped. Farragut, in one of the wars immortal
Chapter 14 And the War Came: The Civil War 407
142
142
142
14.4
phrases ordered, “Damn the torpedoes! Full speed ahead.” Farragut s fleet won control of Mobile’s harbor. While Mobile, which was more inland, remained in Confederate hands, the port, which had been an essential base for Confederate blockade runners, was under Union control by the end of August 1864, adding one more link in the Union chain encircling the Confederacy.
Sherman’s taking of Atlanta and Farragut’s victory at Mobile Bay were important military victories, but they were also political victories for Lincoln and psychological victories for the North. Lincoln grew optimistic. Secretary of State Seward said, “Sherman and Farragut have knocked the bottom out of the” Democrats. Frederick Douglass, who had wanted a stronger abolitionist at the head of the 1864 Republican ticket, now said that “all hesitation ought to cease” regarding support for the president. Lincoln insisted that if he were reelected, the government must be based on “liberty and equality.. .an open field and a fair chance.. .in the race of life.” Even the Democrat nominee McClellan shifted his tone, insisting that negotiations with the South be “on the basis of the Union,” angering Copperhead/Peace Democrats who wanted peace on any terms. In November, Lincoln defeated McClellan by 2,220,846 popular votes to 1,809,445, ensuring Lincoln 212 electoral votes to McClellan’s 21.
After the capture of Atlanta, no one was sure what Sherman would do next. His supply lines were stretched to the limit. In response, Sherman proposed to cut his army loose from supply lines entirely, live off the land, and march his 62,000 toughened troops straight through the heart of the Confederacy. Lincoln and Grant agreed. There would be little armed resistance, Sherman argued, since the Confederate army was fighting in the North, not protecting the Confederate heartland, which they presumed was safe.
Sherman believed that “[w]ar is cruelty and you cannot refine it.” On November 15, he started his “march to the sea,” destroying every farm, factory, and railroad in his path. Troops destroyed all that the army could not eat or use. In Milledgeville, Georgia, then the state capital, Sherman’s troops met Union prisoners who had escaped from the notorious Southern prison camp at Andersonville. Some Union prisoners at Andersonville had spent years with only the barest rations, and their uniforms had turned to shreds. Many died there. The sight of these emaciated soldiers wearing rags “sickened and infuriated” the Northern soldiers. Along the way, escaping slaves and Southern white Unionists joined the march. Sherman captured Savannah, Georgia, on the Atlantic coast in late December. His telegram to President Lincoln said, “I beg to present you, as a Christmas gift, the city of Savannah, with 150 heavy guns and... about 25,000 bales of cotton.”
In January 1865, Sherman started north through Georgia and the Carolinas. His goal was to attack Lee’s army from the south while Grant attacked from the north. Sherman continued to destroy any of the South’s resources for waging war, including food. When the army reached South Carolina, one Union soldier said, “Here is where treason began and, by God, here is where it shall end!” Sherman seemed to agree, and another soldier said that by the time the army was through, South Carolina “will never want to secede again.” Every house they encountered was burned, and every village stripped of supplies. Sherman left the coast of South Carolina to others—and it was probably the good fortune of Charleston to be occupied by troops from the Unions Department of the South, including many black units, who saved the city. Shermans army then marched inland to the state’s capitol of Columbia, which was burned to the ground. When the army reached the North Carolina border, the burning stopped. But in South Carolina, the march left a trail of anger and resentment that lasted for generations as it demoralized a population that was already losing faith in the war.
The Road to Appomattox and Peace
Before Sherman could finish his march through North Carolina and into Virginia, other events began turning in Grant’s favor. As news of Lincoln’s November reelection, the capture of Savannah, and the destruction in South Carolina began to sink in, many
408 Party Expansion, Separation, and a New Union, 1844-1877
142
TABLE 14.1 Major Battles of the Civil War
Battle	Significance	1
Fort Sumter Charleston, South Carolina April 12-13,1861	The firing on the federal garrison by Confederate forces was the opening of the war.
Bull Run or First Manassas Fairfax and Prince William Counties, Virginia July 21,1861	Union forces marching south from Washington, DC, were met by Confederates at Bull Run Creek. Many Northerners expected a short skirmish and then a march to Richmond, but the Confederates turned the tide, and Union soldiers retreated back to Washington, DC.
New Orleans, Louisiana April 23-28,1862	U.S. Navy ships under David G. Farragut took New Orleans, the largest city in the South, which remained in Union hands for the duration of the war.
Second Battle of Bull Run or Second Manassas August 28-30,1862	The battle was a major Confederate victory and ended Northern hopes for an easy attack on the Confederate capital.
Antietam or Sharpsburg Washington County, Maryland September 16-18,1862	Lee marched into Maryland but was stopped in a fierce battle at Antietam. Lincoln was furious that McClellan did not pursue Lee on his retreat into Virginia.
Fredericksburg, Virginia December 13,1862	Union General Ambrose Burnside led an attack on the town as a first step toward attacking the Confederate capital of Richmond but was defeated by a well-defended force commanded by Robert E. Lee. The U.S. Army lost 13,000 troops, mostly in ill-conceived direct attacks while the Confederates lost 5,000. Northern morale sank.
Chancellorsville Spotsylvania County, Virginia April 30-May 6,1863	A Union army led by General Joseph Hooker was defeated by a Confederate force, leading to a major incursion north of the Mason-Dixon line that threatened Washington, DC.
Gettysburg, Pennsylvania July 1-3,1863	The bloodiest battle of the war led to Lee's withdrawal back to Virginia, ending the threat to Washington, DC.
Vicksburg, Mississippi May 18-July 4,1863	Union troops commanded by Ulysses S. Grant finally took control of the Mississippi River from St. Louis to New Orleans and thus cut the Confederacy in half while securing easy access into the interior of the Confederacy.
Wilderness Spotsylvania County, Virginia May 5-7,1864	Lincoln placed Grant in charge of all U.S. forces, and Grant led a bloody drive into Virginia. The first battle took place in deep woods (hence the Wilderness), and Grant—unlike previous Union generals—simply kept going.
Cold Harbor, Virginia May 31-June 12,1864	Grant attacked the Confederate army and took horrible casualties. In his Memoirs, Grant wrote that this was the one attack he wished he had never ordered.
Atlanta, Georgia September 2,1864	William T. Sherman led 62,000 troops into Georgia, defeating Confederate forces and taking Atlanta. Sherman's army then began its "march to the sea" taking Savannah on December 21 before running north and attacking Confederate forces in South and North Carolina.
Mobile Bay, Alabama August 2-23,1864	U.S. Admiral David G. Farragut effectively ended blockade running out of Mobile, depriving the South of badly needed supplies.
Appomattox Court House, Virginia April 9,1865	Lee surrendered to Grant.
in the South began to lose hope. In early 1865, Lee even began recruiting black soldiers
with the promise of freedom for them, though not the end of slavery for others. By
March 1865, Lee knew his army could not stay at Petersburg.
The retreat of the remaining Army of Northern Virginia out of Petersburg left
Richmond open to attack. On April 2, while Jefferson Davis sat in Sunday morning
services in Richmond, a messenger gave him a telegram. Many in the congregation
Chapter 14 And the War Came: The Civil War 409
142
142
14.4
14.1
14 J
143
14.4
thought they knew what it meant when Davis slipped out. All Sunday afternoon, the leaders of the Confederate government moved out of Richmond, taking what records, gold, and materials they could and burning the rest. By evening, mobs had replaced the government. The next morning, the Union army marched into Richmond, not to burn the city but to put out the fires that the retreating Confederates had started. The day after that, President Lincoln, with only a small guard of sailors, came to Richmond, sat at Davis’s old desk, and greeted former slaves who were shouting “Glory to God!” and “Bless the Lord!” When one former slave knelt at Lincoln’s feet the president said, “Don’t kneel to me. That is not right.”
Davis fled south from Richmond to Danville where he announced that “nothing is now needed to render our triumph certain, but...our own unquenchable resolve” But resolve was melting. Lee’s troops were weak from lack of food. He tried one last attack on April 9, and when that failed, sent word to Grant that he was ready to surrender. The two generals—Grant and Lee—met in Wilmer McLean’s living room in Appomattox, Virginia, that afternoon. Grant remembered the encounter. “We soon fell into a conversation about old army times... .Our conversation grew so pleasant that I almost forgot the object of our meeting.” But when Lee turned back to the matter at hand, Grant wrote out the terms of surrender. He allowed the Confederate soldiers to keep their horses and mules with them to help in planting crops for the year ahead, and Lee noted that “this would have a happy effect.”
The first Union troops to arrive in Richmond on April 4,1865 looked on a city in ruins. 410 PartV Expansion, Separation, and a New Union, 1844-1877

Explore the Civil War on MyHistoryLab
WHAT BROUGHT THE UNITED STATES TO THE CIVIL WAR?
By 1860, the United States was divided between North and South, a divergence centered on the issue of slavery. Other elements, however, also separated the two sides. The South was mostly agricultural and rural compared to the far more urbanized and industrialized North. By 1861, the two sides were in the Civil War as 11 southern states had seceded as the Confederacy. A bloody conflict ensued that lasted until 1865 and cost more American lives than any other U.S. war before or since. The Union eventually won, bolstered by its economic advantages, but only after the deaths of 752,000 men.
Union soldiers pose with a captured Confederate cannon.
RESOURCES OF THE UNION AND THE CONFEDERACY,
1861 	Industrial Workers	Factories	Railroad Tracks (miles)
Union	1,300,000	110,000	22,000
Confederacy	110,000	1,800	9,000
■ Union Ml Confederacy
SOURCE:
Multiple sources: Inter-University Consortium for Political and Social Research - http://www.icpsr.umich.edu/icpsrweb/ ICPSR/studies/2896? archive=ICPSR&q=historicaf+economic+data+united+states]; Railroads and the Making of Modern America Digital History Project, University of Nebraska-Lincoln. [http://railroads.unl.edu/shared/resources/1861_Railroad.kml]; Inter-University Consortium for Political and Social Research - http://www.icpsr.umich.edu/icpsrweb/ICPSR/studies/2896?archive=ICPSR &q=historical+economic+data+united+states] KEY QUESTIONS
Use MyHistoryLab Explorer to answer these questions: Comparison ►►► How did the South's population density contrast to that of the North?
Map area data based on census information.
Response ►►► Where were the major Civil War battles fought?
Consider different regional strategies that affected military campaigns.
Analysis ►►► How did the North win the Battle of Gettysburg?
Examine the course of this decisive battle.
Chapter 14 And the War Came: The Civil War 411
14.4
Grant arranged for Lee’s starving army to receive military rations. At 4:30 p.m., Grant telegraphed Secretary of War Stanton, that “General Lee surrendered the Army of Northern Virginia this afternoon.” The long and terrible war essentially over. Grant wrote of a sense of sadness “at the downfall of a foe who had fought so long and valiantly, and had suffered so much for a cause, though that cause was, I believe, one of the worst for which a people ever fought.”
Lee’s surrender did not quite end the war. Jefferson Davis fled south, hoping to regroup his government, perhaps in Texas, until he was captured in Georgia on May
10.	He was held in custody for 2 years at Fortress Monroe before being released on bail. Davis was indicted for treason, but the charges were never pressed, although he was barred from ever holding a federal office again. During the next 2 decades, he tried various business ventures and wrote his defense of the cause he had led. Isolated Confederate units carried on the fight in remote areas, especially Texas, until May. But after the April 9 surrender at Appomattox, almost everyone knew that the war was over. Washington, DC, was draped with flags, people fired salutes, embraced, and sang. Soldiers on both sides found their weary way home. Those in the North were welcomed with grand parades; most of those in the South simply made it home.
Lincoln's Legacy
On January 31, 1865, even before Lee’s surrender, the House of Representatives voted 119 to 56 to add a Thirteenth Amendment to the Constitution:
Neither slavery nor involuntary servitude, except as a punishment for a crime whereof the party shall have been duly convicted, shall exist within the United States, or any place subject to their jurisdiction.
The floor of the House and visitors watching in the gallery erupted into cheers and applause. Many of those in the gallery were African-Americans; people who had not been even admitted to the House gallery until 1864. The Senate and the states quickly followed, and the amendment became part of the Constitution on December 18, 1865. The war that began over slavery ended with its abolition in every part of the United States.
After visiting Richmond, Virginia, on April 4 and 5 and receiving the news of Lee’s surrender on April 9, President Lincoln gave what came to be known as his “last speech” at the White House on April 11, 1865. Of course, he did not know it was to be his last. Reviewing the president’s speech, the New York World said, “Mr. Lincoln gropes...like a traveler in an unknown country without a map.” In fact, the administration, the Congress, and the country were all groping to find their way through several extraordinarily difficult issues as the Civil War ended. Among the most contentious were those related to defining the rights of newly freed slaves: Did they have the right to vote? Did they have other political rights? Did they have a right to some of the land they had worked for so long? There were equally contentious arguments about the rights of the former Confederate states: Had they actually left the Union, in which case, did they needed to be readmitted, perhaps after a time as territories? Or had they never left the Union, in which case, could they could simply renew their place in the country and make their own laws? No one really knew the answers or how to get answers. As Lincoln said on April 11, Unlike a case of a war between independent nations, there is no authorized organ for us to treat with. No one man has authority to give up the rebellion for any other man. We simply must begin with, and mold from, disorganized and discordant elements.”
Lincoln also called the question of whether the Confederate states had left the Union a pernicious abstraction.” He did not want to debate whether the
12 Part V Expansion, Separation, and a New Union, 1844-1877
v
thinking historically
Abraham Lincoln, Second Inaugural Address, 1865
As Lincoln took the oath of office for the second time, everyone knew that the Civil War was about to end. No one, of course, knew that the president had only weeks to live. But it was the occasion of one of the most memorable speeches in American history. Lincoln said:
On the occasion corresponding to this four years ago, all thoughts were anxiously directed to an impending civil war. All dreaded it—all sought to avert it....Both parties deprecated war; but one of them would make war rather than let the nation survive; and the other would accept war rather than let it perish. And the war came.
One eighth of the whole population were colored slaves, not distributed generally over the Union, but localized in the Southern part of it. These slaves constituted a peculiar and powerful interest. All knew that this interest was, somehow, the cause of the war. To strengthen, perpetuate, and extend this interest was the object for which the insurgents would rend the Union, even by war; while the government claimed no right to do more than to restrict the territorial enlargement of it. Neither party expected for the war, the magnitude, or the duration, which it has already attained. Neither anticipated that the cause of the conflict might cease with, or even before, the conflict itself should cease. Each looked for an easier triumph, and a result less fundamental and astounding. Both read the same Bible, and pray to the same God; and each invokes His aid against the other. It may seem strange that any men should dare to ask a just God's assistance in wringing their bread from the sweat of other men's faces; but let us judge not that we be not judged.
The prayers of both could not be answered; that of neither has been answered fully....Fondly do we hope—fervently do we pray—that this mighty scourge of war may speedily pass away. Yet, if God wills that it continue, until all the wealth piled by the bond-man's two hundred and fifty years of unrequited toil shall be sunk, and until every drop of blood drawn with the lash, shall be paid by another drawn with the sword, as was said three thousand years ago, so still it must be said "the judgments of the Lord, are true and righteous altogether."
With malice toward none; with charity for all; with firmness in the right, as God gives us to see the right, let us strive on to finish the work we are in; to bind up the nation's wounds; to care for him who shall have borne the battle, and for his widow, and his orphan—to do all which may achieve and cherish a just and lasting peace, among ourselves, and with all nations.
Source: Congressional Globe, March 4,1865, Senate, 39th Congress, 4th Session, pp. 1424-1440.
Thinking Critically
1.	Historical Interpretation
What does this speech tell you about Lincoln's views on the root causes of the war? Was his interpretation universally accepted?
2.	Historical Interpretation
What sort of postwar Reconstruction do you think Lincoln had in mind with his "with malice toward none; with charity for all; with firmness in the right" statement? Does it offer any hint of the possible nature of Reconstruction under Lincoln?
■in

states had really left the Union and therefore needed to be readmitted or whether they had simply been “in rebellion” and therefore, with the end of the rebellion, were back in their old places. The issue for him, he said, was much simpler: “We all agree that the seceded States, so called, are out of their proper practical relation with the Union; and that the sole object of the government, civil and military, in regard to those States is to again get them into that proper practical relation.” In fact, the issue was not so simple. If the states had actually left the Union, then Congress could impose conditions on their readmission such as granting blacks the right to vote. If they had never left, then it was more difficult to impose such conditions.
In April 1865, Lincoln began to give more attention to the postwar era. Some thought he had decided that guaranteeing former slaves the right to vote should be a key element in the integration of the Confederate states back into the Union, but he did not announce his policy. On the morning of April 14, he met with the cabinet to discuss what he was now calling “reconstruction.” He directed Secretary
Chapter 14 And the War Came: The Civil War 413
of War Stanton to develop military districts and temporary military governments across the South to avoid anarchy and supervise a return to civilian rule. Those at the meeting remembered that Lincoln said the agenda had shifted from the war to a new set of peacetime issues on which “we must soon begin to act.” But Lincoln would not be the one doing the acting.
That same evening, the president and his wife attended a play at Ford’s Theater. He was shot by John Wilkes Booth, who had become convinced that Lincoln was, indeed, going to give former slaves the right to vote. Early the next morning, Lincoln died. As April 1865 ended, the country was in mourning, and it was at peace—and no one knew what the future held.
14.4
Quick Review How was the violence of the Civil War different from other wars in which the United States was involved?
CONCLUSION
When the Civil War began in 1861, people North and South hoped for and expected a short and limited war, but it was not to be. Four years of terrible violence would follow.
When the first calls for troops were issued, enthusiastic young men signed up for service in the Union and Confederate armies, anxious not to miss out on the adventure and glory that they were sure would come in a short and easy war. But attitudes changed quickly. In the first significant battle of the war, at Bull Run Creek near Manassas, Virginia, in July 1861 tourists from Washington, DC, accompanied Union forces to watch what they were sure would be an easy victory. But in spite of early predictions, Confederate forces turned the tide and the Union army and their visitors were quickly driven back to the relative safety of the nation’s capital.
In spite of early successes by the U.S. Navy in blockading many Southern ports and in opening up portions of the Mississippi River to Union forces, President Lincoln soon became convinced that the nation was in for a long and bloody war and began looking for a general who had the tenacity to lead troops to a convincing victory. But through 1861, 1862, and 1863, in spite of bloody battles— a second one at Bull Run in August 1862 followed by the bloodiest day of the war at Antietam, Maryland, that September; further battles at Fredericksburg, Virginia, in December; then Chancellorsville, Virginia, in April 1863; and Gettysburg, Pennsylvania, that July—the war seemed to have no conclusive end in sight. Battles took place as far away as Missouri, New Mexico, and Minnesota, some with western Indian tribes angry at expanding white settlement and some between Northern and Southern sympathizers. Many, North and South, began to lose hope.
In the North, Peace Democrats, soon calling themselves Copperheads, began to campaign for an end to the war and for letting the South go its own way. The New York Draft Riots of July 1863 illustrated the way many white immigrants in that city had little interest in fighting a war and, indeed, blamed local blacks—whom they attacked across the city—for causing their troubles. At the same time, in the South, starvation spread, and Southern cities, including the Confederate capital of Richmond, Virginia, were wracked with bread riots.
While others debated, however, black and white abolitionists knew exactly what they wanted from the war—an end to slavery everywhere in the United States. From the earliest days of the war, abolitionists had urged Lincoln to use his war powers to free all slaves, and some, like the former slave Frederick Douglass, insisted that the
414 PartV Expansion, Separation, and a New Union, 1844-1877
only terms on which the war could be won and the nation united was the complete abolition of the institution of slavery that had led to war in the first place. Finally, in the fall of 1862, after more than a year of caution, President Lincoln decided to act and on January 1, 1863, signed the Emancipation Proclamation, freeing all slaves in the rebellious states and calling on former slaves to enlist in the Union army. Former slaves who had been flocking to Union posts now joined the army and quickly attained equality with white soldiers as well as a reputation for valor that impressed many.
Still the war itself continued. Women, North and South, became nurses— a previously all-male profession—to help the wounded and suffering soldiers. In 1863, after the Union army’s victory at Vicksburg on the Mississippi River, Lincoln selected Ulysses S. Grant after searching for a general who had the determination to do what had to be done to win the war. Grant began a series of attacks on Confederate forces in Virginia in an effort to both defeat the main body of the Confederate army and take the Confederate capital of Richmond. At the same time, Grant’s former deputy, William T. Sherman, began a march across the South, from the Mississippi River to Atlanta, Georgia, and then a “march to the sea” that captured the port city of Savannah, Georgia, in December, 1864. As 1865 began, Sherman’s army turned north, marching through the Carolinas to attack Virginia from the south while Grant’s army had new victories in Virginia. Finally on April 9, 1865, the main Confederate army commanded by Robert E. Lee surrendered to Grant. Ihe Civil War was over. Days later, President Lincoln, who was just beginning to turn his attention to what might come next, was assassinated. The rebuilding of the country would be in other hands.
did that style of waging war
CHAPTER
The Civil War became a "war of attrition." How contribute to the Union victory?
Chapter 14 And the War Came: The Civil War 415
Chapter 14 Chapter Review
FORT SUMTER TO ANTIETAM,
1861 -1862 14.1
Explain how the early battles of the war shaped future events.
Review Questions
1.	Contextualization
What lessons did each side take away from the First Battle of Bull Run?
2.	Comparison
Compare and contrast the strategies of the North and the South in the first 2 years of the war. How did each side’s strategy reflect its strengths and weaknesses?
3.	Historical Interpretation
How important was Union naval supremacy to the North’s eventual victory?
143
THE HOME FRONT: SHORTAGES, OPPOSITION, RIOTS,
AND BATTLES____________________________________________
Explain how the war's death toll and civilian shortages affected life—North and South—during the war.
Review Questions
7.	Cause and Effect
How did financial problems undermine the Southern war effort?
8.	Historical Interpretation
How did Southern women contribute to the war effort? How did the war change the role of women in Southern society?
9.	Comparison
Compare and contrast the Northern and Southern home fronts. How would explain the changes you note?
14.2
THE ROAD TO EMANCIPATION
Analyze how the war influenced attitudes toward slavery in white and black communities, leading to the Emancipation Proclamation and to black soldiers in the Union army.
Review Questions
4.	Contextualization
How would you explain Lincoln’s initial reluctance to link the war to the abolition of slavery?
5.	Historical Interpretation
What light does the Union response to escaped slaves shed on the diversity of opinion about slavery in the North?
6.	Chronological Reasoning
How did Lincoln’s views on emancipation evolve over the course of the war? How would you explain the changes you note?
14.4
FROM GETTYSBURG TO APPOMATTOX AND BEYOND
Analyze the strategies and costs of fighting a long and terrible war.
Review Questions
10.	Constructing Arguments
Defend or refute the following statement: “After the Union victories at Gettysburg and Vicksburg in July, 1863, the eventual defeat of the Confederacy was all but certain.” What evidence can you produce to support your position?
11.	Comparison
How did Union strategy change after Grant was given overall command?
12.	Recognizing Cause and Effect
What factors contributed to the extraordinarily high death toll during the Civil War?
13.	Historical Interpretation
Reread Lincoln’s Second Inaugural Address. To what forces does Lincoln attribute the war?
14.	Contextualization
What did “freedom” mean to Frederick Douglass? What rights and responsibilities did it entail?
416 PartV Expansion, Separation, and a New Union, 1844-1877
v
This popular picture, drawn by A. H. Ward for Harper's Weekly in November 1867, illustrated the prime meaning of Reconstruction for many African-Americans, whether former slaves or former soldiers in the Union army. The end of slavery brought—for the moment—the right to vote.

For those who had been enslaved it was a day of freedom. They celebrated as others had done. Houston H. Holloway, a slave sold three times before his 20th birthday recalled the day emancipation came to Georgia: “I felt like a bird out of a cage....The week passed off in a blaze of glory.” Six weeks later, Holloway and his wife celebrated the birth of a new baby and “received my free born son into the world. For some former slaves, nothing mattered more than getting away from their old plantations. They moved short distances to be with friends and family or great distances to Louisiana, Indian Territory, or the North. For others, the news that they could now be wage-earning employees on the same plantations where they had previously worked without pay was the best option available. Whatever their situation and regardless of their previous status, emancipation changed every aspect of life for all people of the United States.
CHAPTER OBJECTIVE
Demonstrate an understanding of the development and decline of Reconstruction.
FEDERAL RECONSTRUCTION POLICY__________
Explain the political development of federal Reconstruction policy.
THE IMPACT OF RECONSTRUCTION___________
Explain the impact of Reconstruction on African-American life in the South.
TERROR, APATHY, AND THE CREATION OF THE SEGREGATED SOUTH_________________________
Analyze the reasons Reconstruction ended and the impact of Redemption.
153
Chapter 15 Reconstruction 417

■i 1865 Lincoln dies, Andrew Johnson becomes
......president
j	Last battles of the Civil War in Cameron
U J
j County, Texas I
President Johnson announces plans for a	Presidential Reconstruction
!	"Juneteenth" Emancipation announced
in Texas
j	Thirteenth Amendment ratified
Ku Klux Kian formed in Tennessee
1866	Civil Rights Act passed over Johnson's veto
1867	First Congressional Reconstruction Act passed
1868	Houses pass articles of impeachment against President Andrew Johnson Andrew Johnson is acquitted by one vote in the Senate
Fourteenth Amendment ratified
1869	Ulysses S. Grant inaugurated as 18th President of the United States
1870	Fifteenth Amendment ratified
First Enforcement Act passed by Congress U.S. Department of Justice created to enforce Reconstruction laws
1871	Ku Klux Kian Act passed by Congress
U.S.
Army troops seize Louisiana statehouse, return Republican legislature 1873	Colfax, Louisiana, Massacre Supreme Court decision in the Slaughterhouse Cases limits the reach of the Fourteenth Amendment
1874	Grant orders 5,000 troops to New Orleans to return Republican governor
1875	Civil Rights Act of 1875
1876	United States v. Cruikshank
1877	Rutherford B. Hayes inaugurated as president
Slow ending of Reconstruction
After January 1863, the Emancipation Proclamation made the Union Army an army of liberation for slaves during the war itself. Many slaves did not wait for the Union army to arrive. When Joseph Davis fled the plantation that he and his brother Jefferson Davis owned at Davis Bend on the Mississippi River in 1862, slaves took over the property and began running it themselves, much to the surprise of General Grant who arrived at Davis Bend with the Union army in 1863. Even for those still in slavery throughout the war, word passed quickly. In Mississippi, while the war was still far away, one slave responded to a planter’s greeting “Howdy, Uncle” with an angry “Call me Mister.” Other slaves refused to work unless they were paid or simply left, often in search of family members, sometimes just because, for the first time in their lives, they could.
In the aftermath of the Civil War, women and men who had been considered the property of others found that they could buy property. They could refuse to work for people who only recently had coerced their labor. They could travel without the hated passes from white masters. Sometimes they were reunited with family members from whom they had long been separated. People for whom literacy had been illegal now learned to read and write. They became teachers, started their own schools, and opened colleges and universities. Slaves and free blacks who had never dreamed of voting became voters and officeholders, members of state legislatures, and members of the United States Congress. They passed laws creating a system of public education and dreamed of better days ahead. The story of the era known as Reconstruction, its high hopes and its violent and tragic ending, is the focus of this chapter.
FEDERAL RECONSTRUCTION POLICY
15.1
Radical Republicans
A shifting group of Republican congressmen, who favored abolishing slavery and advocated full rights for former slaves in the South.
Explain the political development of federal Reconstruction policy.
In December 1864, Senator Charles Sumner of Massachusetts thought Lincoln had agreed that former Confederate states must grant all citizens the same right to vote as whites (which meant the right of males to vote) to be readmitted to the Union. But while Lincoln had come to believe that blacks who fought in the Union army had won the right to vote, he also believed that the Constitution gave states the right to determine who voted and he did not yet seem ready, as far as anyone knew, to interfere.
When Lincoln died in April 1865, his own party was divided on the question of the vote for African-Americans and on how best to handle the readmission of the Confederate states within the nation. With the war just ending, the majority of Republicans, in and out of Congress, were still moderates. Many had begun the Civil War with the intention only to save the Union and had been won over in the course of the war to believing that the end of the war had to mean the end of slavery. Still, that revised intention was just a single goal; they were not committed to voting rights or the award of land for newly freed African-Americans. Other Republicans who were coming to be known as Radical Republicans—often called simply “the radicals”—in Congress were determined that the North’s victory in the Civil War meant that the country should give formerly enslaved people not only their freedom but also the right to vote and to hold office. In addition, they believed the country should provide land to those who had previously worked other people’s land as their slaves. In other words, formerly enslaved people should be given all the rights of white Americans.
418 PartV Expansion, Separation, and a New Union, 1844-1877
American Voices
Jourdon Anderson, Letter to Colonel P. H. Anderson, 1865
15.1
fter Jourdon Anderson and his wife Mandy were freed from slavery on a Tennessee plantation belonging to Colonel P. H. Anderson, they moved north and settled in Dayton, Ohio. A year later, with the war over and the Confederate army disbanded, Colonel Anderson wrote to his former slaves asking them to return as employees. Jourdan Anderson responded to his former master:
As to my freedom, which you say I can have, there is nothing to be gained on that score, as i got my free-papers in 1864 from the Provost-Marshall-General of the Department at Nashville. Mandy says she would be afraid to go back without some proof that you are sincerely disposed to treat us fairly and justly—and we have concluded to test your sincerity by asking you to send us our wages for the time we served you. This will make us forget and forgive old scores, and rely on your justice and friendship in the future. I served you faithfully for thirty-two years and Mandy twenty years. At $25 a month for me, and $2 a week for Mandy, our earnings would amount to $11,680. Add to this the interest for the time our wages has been kept and deduct what you paid for our clothing and three doctors visits to me and pulling a tooth for Mandy, and the balance will show what we are in justice entitled to.... If you fail to pay us for faithful labors in the past we can have little faith in your promises in the future. We trust the good Maker has opened your eyes to the wrongs which you
and your fathers have done to me and my fathers, in making us toil for generations without recompense. Here I draw my wages every Saturday night, but in Tennessee there was never any pay day for the negroes any more than for the horses and cows. Surely there will be a day of reckoning for those who defraud the laborer of his hire.
Jourdon Anderson
P.S. -Say howdy to George Carter, and thank him for taking the pistol from you when you were shooting at me.
Source: John David Smith, Black Voices From Reconstruction, 1865-1877 (Gainesville: University Press of Florida, 1997), pp. 43-44.
Thinking Critically
1.	Documentary Analysis
What examples can you find in the document of Jourdon Anderson's sense of humor?
2.	Historical Interpretation
Why would Colonel Anderson invite Jourdon Anderson back to work on the plantation where he had been a slave? How do you think the former slave owner responded to this letter from Jourdon Anderson?
A similar kind of split existed over the proper ways to readmit states to the Union. Lincoln and many other Republicans had argued throughout the war that the Southern states had never left the United States; after all, preserving the Union had been the initial reason that the North went to war in 1861. If the Southern states had never left, there was little to do at war’s end but for them to conduct elections for local and national office and resume their place in the nation. Others, however, especially the Radical Republicans, argued that after 4 years of fighting against the Union, the states of the former Confederacy were effectively out of the country and could be readmitted only after some period in which the federal government sought to reconstruct state governments to ensure that those who led the rebellion traitors, as the radicals always called them—would not lead the new state governments and that the full civil rights of African-Americans would be ensured. The difference of opinion was significant, and compromise was not easy.
While Lincoln pondered the question of the vote and argued that the debate over the term readmission was a distraction from the work at hand, he did take another step that would have far-reaching significance in what was to come. Lincoln Proposed establishing a federal Bureau of Freedmen, Refugees and Abandoned Lands.
Chapter 15 Reconstruction 419
i
Freedmen's Bureau
Agency established by Congress in March 1865 to provide social, educational, and economic services as well as advice and protection to former slaves.
Presidential Reconstruction
Name given to the immediate post-Civil War era, 1865-1866, when President Andrew Johnson took the lead to return full rights to the former Confederate states.
Congressional Reconstruction
Name given to the period 1867-1870 when the Republican-dominated Congress controlled Reconstruction era policy. Sometimes it is also known as Radical Reconstruction.
The Freedmen’s Bureau, as it came to be known, would last longer and do more than Lincoln ever imagined when he signed the legislation authorizing it in March 1865.
Lincoln placed great faith in the new government established in Louisiana after the Union victories there. The new legislature pledged loyalty to the Union, created a public school system, and after it was proposed ratified the Thirteenth Amendment abolishing slavery. It had not, however, granted former slaves the right to vote. Lincoln pondered the question of whether Louisiana could be brought into proper practical relation with the Union sooner by sustaining, or by discarding, her new state government. His own answer was clear: he believed that the Louisiana government could eventually extend the vote and would provide a model of transition back into the Union for other Confederate states. The more radical members of Congress did not want to give Louisiana full rights as a state until it had guaranteed that blacks would be given the right to vote. They blocked counting Louisiana’s electoral votes in the 1864 election and the seating of the state’s new senators. They would soon do more.
The post-Civil War era is often described as including three distinct time periods. The first period is referred to as Presidential Reconstruction in 1865-66, when President Johnson sought to return states to their prewar status with only the institution of slavery being abolished. The next period is known as the more radical Congressional Reconstruction (sometimes Radical Reconstruction), which began when Congress began to challenge Johnson in 1867 and generally continued through
This illustration from Harper's Weekly shows agents of the Freedmen's Bureau trying to settle a dispute between white and black Southerners. The Freedmen's Bureau took an active role in the lives of citizens in a way that the federal government had never done before, managing disputes, organizing schools, and ensuring political rights for recently enfranchised African-Americans.
420 Part V Expansion, Separation, and a New Union, 1844-1877
the end of Grant’s two terms in 1877. The last period, known as “Redemption” (by its defenders but not by those who lost rights in the process), began with the election of Rutherford B. Hayes in November 1876 and involved the withdrawal of federal troops from the South as well as the return of white-only governments. That last period culminated in the 1890s with the virtual disenfranchisement of all blacks in the South.
Although this typical chronology is far too simplistic, it does provide an accurate framework for the reconstruction process. The reality of the process was much more complex. Many factions battled from 1865 well into the 1880s and 1890s. Johnson was challenged even during his first years in office. Congressional Reconstruction had many ups and downs. Grant generally agreed with the Congressional radicals, those Congressional leaders and their black and white allies in the South who sought to transform the former Confederacy into a racially integrated region with equal rights. Nevertheless, in every year between 1867 and 1877, those who sought a radical Reconstruction of the South met resistance, often very effective resistance in the South and a growing inclination of Northerners to look the other way as they grew tired of the effort. Perhaps most important, the end of Reconstruction did not come all at once. It was a long process involving defeats and successes throughout the country.
Redemption
A term used by opponents of Reconstruction for the era in which the federal government ended its involvement in Southern affairs, and southern whites took control of state governments and ended black political rights.
15.1
The Presidential Reconstruction of Andrew Johnson, 1865-1866
When Andrew Johnson became president on April 15, 1865, he had served as vice president for only 6 weeks. Even so, he came to the presidency with far more experience than Lincoln had in 1861. Like Lincoln, Johnson grew up in poverty, but he had risen in Tennessee politics from city alderman to member of the state legislature, to Congress, to two terms as governor to the U.S. Senate. When Tennessee seceded from the Union in 1861, Johnson—apart from any other Senator from a Confederate State—stayed loyal to the Union and stayed in the Senate. He had long seen himself as a spokesman for the “honest yeomen” of Tennessee, and he hated what he called the state’s “papered, bloated...slaveocracy.” During the Civil War, Johnson served with distinction as military governor of Tennessee in those parts of the state where the Union army had taken control. When the Republicans met in 1864 to nominate Lincoln for a second term, incumbent Vice President Hannibal Hamlin offered little to the ticket; his home state of Maine was sure to go Republican and he had played virtually no role in the war. The choice of Johnson as Lincolns running mate—a border state senator and governor might add essential votes. Although two previous vice presidents had succeeded to the presidency, no one expected it to happen again.
When Johnson became president after Lincoln died, many of those known as the Radical Republicans in Congress embraced him. These so-called radicals wanted to be sure that the end of the Civil War did not bring merely a return to a version of the prewar status quo minus slavery but, instead, wanted the whole South to be “reconstructed” to assure economic, educational, and political equality for the former slaves. The radicals were often a minority in the Congress and the country, where many were willing to accept second-class status for former slaves, but the radicals
Chapter 15 Reconstruction 421
Black Codes
Laws passed by states and municipalities denying many rights of citizenship to free blacks and to control black labor, mobility, and employment.
had the clearest agenda for what they wanted to see happen, and every act of postwar Southern resistance tended to strengthen their hand. In 1864, Johnson had said, “Treason must be made odious, and traitors must be punished and impoverished.” And he repeated similar views to members of Congress who met with him right after Lincoln’s assassination. Ohio Senator Benjamin F. Wade said, “By the Gods, there will be no trouble now in running the government.” Another was overheard saying, “I believe, that the Almighty continued Mr. Lincoln in office as long as he was useful, and then substituted a better man to finish the work.”
When Johnson announced his plans for Reconstruction on May 29, 1865, there was widespread disappointment. Johnson supported the Thirteenth Amendment, already passed by Congress and ratified by several states, and insisted that support for the amendment be a condition for the readmission of any Confederate state to the union. But Johnson refused to go beyond that. He made it clear that he had little interest in political rights for former slaves. In contrast to his earlier claims, Johnson declared a full amnesty and pardon for most of those who had taken part in the rebellion as long as they were willing to pledge loyalty to the Union and support the end of slavery. The amnesty included restoration of all land taken by the Union army. There were exceptions to Johnson’s amnesty, however. Major Confederate officials and individuals who owned more than $20,000 in taxable property had to seek individual presidential pardons.
At first glance, the policy seemed tough on the South or at least on the former slaveholders of the South—perhaps tougher than Lincoln would have been—and consistent with Johnson’s pledge to keep slaveholders “out in the cold.” But soon, many wondered how many individual presidential pardons would be granted as they realized that Johnson was granting many more than they had expected. Blacks, though now free, seemed destined to be excluded from most of the rights of citizenship in the Johnson plan. If former slaveholders were to be given back their land, what land would there be for former slaves? Illinois Congressman Elihu B. Washburne said, “I have grounds to fear President Johnson may hold almost unconquerable prejudices against the African race.”
While the Radical Republicans in Congress were terribly disappointed, many Southern whites were delighted at the opportunity to create a “white man’s government,” if they accepted the end of slavery. Under Johnson’s plan, former Confederate states were readmitted as soon as they ratified the Thirteenth Amendment, and the new state governments that were quickly organized in the South were recognized by Johnson as the legitimate government of these states. (Since most Republicans continued to insist that the rebellious states had never left the Union, there was no official way or time for them to be readmitted.) Once recognized, these state governments, dominated by many of the same people who had been in power before the Civil War, began passing laws strictly limiting black rights, most of all, the right to vote. In addition, hunting, fishing, free grazing of livestock, which whites all assumed were their rights and which some slaves had enjoyed, were now declared illegal for blacks in a series of what were known as Black Codes, passed by states across the South, beginning with Mississippi’s code passed in November 1865. One part of the Mississippi code said:
All freedmen, free negroes and mulattoes in the State, over the age of eighteen, found on the second Monday in January, 1866, or thereafter, with no lawful employment or business, or found unlawful assembling themselves together, either in the day or nit time, and all white persons assembling with freedmen,
Free negroes or mulattoes, or unusually associating... on terms of equality... shall be deemed vagrants.
422 Part V Expansion, Separation, and a New Union, 1844-1877
In many states, Black Codes either made it illegal for an African-American to own a gun or taxed guns at high rates. In cities, new urban police forces, like the one in Mississippi in 1865, were designed to keep good order and discipline amongst the negro population. Police patrols not only enforced the law but also often terrorized blacks, especially those who refused to sign long-term labor contracts with former slave masters. Any former slave who ran away from a labor contract could be either arrested and returned to the plantation holding that contract or sentenced to a chain gang to pay off the fine for running away. African-Americans in Louisiana noted how similar the contracts were to slavery and how similar the new police were to the old slave patrols. They also asked “why men who but a few months since were in armed rebellion against the government should now have arms put in their hands. Johnson s amnesty, especially his expectation that these states would reassume all the rights of any other state, made these oppressive developments almost inevitable.
15.1
j j
Congressional Radical Reconstruction, 1867-1869
The new Congress that was elected with Lincoln in November 1864 did not assemble until December 1865—8 months after his death. This Congress had an overwhelming Republican majority, including many who had become disillusioned with Johnson by the time they met, especially as they saw what was happening in the states that had so recently been at war with the Union. The new president, they thought, was clearly siding with the former slaveholders rather than the former slaves.
Those in Congress most unhappy with Johnson, the Radical Republicans, were led by Charles Sumner in the Senate and Thaddeus Stevens in the House. Stevens told the House, “The whole fabric of southern society must be changed, and never can it be done if this opportunity is lost.” For Stevens, the core values of the Republican Party remained, as the party’s campaign slogan said, “free labor” by “free men” who earned their livelihoods by the sweat of their own brows. But with Johnson moving quickly to recognize the new state governments in the old Confederacy and those governments passing rigid Black Codes, the moment seemed to be quickly slipping away. Johnson focused on the Constitutional clause giving each state the right to set up its own government and arrangements for voting. Stevens and the radicals focused on a different part of the Constitution, the clause guaranteeing each state a republican form of government.
Most of the Republicans in Congress were not as radical as Stevens or Sumner. In 1865, a majority probably still had reservations about black voting rights. Even so, nearly all were disappointed at Johnson’s easy amnesty of so many former Confederate leaders and the way Southern states were coming back into the Union with their old leaders in power. They discredited Johnson s version of Reconstruction because the results resembled the antebellum South in far too many ways. In particular, the fact that 58 members of the Confederate Congress, six Confederate cabinet officers, andthe vice president of the Confederacy were all elected to Congress in 1865 and 1866 symbolized the failure of Johnson’s policy to bring about meaningful change. However, the Constitution also gave Congress its own specific ways of asserting its authority.
Pennsylvania Congressman Thaddeus Stevens wanted Reconstruction to mean a thorough reordering of Southern society in which former slaves would receive land and guaranteed voting rights from the federal government.
Chapter 15 Reconstruction 423
Soon after convening in December 1865, Congress created a Joint Committee on Reconstruction. Moderate Senator William Pitt Fessenden of Maine was appointed chair, and most of the radicals, including Stevens, were excluded. Nevertheless, Congress undermined presidential Reconstruction by refusing to seat the Congressional delegates from the former Confederate states, even though Johnson considered those states to be fully restored to the Union. (Johnson’s use of “restoration” rather than “reconstruction” irked many in Congress who wanted to see at least some change rather than restoring states to the place they had held in 1860.) Despite Johnson’s insistence that the states had a right to be represented in Congress, the reality was that the Constitution made each house of Congress sole judge of the qualifications of its members, and neither house was ready to seat former Confederate leaders. Senator Ben Wade demanded that no Southern state be given a vote in Congress until African-Americans had the right to vote in that state. Others called for the creation of territorial governments in the former Confederate states, which would be under the control of Congress so that both voting rights and land redistribution could be assured. But Congress itself was divided, and action beyond rejecting the delegates from the South was hard to come by. Even legislation to give blacks in the District of Columbia the right to vote—something Congress clearly had authority to do—could not make it through both houses, especially after a December 1865 referendum of white voters in the District rejected black voting rights 6,951 to 35.
Early in 1866, Illinois Senator Lyman Trumbull proposed two new pieces of legislation. Unlike the more radical Republicans, Trumbull still maintained a good working relationship with Johnson and worried about the federal government exceeding its authority. But given developments in the South, Trumbull felt Congress had the authority—even the duty—to protect the rights of newly freed African-Americans under the Thirteenth Amendment, which included language giving Congress the power to pass laws to enforce the amendment.
First, Trumbull proposed extending the life of the Freedmen’s Bureau. When Lincoln signed the legislation creating the Bureau, it was envisioned as a 1-year transitional body. However, through late 1865 and early 1866, the Freedmen’s Bureau was the key federal agency distributing food to former slaves, supporting the establishment of schools, and in some cases, even helping former slaves gain their own land. After consulting with the head of the bureau, General O.O. Howard, Trumbull became convinced that its work would take many years and proposed extending it to 1870. He also proposed giving it new authority to ensure that blacks had all “civil rights belonging to white persons” and giving bureau agents the authority to press charges against state officials who denied those rights.
Trumbull then proposed the far-reaching Civil Rights Bill of 1866 that defined all persons born in the United States (except Indians) as citizens, permanently ending the Dred Scott distinctions between whites and blacks. Although the bill was silent on the issue of voting, given that many of the citizens it referred to—women and children, for example—could not vote, it explicitly guaranteed rights to make contracts, bring lawsuits, and have the equal benefit of the laws without regard to race. The law declared that such provisions were “fundamental rights belonging to every man as a free man.” It also authorized federal authorities to prosecute violations in federal courts, a significant provision since Southern state courts were quickly reverting to their white-dominated ways.
424 Part V Expansion, Separation, and a New Union, 1844-1877
Both of Trumbull s bills would have appeared radical a year or two earlier, but in 1866, they were seen as moderate proposals from a moderate Senator, and everyone expected smooth sailing for them. Then, after they passed Congress easily, President Johnson vetoed both bills. He called the Freedmen’s Bureau an "immense patronage” system that exceeded the constitutional authority of the federal government, and he characterized the civil rights bill an as unwarranted "concentration of all legislative powers in the national Government.” In his veto of the Civil Rights bill, Johnson also went out of his way to say that giving blacks citizenship rights was wrong and that "the distinction of race and color is by the bill made to operate in favor of the colored and against the white race.”
The vetoes ended congressional efforts to work with the president on Reconstruction. Trumbull attacked the president. Senator William Pitt Fessenden, up to then considered a moderate, predicted that Johnson would "veto every other bill we pass.” Johnson was prepared to do just that. He wanted to court Northern Democrats and Southern whites in his bid for a second term. Congress passed both pieces of legislation over Johnson’s vetoes and began to use a veto-proof two-thirds majority to pass similar legislation in spite of presidential opposition. The era of presidential-led Reconstruction was fast coming to an end.
After passing Trumbull’s two major bills over the president’s veto in the spring of 1866, Congress proposed another amendment to the U.S. Constitution. Amendments to the Constitution proposed in Congress are not subject to a presidential veto, although three-fourths of the state legislatures need to agree to them. So in 1866, Congress set out to put the Civil Rights law into the Constitution itself. Agreement to do so came quickly; however, agreement on the other provisions of the amendment came much more slowly. Congress was not yet ready to give all black males the same voting rights that all white males had, but Sumner and some other radicals would never support an amendment that did not guarantee such rights. When their opposition was combined with the Democratic minority who did not want any new rights inscribed in the Constitution, crafting the amendment became a major hurdle. Many members of Congress wanted to punish any state that withheld the vote from black males, but they did not want to punish those states—currently all of them—that withheld the vote from women or those states—including several in the North—that made it hard for recent immigrants to vote. All of these issues led to months of wrangling, but the compromise that emerged as the Fourteenth Amendment guaranteeing rights of citizenship to former slaves and others born or naturalized in the United States was nevertheless significant.
The key provision of the Fourteenth Amendment said:
All persons born or naturalized in the United States, and subject to the jurisdiction thereof, are citizens of the United States and of the State wherein they reside. No State shall make or enforce any law which shall abridge the privileges or immunities of citizens of the United States; nor shall any State deprive any person of life, liberty, or property, without due process of law, nor deny to any person within its jurisdiction the equal protection of the laws.
Other clauses of the Fourteenth Amendment stated changes drastically different from the Three-Fifth’s clause and other previously accepted parts of the Constitution. They included language saying that any state that limited the voting rights of male
Chapter 15 Reconstruction
15.1

Union Leagues
In the South, a Republican Party organization led by African-Americans, which became an important organizing device after 1865.
inhabitants of a state would have its representation in Congress reduced, that any person who had held federal office and then participated in rebellion against the government could not again hold office, and that Confederate debts were null and void as far as the federal government was concerned.
Both houses of Congress finally passed the amendment in June 1866 and sent it to the states for ratification. Just as Johnson had refused to recognize a state as having returned to the Union until it ratified the Thirteenth Amendment, Congress now refused to seat the members of the House or Senate elected by a state until the state had ratified the Fourteenth Amendment. The amendment was popular in the North and many in the South were anxious to return to Congress, so approval from the required three-quarters of the states came quickly and the amendment was ratified in July 1868.
When Congress reconvened in December 1866, the majority of Republicans had no interest in working with Johnson. While the president called for immediate restoration of the “now unrepresented States” to Congress, Congress decided that, in fact, the states of the former Confederacy needed to be governed directly from Washington until “some indefinite future time.” Some said that Congress was raising the bar after earlier requiring only assent to the Fourteenth Amendment, but the majority in Congress were no longer in any mood to compromise.
In January 1867, Congress quickly passed a law—over presidential veto-giving black males in the District of Columbia the right to vote. Since the district was directly controlled by Congress, they could pass such a law even though the Fifteenth Amendment, giving all black males the same voting rights as white males, was not yet contemplated. Congressional leaders then turned to more far-reaching legislation. They passed the Reconstruction Act of 1867, which declared all Southern state governments—already recognized by Johnson—to be inoperative and divided the former Confederate states into five military districts, ordering the military to oversee the writing of new constitutions that would guarantee universal male suffrage (see Map 15-1). Only after these new constitutions were in place, and after a state had ratified the Fourteenth Amendment, would Congress admit its representatives to Congress.
The president protested that the Reconstruction Act was, “the death-knell of civil liberty.” African-Americans in the South, however, embraced the opportunity to participate in the political process. In addition to registering to vote and participating in constitution writing, blacks struck for higher pay in Charleston, Savannah, Mobile, Richmond, and New Orleans. Blacks in Richmond demanded integrated horse-drawn streetcars. Across the South, they created Union Leagues that became a base for political action and mutual support. The leagues offered opportunities to gain experience in the political process or, as one former slave said, “We just went there, and we talked a little, made speeches on one question and another.” Former slaves became political leaders. By 1867, James H. Jones, the former “body servant” to Jefferson Davis, was a featured speaker at Republican meetings across the South.
The Final Break—Johnson's impeachment
By 1867, President Johnson had become virtually irrelevant to federal Reconstruction policy. Congress passed laws, the president vetoed them, and Congress passed them over the president’s veto. But the Freedmans Bureau was under the control of the president even if he vetoed the bill that kept it going. The creation of military districts in the South also gave the president significant powers as commander-in-chief, even though he had opposed creating them.
Part V Expansion, Separation, and a New Union, 1844-1877
- Z
15.1
MD z
free 1864 free 1
wv
MC free 1865
' 1870 I
KY
free 1865
AK
1868
GA
1870
(1872)
TX
1870 (1873)
Reconstruction of the South, 1865 1877
Date refers to readmission to Union (i.e., 1868)
Date refers to re-establishment of conservative government (i.e., 1874) ES Reconstruction government set up under Lincoln US Reconstruction government set up under Johnson CZ] Five military districts by Reconstruction Act, 1867
Abolition of slavery in the South
MB
Seceded states by Emancipation Proclamation, 1863 (except territories held by Union in 1863 free by state action)
L....I
Delaware and Kentucky by Thirteenth Amendment, 1865; Maryland, Missouri, and West Virginia by state action



\

V
MAP 15-1 Southern Military Districts. Having lost all faith in President Johnson's leadership, the Congress in 1867 created five military districts to govern the states of the former Confederacy until new state constitutions that guaranteed the rights, including voting rights, of African-Americans were put in place.
Some in Congress began to consider removing Johnson in early 1867, but they ere in a minority. Instead, Congress passed a number of laws that most hoped ould keep Reconstruction moving in spite of the president. One law required all residential orders to the military to pass through the army chief, General Grant, "fore going to commanders in the field. Grant was known to side with Congress, ad this strategy seemed like an important safeguard and a significant limitation f Johnson’s power. Congress also passed the Tenure of Office Act, which said that ay person whose appointment required the Senate’s consent, namely, members of cabinet and ambassadors, could be replaced only when the Senate approved a iccessor. The goal of the act was to ensure that Secretary of War Stanton, who had sen appointed by Lincoln and who took a tough stance on Reconstruction, stayed
i office.
These Congressional actions might have worked had Johnson been willing to lay a passive role, but Johnson could be stubborn, proud, and self-focused. His loyal scretary of the Navy Gideon Welles said, “He has no confidantes and seeks none.” As result, unlike Lincoln, Johnson was often out of touch with congressional thinking.
Chapter 15 Rea
iction 427’
These traits set the stage for an even more serious collision between the president and the Congress.
While Congress took charge of Reconstruction, Johnson became convinced that he had public opinion on his side and began to encourage opponents of Reconstruction, in the North and South. He also removed several of the tougher military commanders in the South and replaced them with officers who were willing to let events take their own course, which meant letting former Confederates take control of local governments and use their power to undermine black rights. Then in February 1868, after the Senate refused Johnson’s request to remove Stanton, the president, in violation of the Tenure of Office act, fired him. It was a clear challenge to congressional authority.
Under the U.S. Constitution, a president can be removed only for “high crimes and misdemeanors,” terms the Constitution does not define. But the procedure for impeachment is clear. The House of Representatives is required to act as a sort of Grand Jury, deciding whether or not to bring charges, called impeachment, against the president. Then the Senate, with the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court presiding, acts as a jury to hear and vote on the charges. Only with a Senate vote to convict can a president be removed from office.
Led by Thaddeus Stevens, the House, with every Republican voting positively, agreed on a long list of charges, most having to do with Johnson’s violation of the Tenure of Office Act but also a charge saying that the president had tried to bring Congress “into disgrace.” However, the trial in the Senate did not go as well for the radicals. Removing a president was very serious business, and it was unclear that Johnson’s obstructionism met the level of a “high crime.” It was also not clear that the Tenure of Office Act was constitutional. Johnson claimed that he meant the firing of Stanton to be tested in the Supreme Court. If Johnson were removed, then Senator Ben Wade, president pro tern of the Senate, would become president since there was no vice president, and many who disliked Johnson also disliked Wade. When the Senate finally voted in mid-May of 1868, Johnson survived by one vote. Johnson could serve out his term in relative peace, although his chances for the Democratic nomination and reelection were slim.
The Right to Vote—Grant's Election and the Fifteenth Amendment
After Johnson’s impeachment was resolved, both parties turned to selecting nominees for the presidential election in the fall of 1868. For the Republicans, the choice was easy. Ulysses S. Grant as commander of the army had supported the Republicans in Congress on the issues of Reconstruction; his own attitudes on race had been significantly reshaped by the courage shown by black troops during the Civil War, and he was the nation’s war hero. Ihe Republicans easily nominated him along with the Speaker of the House Schuyler Colfax of Indiana as his running mate. Grant ran on a cautious platform that nevertheless embraced extending voting rights to former slaves. His slogan was, “Let Us Have Peace.”
Democrats were divided on issues of personality, on their opposition to Congressional Reconstruction, and on fiscal policies—whether to continue to authorize the printing of money, or “greenbacks,” based on the federal promise to pay. After 21 ballots in which a number of candidates, including Andrew Johnson, failed to win the nomination, they chose former New York Governor Horatio Seymour, who had flirted with supporting the Confederacy during the war and who had called protesters in the New York Draft Riot “my friends.” For vice president,
428 Part V Expansion, Separation, and a New Union, 1844-1877
they nominated a former Union general from Missouri, Francis Blair, who called for an end to Reconstruction, which he called the rule of aa semi-barbarous race ofblacks.”
While neither party articulated a fully developed economic policy, the lines between the parties were drawn on the issues of race. August Belmont, one of the nation s leading bankers, said that, in the 1868 election, financial matters paled in comparison with black voting rights. In November, Grant carried most of the North and the parts of the South under federal control, including North and South Carolina and Alabama. Seymour’s home state of New York, along with New Jersey, Georgia, and Louisiana favored Seymour. The state governments in Florida, Mississippi, and Texas had not yet been recognized, and those states did not vote. Grant won 53 percent of the popular vote but an overwhelming 73 percent of the electoral vote for an easy victory.
With Grant about to become president, Republicans in Congress moved quickly on the issue of voting rights. In February 1869, Congress passed the Fifteenth Amendment, which stated:
The right of citizens of the United States to vote shall not be denied or abridged by the United States or by any State on account of race, color, or previous condition of servitude.
Harper's Weekly carried many illustrations of the changes happening in the South to Northern audience . This issue of July 1868 showed the enthusiasm with which African-Americans, many of whom had been slaves only a few years before, were taking to electoral politics.
Chapter 15 Reconstruction 429
15.1
In a little less than a year, by February 1870, the required three-fourths of the states ratified the amendment and the right of former slaves, and other citizens, including the children of Chinese immigrants—who were citizens but had also been denied the right to vote—had been inscribed in the Constitution.
As powerful as the language of the Fifteenth Amendment is, it lacked some wording that many had wanted to include. The radicals had wanted the amendment to state that neither the right to vote nor the right to hold office could be abridged. But others feared that several Northern states, including California with its large Chinese population, might reject the amendment if the right of nonwhite people to hold office were included. Many also had wanted wording to prohibit the many tricks that some Southern governments were already using to limit the black vote, including literacy tests that could be manipulated to exclude whoever the test giver wanted excluded, or tests related to property or education. Supporters of the amendment, however, worried that they would lose too much Northern support if they included such clauses. Massachusetts and Connecticut used literacy tests to limit voting by foreign-born citizens, while Pennsylvania and Rhode Island had property or tax qualifications for voting, and no one wanted to risk losing the support of those states. As a result, important safeguards were not included.
Many women, especially the most prominent leaders of the women’s rights movement, were deeply disappointed and angered by the Fifteenth Amendment. Women like Susan B. Anthony, Elizabeth Cady Stanton, and Sojourner Truth had labored long and hard in support of abolition and the Union cause, and now they saw women’s right to vote ignored. Frederick Douglass was an advocate of women’s rights in addition to African-American rights, but in 1869, he precipitated along and painful, though temporary, break with Anthony and Stanton over the Fifteenth Amendment. Douglass argued for one step at a time, guaranteeing black men the same rights as white men, and then guaranteeing women of all races the right to vote. Douglass said, “I hold that women, as well as men, have the right to vote, and my heart and my voice go with the movement to extend suffrage to women.” These were not just words. In the decade before and after battles around the Fifteenth Amendment, Douglass actively campaigned for women’s right to vote. But between 1865 and 1870, Douglass was willing to compromise to achieve his immediate goal.
The compromise that Douglass proposed brought a sharp rebuke from the former slave and abolitionist Sojourner Truth. In 1867, at the height of the debate, Truth gave her own passionate response to Douglass. She said that she, too, had been born a slave and rejoiced that “They have got their liberty—so much good luck to have slavery partly destroyed; not entirely. I want it root and branch destroyed.” For Truth, root and branch meant the vote for all. Partial justice would not do, “and if colored men get their rights, and not colored women theirs, you see the colored men will be masters over the women, and it will be just as bad as it was before.”
In spite of compromises and disappointments, many hailed the Fifteenth Amendment as completing the work of abolition. As late as 1868, free blacks could vote in only eight Northern states. In 1870, by law, black men could vote everywhere in the United States. William Lloyd Garrison celebrated “this wonderful, quite sudden transformation...from the auction-block to the ballot-box.” While there was already clear evidence of the many steps—by law and by violence—that would be taken to deny most blacks the right to vote for most of the next century, in 1870, there was also grounds for very real optimism.
15.1
Quick Review Compare Presidential Reconstruction and Congressional Reconstruction. What are the most significant differences between the two plans? Given these differences, was the tension between them inevitable?
430 Part V Expansion, Separation, and a New Union, 1844-1877
THE IMPACT OF RECONSTRUCTION
15.2
Explain the impact of Reconstruction on African-American life in the South.
In the early years of Reconstruction, many of the Souths former leaders returned to power. Only one Southern official was tried for treason and executed—Henry Wirz, commander of the infamous Andersonville prison where so many Union soldiers died. Jefferson Davis was imprisoned for 2 years but then was freed and retired to write his memoirs. Many other Confederate leaders quickly declared their loyalty to the Union after the war’s end, received a pardon from Johnson, and resumed leadership in their states. Within a year of announcing his plan to exclude the wealthy and the political leaders of the Confederacy from the original amnesty conditions, Johnson had granted 7,000 individual pardons. The prewar status quo seemed to be returning in the Southern states. Then Congress took over Reconstruction, and everything changed. In state legislatures, local sheriff’s offices, and school boards, former slaves, Northern abolitionists, and Southern Unionists took power under the banner of the Republican Party or local Union Leagues. A radical remaking of the South began in the late 1860s and continued into the 1870s.
Voting in the South
In January 1870, the Mississippi state legislature elected Hiram R. Revels to the United States Senate. Revels was the first African-American ever elected to the Senate. The legislature that elected Revels included 40 blacks and 100 whites—hardly a black-dominated body. He was elected, ironically, to fill Jefferson Davis’s former seat, left vacant since Davis departed in 1861.
SSZfe African-American senator (left) sits with six of the first blacks elected to the House of Representatives representing Alabama, Florida, South Carolina (three representatives), and Georgia.
Chapter 15 Reconstruction 431
Revels was born free in Fayetteville, North Carolina, in 1827. Like many of the African-American political leaders during Reconstruction, he was a minister in the African Methodist Episcopal Church, serving as a pastor in Baltimore, Maryland, when the Civil War began. Revels organized two all-black regiments and served as their chaplain. At the war’s end, Revels went with his unit to Vicksburg, Mississippi, and then moved to Natchez. He was not initially a candidate for the Senate, but his lack of ambition for the post made him a perfect compromise candidate.
Senator Garrett Davis of Kentucky challenged the right of an African-American to be seated in the Senate. But Revels’s key defender, James Nye of Nevada, told his colleagues, “In 1861 from this hall departed two senators who were representing here the state of Mississippi; one of them who went defiantly was Jefferson Davis.” For Nye, and eventually for a majority in the Senate, nothing was a more fitting symbol of the outcome of the Civil War than the seating of an African-American in the place of the former president of the Confederacy.
Mississippi later sent Blanche K. Bruce to the Senate in 1874. Bruce was born a slave, but he attended Oberlin College and established himself as a planter in Mississippi in 1868. Unlike Revels, he worked his way up the political ladder, serving as the sergeant-at-arms of the Mississippi state senate, assessor and sheriff of Bolivar County, and a member of the Board of Levee Commissioners of the Mississippi River. Navigation on the Mississippi was a major concern of his during his U.S. Senate tenure, as was opposition to Chinese exclusion. Bruce was the last African-American to serve in the Senate until Edward Brooke was elected from Massachusetts in 1966.
More African-Americans were elected to the House. Twenty-two blacks served in Congress during Reconstruction, including 13 who had been born slaves. Between 1871 and 1873, South Carolina had three African-Americans in the House—Joseph H. Rainey, Robert B. Elliott, and Robert G. DeLarge. In the same sessions, Benjamin S. Turner represented Alabama; Josiah T. Walls, Florida; and Joseph Long, Georgia. Rainey served three terms in the House during which time he played an important role in arguing for the first major federal aid to education bill that was considered, although defeated, in Congress.
Reconstruction state governments, with black and white leadership, expanded the right to vote, abolishing restrictions that had existed for black and poor white voters. In addition, newly formulated state constitutions created public school systems and internal improvements designed to bring the South into the modern world. It was a heady time, yet not an easy one.
Schools for Freedom
Northern whites who came to the South with the Union army were amazed by the thirst for literacy demonstrated by former slaves. A member of an education society in North Carolina said, he thought a school-house would be the first proof of their independence. Booker T. Washington, a well-known African-American educator remembered the immediate aftermath of emancipation: “Few people who were not right in the midst of the scenes can form any exact idea of the intense desire which the people of my race showed for education. It was a whole race trying to go to school.”
Realizing that blacks saw the schoolhouse as “proof of their independence” surprised white observers. It did not surprise former slaves who had grown up in a world where literacy, for them, was a crime. As a slave child of seven or eight,
32 Part V Expansion, Separation, and a New Union, 1844-1877
Frederick Douglass had been taught the alphabet by a white woman, but the lessons did not last long. He remembered:
Mr. Auld found out what was going on, and at once forbade Mrs. Auld to instruct me further, telling her, among other things, that it was unlawful, as well as unsafe, to teach a slave to read....It would forever unfit him to be a slave.”
Nothing appealed more to young Douglass than being made unfit for slavery. Douglass found secret ways to continue his studies, and by the time he made his escape to Massachusetts, Douglass had the literacy skills that would make him one of the great orators and writers of his day. Slave masters and slave-state legislatures who made it illegal to teach a slave to read or write, unwittingly also made literacy a powerful symbol of freedom.
While the majority of teachers who went South to teach were white women, an African-American, Charlotte Forten, began teaching in Port Royal, South Carolina, where she said, “The children are well-behaved and eager to learn. It will be a happiness

American Voices
John Roy Lynch, The Work of Reconstruction, 1869
# ohn Roy Lynch was born a slave and elected as a Republican to V the Mississippi legislature in 1869. In this essay, he described what Reconstruction meant to those who, like him, were trying to create a new political system, indeed a new culture, in the states that had been part of the Confederacy only a few years before.
The new administration had an important and difficult task before it. A state government had to be organized from top to bottom. A new judiciary had to be inaugurated, consisting of three justices of the state supreme court, fifteen judges of the circuit court, and twenty chancery court judges, all of whom had to be appointed by the governor, by and with the advice and consent of the [state] senate. In addition to this, a new public school system had to be organized and established. There was not a public school building anywhere in the state except in a few of the larger towns, and they, with possibly a few exceptions, were greatly in need of repair. To erect the necessary school-houses and to reconstruct and repair those already in existence so as to afford educational facilities for both races was by no means an easy task. It necessitated a very large outlay of cash in the beginning which resulted in a material increase in the rate of taxation for the time being, but the constitution called for the establishment of the system and, of course, the work had to be done. It was not only done, but it was done creditably and as economically as circumstances and conditions at that time made
possible. That system, though slightly changed, still stands as a creditable monument to the work of the first Republican state administration that was organized in the state of Mississippi under the Reconstruction Acts of the Congress.
It was also necessary to reorganize, reconstruct, and in many instances, rebuild some of the penal, charitable, and other public institutions of the state. A new code of laws also had to be adopted to take the place of the old one, and thus wipe out the black laws that had been passed by what was known as the Johnson legislature. Also it was necessary to change the statutes of the state to harmonize with the new order of things. This was no easy task, especially in view of the fact that a heavy increase in the rate of taxation was thus made necessary.
Source: John Hope Franklin, editor, Reminiscences of an Active Life: The Autobiography of John Roy Lynch (Chicago: The University of Chicago Press, 1970),
Thinking Critically
1.	Documentary Analysis
According to Lynch, what were the most important priorities of the new Republican governments?
2.	Historical Interpretation
What light does the document shed on the challenges faced by Republican governments during Reconstruction?
Chapter 15 Reconstruction
A school operated by the Freedman's Bureau in Richmond, Virginia, was shown in this September 1866 issue of Frank Leslie's Illustrated Newspaper.
to teach here.” By 1870, several thousand teachers—whites and blacks, Northern immigrants, and veterans of the Confederate army—were teaching in schools for former slaves. Although a majority stayed for only a year or two, some found their life’s work in these schools.
Many newly free African-Americans welcomed Northern white teachers for the long term, but they also wanted teachers from their own communities. The Freedmen’s Bureau and Northern missionary groups helped in founding black colleges in the South, including Atlanta, Fisk, Hampton, and Tugaloo, which were specifically designed to train black teachers, often in a short course that lasted 1 or 2 years. Ihe results of the new efforts at teacher preparation were impressive, and as early as 1869, the bureau reported that of the 3,000 teachers for the freedmen, the majority were now African-American.
The Reconstruction Act of 1867 also fostered the growth of Southern schooling. The 1867 act required states of the former Confederacy to call state conventions to rewrite their state constitutions, and the new constitutions were expected to include support for public education. Later, even as state after state returned to white rule, the public school system remained. In Black Reconstruction in America, W.E.B. Du Bois, a renowned African-American activist, wrote, “Public education for all at public expense was, in the South, a Negro idea.”
The Reality of Sharecropping
For many newly freed slaves, another issue was as important as the vote or education^ land. In Virginia, a freedman told a Union army officer that, if the army had a right to take away the master s slaves, then they “had the right to take master’s land too.
434 Part V Expansion, Separation, and a New Union, 1844-1877

In Alabama, a state convention delegate insisted, "the property which they hold was nearly all earned by the sweat of our brows.” Those closest to the land, who had worked it for no pay, valued land and the promise of land ownership. Land provided independent economic opportunity on which freedom rested.
When Shermans army arrived in Savannah, Georgia, in December 1864, the army of 60,000 troops was accompanied by some 20,000 former slaves. Sherman met with local blacks in Savannah. Garrison Frazier, a leader of that group, made it clear what they wanted: freedom and land, which meant "placing us where we could reap the fruit of our own labor.” Four days later, Shermans Special Field Order No. 15 provided for 40-acre parcels of land for black families, which was to be taken from the plantations of owners in active rebellion on the Sea Islands and coastal areas in Georgia and, later, in South Carolina (once his army got there). Sherman also offered army mules that were no longer needed. Thus, 40 acres and a mule became the symbol of freedom to many, and by June 1865, 40,000 newly freed people were settled on “Sherman land” in the former Confederacy. Shermans order did not make it clear whether the land grant was temporary or permanent, but the link of freedom and land was permanent in the minds of many.
President Johnson wasted no time ending the redistribution of land after taking office. He ordered an end to the “40 acres and a mule” policy. As head of the Freedman’s Bureau, General O. O. Howard had expanded Sherman’s original South Carolina plan, instructing his agents to “set aside” 40-acre tracts for individual
! 15.3
THINKING HISTORICALLY
John W. Alvord's First Report to the Freedmen's Bureau, 1866
John W. Alvord was an unusually perceptive observer who was in charge of setting up schools for the Freedmen's Bureau. In his first report to the bureau in Washington, DC, in 1866, Alvord noted, somewhat to his surprise, that there were often black-initiated schools already in operation when he arrived to open schools. Thus, he wrote in his first report:
Throughout the entire South an effort is being made by the colored people to educate themselves....In the absence of other teaching they are determined to be self-taught; and everywhere some elementary text-book, or the fragment of one, may be seen in the hands of negroes....Native schools... are making their appearance through the interior of the entire country.
A more detailed reading of the report makes it clear that Alvord was surprised first by the commitment of the newly freed people to education, second by their sense of initiative in launching their own schools even before any
federal or missionary teachers arrived, and third by the sense of self-respect and self-determination that those running the schools were maintaining.
Source: John W. Alvord, Inspector's Report of Schools and Finances. U.S. Bureau of Refugees, Freedmen and Abandoned Lands. Washington, D.C.: U.S. Government Printing Office,
1866, pp. 9-10, cited in James Anderson, The Education of Blacks in the South, I860-1935 (Chapel Hill: University of North Carolina Press, 1988), pp. 6-7.
Thinking Critically
1.	Documentary Analysis
What does Alvord's surprise at finding "Native schools" say about the way African-Americans were perceived?
2.	Historical Interpretation
How do you account for the determination to be self-taught and to develop their own schools by people who only a year before had been enslaved by others and who many portrayed as passive?
Chapter 15 Reconstruction 435
15.2
Sharecropping
Labor system that evolved during and after Reconstruction whereby landowners furnished laborers with a house, farm animals, tools, and advanced credit in exchange for a share of the laborers'crop.
freedmen. Blacks across the South quickly began farming their own plots. Johnson overrode Howard’s order, issued pardons to former plantation owners, and ordered Howard to restore the land to them, which meant taking it away from those who were currently using it. Once land had been returned to its former owners, there was very little chance that former slaves would regain their parcels.
In October 1865, General Howard made a painful journey to Edisto Island in South Carolina to announce the president’s order. A committee of freedmen drafted their response:
General, we want Homesteads...if the government having concluded to befriend its late enemies and to neglect to observe the principles of common faith between its self and us its allies in the war you said was over, now takes away from them all right to the soil they stand upon save such as they can get by again working for your late and their all time enemies... .You will see this is not the condition of really freemen.
Redistribution of land, it seemed, was not going to be part of Reconstruction.
In a few places, however, former slaves were able to purchase or win government land. Having spent their lives in unpaid labor, few slaves had any resources to buy land, even when it was being sold very cheaply in the aftermath of the war. In South Carolina, which had an exceptionally strong Reconstruction government, the legislature established a state land commission that provided grants of land to some 14,000 black families—perhaps one-seventh of the state’s black population—in various parts of the state. They also created the town of Promised Land, which continues as a black-led community to the present.
The primary economic opportunity open to slaves was to return to the plantations where they had worked in the past, but do so as paid employees. Neither former slaves nor former slave owners found the prospect encouraging. One Georgia planter complained that, “Once we had reliable labor controlled at will. Now...it is both uncertain and unreliable.” When railroads or new enterprises offered jobs, blacks left the plantations to take other work.
During the Johnson-dominated Reconstruction, Southern landowners not only reclaimed their lands but also ensured the passage of vagrancy laws made it a crime to be without a job, which meant former slaves had to take whatever was offered or be jailed. Some landowners agreed to hire only their own former slaves, making it extremely difficult for newly free people to bargain for wages or move to better opportunities.
Many in Washington were pleased to see blacks become wage earners, paid for raising the cotton, sugar, rice, and tobacco they had previously raised without pay as slaves. But former slaves did not like working for wages, especially the low wages that were offered for work in the same places where they had once labored as slaves. Wageearning blacks resented their status as what some called “wage slaves.” They wanted land of their own, and if they could not get land—and in most parts of the South they could not—they wanted a share in the profits of their work.
Given the dissatisfaction that both white landowners and black workers felt, a new economic arrangement was born: sharecropping. Sharecropping meant just what the name implied. Instead of working for wages, former slaves worked as independent entrepreneurs who were guaranteed a share of the crop in return for their labor. At the same time, landowners, who provided the land, the seeds, and the loans to get through the year, also received a share of the crop.
As this agricultural economy developed after the Civil War, the owner of a large tract of land (almost always a former plantation owner who had the land returned
436 Part V Expansion, Separation, and a New Union, 1844-1877
Edisto Island, off the coast of South Carolina, was one of the first places where the government provided land and mules—and mule carts. Former slaves quickly used the opportunity to become independent farmers.
by the Johnson administration) agreed to provide crude housing, a short-term loan for living expenses (known as the “furnish” and usually provided at the beginning of the growing season in March), seed, fertilizer, tools, and the right to grow cotton on a specified piece of land 15 to 40 acres in area. Landless tenants (almost always former slaves) agreed to work the land, plant, weed or “chop” the cotton through the growing season, and bring in a crop. Landowner and sharecropper would then split the profits after the harvest.
Once the harvest was done, just before Christmas at “the settle,” the landowner would provide the sharecropper with a statement of accounts showing the value of the cotton harvest, the cost of the “furnish,” and any other loans or purchases at the commissary on the plantation (usually the only place the sharecropper could buy goods and often a place where prices were very high), and the difference or profit due to the sharecropper. Everyone knew that many planters cheated their often illiterate tenants. Asking for a detailed accounting meant risking one’s home and perhaps one’s life. Few took the risk, though many sharecroppers were privately furious when the end-of-year payments were finally made and, somehow, the results for those who had worked all year were so modest.
Sharecropping began on the sugar plantations of Louisiana and quickly spread to the rest of the agricultural South. With sharecropping, black workers had a significant new incentive to work since they retained a portion of the profits they created. Women and children, who had resisted work in the field for wages, now returned to the fields as families sought to make a living.
At first, landowners were far from enthusiastic about sharecropping. While it meant that they no longer needed to supervise employees, they did not like the sense
Chapter 15 Reconstruction 437
Homes for sharecroppers were not much different from the cabins that had been built in the old slave quarters.
of independence that sharecropping brought to former slaves. They also disliked the shift from having farm work done by gangs of laborers, as had been the case in slavery and wageearning times, to having the work done by family units on smaller plots. One South Carolina planter complained about the black-led Union Leagues that fostered sharecropping saying, “Their leaders counsel them not to work for wages at all, but to insist upon setting up for themselves.” Nevertheless, by the early 1870s, sharecropping had become the primary means of agricultural organization in much of the South, especially the region’s great cottongrowing heartland (see Map 15-2).
|1860 |
MAP 15-2 Sharecropping Reshapes a Plantation. These two maps show the changes in the living and work arrangements on the Barrow Plantation in Oglethorpe County, Georgia, between the last days of slavery in 1860 and the establishment of sharecropping in 1881. By the latter date, the old Slave Quarter had disappeared replaced by dispersed cottages of the sharecropping families, each of whom worked a portion of the land.
438 Part V Expansion, Separation, and a New Union, 1844-1877
Before long, plantation owners found ways to manipulate it for their own ends. Owners developed a credit system whereby a plantation-store sold everything from food to clothing on credit to the sharecroppers to be repaid when the crop was harvested. Many plantation owners made as much money with their stores as with their crops. With crops mortgaged before they were even planted, workers fell further and further into debt to the landowners. If sharecropping initially gave black families freedom that work for wages did not, it also tied them to the land in poverty for generations.
Quick Review Consider the early impacts of Reconstruction up to 1877. Would you consider it a success or a failure? Give at least three reasons to support your position.
TERROR, APATHY, AND THE CREATION OF THE SEGREGATED SOUTH
153
Analyze the reasons Reconstruction ended and the impact of Redemption.
During the first decade after the Civil War, Americans witnessed extraordinary changes. Slavery ended, and the Constitution was amended to give former slaves citizenship rights and the same right to vote as whites. Black males voted, held office, and served on juries, and black men, women, and children rode on integrated transit and attended school. Some even managed to own their own land. However, few of the advances of the first decade of Reconstruction lasted.
The rise and decline of black rights was an uneven process. Blacks were organizing and gaining new rights while the Civil War was still being fought. Many whites resisted black political and economic progress throughout Congressional Reconstruction. Although the withdrawal of federal troops in 1877 greatly hastened the process of undoing the gains of Reconstruction, what some white Southerners called “Redemption,” that, too, was uneven. In some areas, white-only government had been reestablished well before 1877, while in other areas, blacks maintained political rights well into the 1880s and 1890s. Nevertheless, eventually, the high hopes of Reconstruction ended everywhere.
Opposition to Black Rights and the Roots of "Redemption"
Opponents of black rights were never completely excluded from power during Reconstruction. In September 1868, the white majority in the Georgia legislature voted to expel all 27 African-American representatives. Henry McNeal Turner, one of the 27, responded: “You may expel us, gentlemen, by your votes today; but while you do it, remember that there is a just God in Heaven.” Two years later, in response to actions like the expulsion of the black legislators, President Grant reinstated military rule in Georgia. Black legislators returned to their seats along with white allies and opponents, and a majority in the legislature ratified the Fifteenth Amendment.
With Grant in the White House and Republican leaders in Congress who were willing to use federal troops if necessary to support the rights of former slaves and their allies, the Republican Party in the South was the party of black rights and racial equality. Blacks, often organized in Union Leagues, were at the heart of the party, but there were also large numbers of white Republicans in the South, including both Southern born and immigrants from the North. Southern whites who supported Republican and multiracial efforts were called scalawags, and they were a diverse lot. Some had
Scalawags
A disparaging term for southern whites who supported the Southern Republican Party during Reconstruction.

Chapter 15 Reconstruction 439
15 J
15 J
Carpetbaggers
Term used by white Southerners for Northern transplants who came to the South to help with Reconstruction.
153
opposed secession from 1861. Others, like Confederate General James Longstreet or army veteran Albert R. Parsons, embraced the Republican Party only after the war. Some, like Parsons, strongly supported equal rights for blacks. For others, support for black rights was secondary, but they saw the party as a place of personal opportunity.
Northern whites who came South were called carpetbaggers because, Southerners said, they could carry everything they owned in a single suitcase covered with carpet-like material. Resentful, Southerners claimed that carpetbaggers had come South to get rich. Carpetbaggers were on the whole younger and less prosperous than the scalawags. Some carpetbaggers were no doubt opportunists, coming to make their fortune, while others were abolitionists, coming South to implement policies they had long advocated. Many were veterans of the Union army, and some like Governor Adelbert Ames, the Republican Governor of Mississippi, had first been ordered South by the army and had stayed on.
In the 1860s and 1870s, there were virtually no black Democrats in the South. The post-Civil War Democratic Party was the party of “white only” government. Southern Democrats organized at every political level from small towns to state legislatures and governors’ offices. Their twofold goal was to assure that, even if blacks were now free, they would have few rights and that whites committed to excluding blacks from power would dominate every aspect of society, politically, economically, and culturally. For these segregationist Democrats, African-Americans of the Union Leagues, scalawags, and carpetbaggers were all their enemies.
Lucius Quintus Cincinnatus Lamar of Mississippi, an example of the Southern Democratic Party leaders of his day, was from an old elite Southern family. He represented Mississippi in the U.S. Congress before the war and became a staunch secessionist. During the war, he was a general in the Confederate army. In the postwar period, he decided to enter politics again. Lamar wrote to a friend, “It does seem to me that if there ever was a time when the white people of this state... should rise & with one unanimous voice protest against the domination about to be piled upon them the present is that time.” He proceeded to do everything he could to ensure white rule in Mississippi.
In November 1872, having long-since secured a presidential pardon, Lamar won a seat in the U.S. Congress. He also helped to organize the Democratic Party in Mississippi. In campaign speeches, Lamar attacked black voting rights. In Congress, he tried to ensure that the federal government did not enforce black rights. He helped defeat the Enforcement Act of 1875, which would have given President Grant more authority to implement the Fourteenth and Fifteenth Amendments in Mississippi. While he was engaged in partisan politics, Lamar also helped to develop another political organization outside of the Democratic Party—hidden from view but essential to his political victory—the Ku Klux Kian.
Ku Klux Kian
One of several vigilante groups that terrorized black people in the South during Reconstruction Era, founded by Confederate veterans in 1866.
The Rise of Violence and the Ku Klux Kian
The Ku Klux Kian was founded as a social club among Confederate veterans in Tennessee in 1866. It quickly turned into the largest of several secret and violent organizations bent on ensuring a reign of terror against not only Republican political leaders of either race but also teachers in black schools and blacks in general. The Kian was committed to ending Reconstruction and returning the South to white rule. The Kian assassinated Arkansas’s Congressman James M. Hinds, members of the South Carolina legislature, and other members of state constitutional conventions. It had only just begun its work.
440 Part V Expansion, Separation, and a New Union, 1844-1877
Similar organizations grew across the South. In Louisiana, the Knights of the White Camellia played a similar role, as did the White Line organizations in Mississippi. Although leaders like Lamar maintained a public distance, they secretly kept close ties to these violent extralegal organizations. By political organizing and sheer violence and intimidation, they were confident that they could return the South to its prewar ways.
Even before the emergence of the KKK, African-Americans and their white Republican allies faced violence. Just after the war’s end in May 1866, a bloody riot in Memphis, Tennessee, which began when two carriages, one driven by a black and one by a white, collided. The riot resulted in the burning of black schools, churches, and over 90 black homes as well as the killing of at least 48 people; all but two of whom were black. A Memphis teacher was murdered, and others were told they would be killed if they did not leave the city immediately. The following fall, only 13 of the 40 teachers in the black schools of Memphis returned. A few weeks later, a similar riot in New Orleans, Louisiana, resulted in at least 100 injuries as well as the killing of 34 blacks and three of their white supporters.
By the spring of 1873, what could only be described as a civil war was going on in Louisiana. Tension mounted after the November 1872 elections in which one group of voters elected a Republican governor and another group, a Democratic one. When a federal judge ruled in favor of the Republican slate, President Grant sent troops to New Orleans to oust the Democratic governor and install the Republican administration. But in the small town of Colfax, Louisiana, two sheriffs had also been elected, and federal troops were a long way off. On Easter Sunday, April 13,
1873, tensions reached a boiling point. Several dozen black families along with William Ward, who was the Republican sheriff as well as a former slave and Union army veteran, barricaded themselves inside the town and sent urgent telegrams to the governor in New Orleans, asking for the army to rescue them. Help was too late in coming. Two to three hundred whites marched on the town, led by the Democratic sheriff, Confederate veteran Christopher Columbus Nash. Nash and his army attacked the town and killed everyone they could find. At least 60 blacks, perhaps many more, were killed. The next day, witnesses saw only piles of bodies everywhere. Colfax was far from an isolated incident.
Some of the greatest violence was in Mississippi. On July 4,1874, as the Republican Party held a meeting in Vicksburg, Mississippi, armed whites arrived and shot and killed many of those, white and black, in attendance. Peter Crosby, the sheriff in Vicksburg, demanded federal intervention, but did not get help. On September 1, 1875, at a Republican meeting in Yazoo City, Henry Dixon began shooting at the mixed-race gathering. One person was killed instantly. Before long, those who were at the meeting scattered and a company of organized Mississippi White Liners—the Mississippi version of the Kian—took over the town and forced its elected government to flee.
On Election Day, the Democrats won statewide in Mississippi. In Port Gibson, black voters arriving at the polls were met by some 80 whites armed with Remington rifles, who started firing at them. One old man, John Morris, was killed, six others wounded, and none voted. At Peytona, not a single Republican vote was cast.
Kian members quickly adopted hoods and masks both to hide their identity and to frighten those who opposed them.



Chapter 15 Reconstruction 441
The Memphis riot was but one of many in which whites, enraged by new black rights, attacked homes, schools, and churches belonging to newly free blacks and any whites who supported them.
Democratic sentries on the Tombigbee River ensured that black voters could not cross the river to get to polling places. Governor Ames fled for his life before his term ended, while Democratic Party teams warned politically active Republicans, black and white, to leave the state before they were killed. Reconstruction ended in Mississippi with the 1875 elections.
Efforts to Defend Reconstruction
The antiblack, anti-Republican violence with which the South was slowly “redeemed” from Reconstruction met resistance at every step, sometimes very significant resistance. In March of 1870, just as the Fifteenth Amendment was ratified, Congress also passed the first Enforcement Act, making the denial of the right to vote because of race through force, fraud, bribery, or intimidation a federal crime. Up to that time, protecting voting rights had been completely a state issue, but in 1870, Congress had significant reasons not to trust that all the states would protect voting rights, especially for newly enfranchised African-Americans. Two further Enforcement Acts gave the federal government the right to intervene when elections were unfair. In addition, the Ku Klux Kian Act of April 1871 made conspiracies to deprive citizens of the right to vote a punishable federal offense. In June 1870, Congress also created the U.S. Department of Justice with a specific mandate to enforce Reconstruction. (Up until then, the U.S. Attorney General had been a kind of in-house lawyer and legal advisor to the president and cabinet but with no agency to lead.) All of these acts
ct V Expansion, Separation, and a New Union, 1844-1877
represented a major expansion of federal power. Because of the new legislation, crimes against individuals could, for the first time, be prosecuted by the federal government, especially if state governments did not step in and do their duty
President Grant used this legislation forcefully. In October 1871, the president proclaimed nine counties of South Carolina to be in a 'condition of lawlessness” and sent federal troops to restore order and arrest several hundred Kian leaders, some of whom ended up serving terms in federal prison. In addition, perhaps 2,000 Kian members left the state. Seven hundred leaders of the Kian were also arrested in Mississippi and several hundred more in North Carolina. By the end of 1872, the Kian, as an organization, had been destroyed.
Ihe Kian would rise again, but not for many decades later. Nevertheless, despite its absence, violence against blacks and their white Republican allies continued in the 1870s. In the North, people were growing more and more willing to let the South settle its own affairs. When the Democrats nominated newspaper editor Horace Greeley for president in 1872, they adopted a platform attacking Republican corruption and calling for civil service reform while also promising a general amnesty for former Confederates and an end to federal intervention in the South. Grant was easily renominated by the Republicans and won the election handily, but Democrats gained power in Congress. As it turned out, Greeley died before the electoral votes were counted, which caused some confusion, but no one doubted that Grant had won the election. In his inaugural address at the beginning of his second term in March 1873, Grant told the nation, “The effects of the late civil strife have been to free the slave and make him a citizen. Yet he is not possessed of the civil rights which citizenship should carry with it. This is wrong, and should be corrected. To this correction I stand committed, so far as Executive influence can avail.” Grant did his best, but it was not enough.
In 1875, Grant sent fellow Civil War General Philip Sheridan to Louisiana to investigate the political violence. Sheridan documented the killing of 2,141 blacks and the wounding of 2,115 more since the war had ended. All of these crimes remained unpunished. Another Civil War veteran, former slave Henry Adams, organized a committee of 500 blacks to “look into affairs and see the true condition of our race.” In northern Louisiana around the Red River area alone, the committee documented 683 murders, including the following notations:
Sam Maybury, whipped to death, December 1865 Henry West, badly whipped, November 1874 George, a colored man, killed by white men 1873 Nancy Brooks, badly whipped by a white man, 1873
In most cases, the list included the name of the victim and the unpunished killer. The reality that Sheridan and Adams documented would not change for a very long time.
A
Changing National Mood and the End of Reconstruction A number of factors led to the growing national weariness with federal intervention in the South. Southern Reconstruction governments were regularly accused of corruption, and some office holders, black and white, certainly enriched themselves. P.B.S. Pinchback of Louisiana, the only black governor in the Reconstruction-era, admitted that he made considerable profit for himself in his political career. South Carolina’s
white Republican Governor Robert K. Scott speculated in state bonds, and North Carolina’s Governor William Holden was aware of “damnable rascality.” In truth, the Reconstruction governments were probably no more corrupt than those that came before or after, but the charges tarnished Reconstruction.
The Grant administration also faced one corruption scandal after another. During Grant’s first year in office, Jay Gould and James Fisk, the nation’s leading bankers, tried to corner the nation’s gold supply and thus control the economy, with possible support from administration insiders including Julia Grant, the president’s wife. One after another, cabinet officers resigned and were replaced after they were charged with taking bribes or other forms of corruption. In 1870, former Ohio Governor Jacob Cox resigned as secretary of the interior to protest the administration’s failure to implement civil service reform. In perhaps the biggest scandal, a congressional investigation uncovered the workings of the so-called Whiskey Ring, a group including elected officials, government employees, and whiskey makers who defrauded the U.S. Treasury of excise taxes on whiskey. Over 200 distillers and revenue agents were indicted, and Grant’s personal secretary, Orville E. Babcock, resigned. Grant directed the investigations to continue saying, “Let no guilty man escape if it can be avoided,” and he ordered the Attorney General not to grant immunity to any suspects, but he was seriously tarnished by the widespread corruption.
The sheer size of the federal interventions in the South also undermined public support. In late 1874, White League militants ousted the Republican governor, William P. Kellogg, in Louisiana and took over the legislative hall. Since Louisiana was still under military supervision, Grant ordered General Sheridan to restore order. With 5,000 U.S. Army troops, Sheridan restored Kellogg to the governor’s office and forcibly removed Democrats from the legislative hall. The spectacle of U.S. Army soldiers marching into a legislative chamber and removing people who claimed to have been elected created a huge backlash. Newspapers that had supported the Union cause now compared the White League to the founding fathers defending their freedom from the tyranny of the British.
Debates in Congress reflected the change in Northern public opinion and the increasing swagger of Southern leaders. Joseph R. Hawley, a Connecticut Republican who called himself a “radical abolitionist,” nevertheless argued that the “social, and educational, and moral reconstruction,” of the South could “never come from any legislative halls.” The Democrats in Congress praised “local self-government,” while insisting that black and white Republicans in the South should stop depending “upon external aid.” In that context, it was difficult for the federal administration or the U.S. Army officers in the South to get support.
The U.S. Supreme Court was not sympathetic to Reconstruction. In the Slaughterhouse Cases of 1873, the court severely restricted the reach of the Fourteenth Amendment. A group of butchers in New Orleans had challenged the right of the Louisiana legislature to grant a monopoly to one meatpacking company because, they said, it violated their Fourteenth Amendment rights to due process of law and citizenship rights. But the court ruled that the Fourteenth Amendment did not include such rights, making it much harder to bring other suits about state infringement of citizen’s rights.
In March 1876, the courts decision in United States v. Cruikshank struck a further blow to Reconstruction. William J. “Bill” Cruikshank was a white participant in the
Part V Expansion, Separation, and a New Union, 1844-1877
attack on Colfax, Louisiana, in 1873. He was indicted on federal charges for violating the civil rights of blacks who were killed in the attack. But 3 years later, the Supreme Court ruled that the charges were unconstitutional. Chief Justice Morrison R. Waite wrote that protecting the rights of individual citizens was a state, not a federal duty. Cruikshank took away one of the federal government’s most important enforcement powers—the right to bring federal charges against those who attacked the basic rights of African-Americans.
Finally, in 1883, the court ruled that the Civil Rights Act of 1875 was unconstitutional because the Fourteenth Amendment gave Congress only the right to outlaw state government actions, not discrimination by individuals, which the court left to the states to deal with. The legal foundation of Reconstruction seemed to be crumbling or, perhaps, the court was simply following public opinion. Associate Justice Samuel Miller, a Grant appointee, wrote to a friend, describing what many Americans were also feeling, “I am losing interest in these matters.”
As the country prepared for the 1876 presidential elections, the loss of interest in Reconstruction was evident. The Republicans nominated Ohio Governor Rutherford B. Hayes, who was on good terms with all factions in the party and especially popular with some because of his crackdown on nascent labor unions in Ohio. The platform said surprisingly little about Reconstruction. The Democrats nominated New York Governor Samuel Tilden, who had made a fortune as legal counsel for some of the country’s richest bankers and railroads and gained fame for fighting corruption in government. Promising to continue the fight against corruption and foster prosperity, and never mentioning Reconstruction, Tilden was the strongest candidate the Democrats had nominated in some time.
The campaign was intense, especially in the South where violence and confusion reigned. In November, Tilden outpolled Hayes, winning the popular vote 4,286,808 to 4,034,142, but it was the electoral votes that counted. In three states, Florida, Louisiana, and South Carolina, Republican election boards discarded enough votes to declare Hayes the winner, which meant that he would also win the electoral count. Not surprisingly, the Democrats challenged these decisions.
The months between the election and the inauguration were as tense as any since the Jefferson-Adams contest of 1800. Some Democrats vowed “Tilden or War.” Congress created an Electoral Commission of 10 congressional representatives, five from each party plus five Supreme Court justices, to determine the outcome since the Constitution gave no guidance beyond saying that the votes “shall be counted” in the Senate. After intense negotiations, the Electoral Commission ruled 8 to 7 for Hayes. But the Constitution specified that a president could not be declared elected until the Senate actually counted the votes cast by the presidential electors from the various states. Democrats refused to convene the Senate to count that vote, thus making it impossible to resolve the crisis. Finally on February 26, a group of Southern Democrats met with Ohio Republicans and negotiated a compromise. Hayes, who promised to treat the South with “kind consideration,” agreed that, if he were made President, he would use his power to end Reconstruction, most of all by withdrawing the federal troops that were in the South protecting Republican governments. The Southern Democrats liked the offer and agreed to let the Senate meet and count the votes including—following the Electoral Commission’s recommendation—the votes of the Republican electors from Florida. On Inauguration Day, March 4, 1877, Hayes became president and moved quickly to fulfill his promises.
152
152
15.3
Jim Crow segregation
Segregation laws that became widespread in the South during the 1890s, named for a minstrel show character portrayed satirically by white actors in blackface.
Southern Republicans who had supported Hayes were outraged. A former slave from South Carolina commented angrily, “To think that Hayes could go back on us when we had to wade through blood to help place him where he is now.” Little could now be done, however. Hayes did not immediately remove federal troops from the South, but he made it clear that the troops who remained would not intervene in the South’s internal matters as Grant had ordered. The changes in federal policy had been coming for some time, but after March 1877, there was little reason to expect any federal support for Reconstruction anywhere.
After 1877, the direction was clear. John C. Calhoun, an Arkansas planter and grandson of the South Carolina senator of the same name, told Congress that “left to ourselves,” the white South could settle “all questions” about the region’s political arrangements. And they did. Blacks, carpetbaggers, and scalawags were slowly excluded from offices, though some stayed on into the 1890s. Many were forced to leave the South altogether if they wanted long lives. In addition, blacks were excluded from voting altogether, education budgets were slashed, and the regulation of share-cropping shifted further in favor of plantation owners. After 1877, white rule in the South was assured.
The Birth of the Segregated South
Disenfranchisement and segregation did not happen overnight. African-Americans were still being elected to office in the 1880s and 1890s. George H. White of North Carolina, who was described as “the last of the Negro congressmen,” bade a final farewell to the House of Representatives in 1901 saying: “This, Mr. Chairman, this is perhaps the Negroes' temporary farewell to the American Congress. But let me say, phoenix-like, he will rise up someday and come again.” The absence of blacks from Congress lasted for 28 years until Oscar De Priest was elected from Chicago. Only after another civil rights movement many decades later did African-Americans reach the number of representatives in Congress that they had in the 1870s.
Various forms of what came to be called Jim Crow segregation developed at a rapid pace. (Jim Crow was a derogatory character in a minstrel show designed to denigrate blacks, but his name has been applied to the whole era of rigid racial segregation that was the rule in many parts of the United States from the 1870s to the 1960s.) Schools, public facilities, transportation, and most every other aspect of life were segregated. In addition to losing the vote, blacks were marginalized economically so that sharecropping became virtually the only option for most. A vicious campaign of lynching controlled blacks through fear and intimidation. Perhaps the capstone of this segregation was the U.S. Supreme Court’s 1896 Plessy v. Ferguson decision that separate by equal” facilities were quite acceptable under the United States Constitution. By the time that decision was issued, the high hopes of Reconstruction were a dim memory and most Americans—white and black—were living in a very different world.
153
Quick Review Considering the events and trends of the later years of Reconstruction, or Redemption as it was called, who were the winners and who were the losers? Who was most responsible for what happened?
PartV Expansion, Separation, and a New Union, 1844-1877
CONCLUSION
During the 12 years after the Civil War, Americans grappled with what the future held for newly freed slaves and how best to return to the Union those states that had been in rebellion during the Civil War. The so-called Radical Republicans in Congress sought ways to protect the educational, political, and economic rights of the freedmen—as former slaves, male and female, were called. Andrew Johnson, who became president upon Lincoln’s death in April 1865, seemed indifferent to African-American rights and soon alienated congressional radicals by restoring power to former rebels intent on limiting the freedoms of former slaves.
Congressional Republicans had their own plans for consolidating the Union victory, however, and eventually, the House of Representatives impeached Johnson for obstructing its plans to reconstruct the South. Although he was acquitted of “high crimes and misdemeanors” by the Senate, which allowed him to stay in office, Johnson’s political career was over. But Congress passed a number of laws, including the 1866 Civil Rights Act and the Fourteenth and Fifteenth Amendments to the Constitution, designed to protect black rights as citizens and voters. Across the South, African-Americans and whites committed to Reconstruction were elected to local and national office in larger numbers and began to reshape their states. In 1868, Ulysses S. Grant, the Republican nominee, was elected president. Grant was committed to the Reconstruction of the South in ways that would protect black rights, especially black voting rights.
After the war, African-Americans pursued full citizenship rights, education, and economic independence. Terrorized by white supremacists and lacking money and credit, most African-Americans never achieved either true equality or independence. At the same time, white veterans of the Confederate army were organizing to deny those rights, not only legally through the Democratic Party but also illegally through the Ku Klux Kian and other similar organizations. As time passed, and as public support for federal intervention in the affairs of the South eroded, the promise of Reconstruction’s early days evaporated. By 1877, a new president, Rutherford B. Hayes, began to bring Reconstruction to an end, assuring white rule in the South and the disenfranchisement and “Jim Crow segregation” of African-Americans for generations to come.
CHAPTER
REVIEW
Why might the historian Eric Foner call Reconstruction "America's Unfinished Revolution"?
Chapter 15 Reconstruction 447
Chapter 15 Chapter Review
FEDERAL RECONSTRUCTION POLICY
Explain the political development of federal Reconstruction policy.
Review Questions
1.	Historical Interpretation
What do Johnson’s policies before his impeachment tell us about his vision of the post-Reconstruction South?
2.	Constructing Arguments
How would you explain the increasingly radical nature of Congressional Reconstruction? What factors pushed Congress toward more aggressive intervention in Southern society and politics?
3.	Comparison
Compare and contrast Presidential Reconstruction and Congressional Reconstruction. What were some of the ways that Congress forced the states of the former Confederacy to accept Reconstruction that Johnson opposed?
THE IMPACT OF RECONSTRUCTION
Explain the impact of Reconstruction on African-American life in the South.
Review Questions
4.	Historical Interpretation
What aspects of the history of the 1860s and 1870s would a historian report to emphasize the success of Congressional Reconstruction? What aspects of those years would a historian report to emphasize Congressional Reconstruction as a failure?
5.	Contextualization
Why did newly freed slaves place such a high priority on education?
6.	Constructing Arguments
Defend or refute the following statement. “By the end of the 1870s, from an economic perspective, most Southern blacks were almost as closely tied to the land and dependent on white landowners as they had been under slavery.” What evidence can you produce to support your position?
TERROR, APATHY, AND THE CREATION OF THE SEGREGATED SOUTH_____________________________________
Analyze the reasons Reconstruction ended and the impact of Redemption.
Review Questions
7.	Contextualization
What groups made up the Republican coalition during Reconstruction? What did each group hope to gain from its support of the party?
8.	Historical Interpretation
Is it fair to describe the Democratic Party during Reconstruction as the party of white supremacy? Why or why not?
9.	Constructing Arguments
Defend or refute the following statement. “The Ku Klux Kian of the Reconstruction era was, at its essence, a terrorist organization.”
15.3
V
Expansion, Separation, and a New Union, 1844-1877 Becoming an Industrial Worl Power—Costs Benefits, and Response
1865-1914
PART OUTLINE
